You see, I do speedruns of this game called Katana ZERO. 
You might've heard of it before. Doesn't matter. Listen.
I've been waiting every day for its DLC to drop. 
Every. Day. Run after run, repeat after repeat. 
Lost both track of time and my fucking sanity. 

But at last, I've found something. 
Something to salvage me from that boredom. 
SANABI. Yes... that should work.
I'll play this until that long-awaited day arrives.

...

Oh. And nice little Easter egg there. I enjoyed it. 
Good game so far. I look forward to its development.
Katana zero with a grapple hook. Need I say more?
its like katana zero but youre spiderman
I wanted to swing around not cry :,)
I initially became interested in Sanabi when I heard it was similar to my favorite game, Katana ZERO. I decided to wait on playing it until the full release, but I was eager to see if it would be on the same level as Katana ZERO.

..[b]It is.[/b]
its really hard using a grappling hook when you're crying
me before playing the game: "ooh. a silly grappling hook platformer for $12. sure, i'll give it a shot

me after beating the game: "(sobbing noises)"
[h1] 8.5/10 [/h1]

SANABI is definitely one of the most promising and best 2D Platformer indie action games I've played in recent years. With its innovative and creative gameplay, sophisticated pixel art style, easy-to-understand and immersive story, great music, and just the right amount of atmosphere, this game, still in its EA stage, is just too good for its same genre.

The gameplay is simple and easy to understand, but also requires skill to achieve precision. The plot is not obscure, with a simple and immersive story that makes it easy for any player to understand the game's going. The excellent level of design and distinctive boss fights add to the experience. I personally found the game to be relatively easy to play, and the adjustable difficulty makes it easy for all types of gamers to get the hang of it.

The game is not yet completed all the development, so players will inevitably be forced to stop playing when they are in the middle of the game. There are various shortcomings in the game, including but not limited to: the lack of recognizable scene design, the small font size of the character dialogs, the linear flow of the game, and the inability to go back through levels. Overall, the game still has a lot of room for improvement and I'm looking forward to it getting better and better.

I don't need to tell you how good SANABI is again, but since the game is not yet complete, it's a good idea for those who want to experience the full game to either buy it first or wait and see. However, since the game is still in its early access stage, you may want to wait for the full game release or support the developers by buying it now. Judging from the roadmap released by the developer, we can expect great things from SANABI, and I, for one, am excited to see the game improve and evolve.
If your a fan of Katana ZERO this will be another amazing game you must have.

Melding amazing game play with a heartfelt story much deeper than it may first let on. 

Getting to the end isn't what's important, its the experiences along the way.
Babe wake up they made more Katana Zero
I cried over 2 pixels
If katana zero had aerodynamic movement
The Katana ZERO DLC didn't come out so I bought this instead.

10/10 would buy it again.
TLDR; Pixel GOTY 2023. If you love Pixel games, Rich Plot & amazing music? This is the game for you, especially with that mix of the Cyberpunk aesthetic.
IF YOU LIKE THIS GAME, CHECK OUT EASTWARD. BEAUTIFUL PIXEL ART WITH EQUALLY AMAZING  STORY-LINE.

I'm an incredibly avid pixel game fan, I'm not just speaking of classic Zelda, castlevania or Stardew. I'm a HUGE sucker for breathtaking pixel art visuals partnered with an amazing story.

Honestly the only other game I can recommend that gives the same HUGE impact like this one has got to be Eastward.
Ever since I played Eastward back in 2021, I was lost in the void constantly seeking and searching for a game that was honestly the exact same.

Breathtaking visuals, banger music, fun mechanics, and very VERY rich storyline. But with the different amount of games (and trust me, I've searched EVERYWHERE), nothing came close to Eastward.

Until now.

I, very rarely, actually sit down and bulldoze through a game, sometimes I get burnt out and "take a break" for a couple of days and if I end up not wanting to play as much as I first started then I have the tendency to just drop the game until further notice, sometimes never touching it ever again.
So the fact this game broke through my standard protocol and I would rush home from work to immediately play and beat it in 3 days since I bought it? My goodness.

THAT'S how you KNOW it's a great game.
"Great" doesn't even COME CLOSE to how MAGNIFICENT this game is.

2 years, I was searching for a game similar to one that had increases my standards in pixel gaming and was always disappointed or didn't have my itch scratched, but this one will have to take the spot in my heart.

Now I'll be looking for a game that is similar to this one instead. The bar has increased and I'm so excited to see and play more games by Wonder Potion.

This game provided such an amazing adventure with so many new and amazing concepts, I can't even begin to describe the PERFECT EXECUTION that this game provided. From the backstory, the hinting, to the plot twists and the end. It all pieced together so amazingly and ughhh I wish I could just forget the game and "WIPE THE DATA" from my memory so that I CAN EXPERIENCE IT AGAIN FOR THE FIRST TIME (sorry for my lame pun).

Anyways, this game is  MUST PLAY, ABSOLUTELY. AND AGAIN, IF YOU LIKED THIS GAME, PLAY EASTWARD THANKS BYE.
cyberpunk spiderman :)

Edit after full release: :'(

innocence is a sin.

i'm in tears 11/10
This game convinced me in 15 minutes that I want a daughter.
Its hard for me to really describe how much fun I'm having with this game. This is definitely an action game but unlike any I have really played before. They make a Grappling Hook not only one of the most fun ways to traverse any environment but also a deadly weapon that stops enemies in their tracks as long as you are accurate enough to hit your target. This game is really ENTIRELY skill based because of its elegantly simple combat mechanic. Simple to understand but difficult and satisfying to master (at least for me on my XBox controller) 

It has a familiar cyberpunk aesthetic but comes at the cyberpunk genre from a different perspective. You can see the normal Cyber Punk Archetypes but because the story and the world have so much character they feel fresh along with the world.

The music is intense and makes you feel like everything you are doing is the most important thing in the world. It compliments the moment to moment game play in a way that half the time you feel like you are a Master  one moment and the next moment scrambling to keep up with the pace. 

This game isn't open world but every minute you are playing the game the world still feels deeper, and even though the point of the game is to explore an abandoned city the city still feels more alive then most open world games. 

And then there'ss the STORY, I didn't think I was going to get this into the narrative. Your main character has depth in a 2D Game just based on their actions, how they handle loss, their motives and what scares them. All while giving off this Batman Vibe. The story is a mystery that you unravel with each passing minute and there are actual moments in this where I was literally gasping with shock. The pacing of the game just keeps making you want to learn more and get better at the mechanics so you can explore more

In this game the story and the world are directly tied so by discovering more about the story you are effectively exploring this world. The Screenplay is top notch and understands that every character to stand out CANNOT sound/feel the same and when our characters meet others that have personalities that clash it actually pushes the story forward instead of just being a cute moment. 

This game takes the 2D Platformer Genre and kicked down all the barriers that would make it feel flat or without depth. Cyberpunk 2077 could only hope to have the kind of seemingly effortless story telling chops this game has.

And then you have the PIXEL ART. Just on another level. when I was a kid playing SNES I don't think I could have dreamed of a better Pixel Art game.

This game gets me excited for my steam deck
Man, this one is solid. Steeliger medal rightfully earned.
I was sold the game on "Katana Zero with a grappling hook"

I left the game bawling my eyes out.

Easily my game of the year, easily one of my favorite games of all time.
Great so far. If you liked Katana Zero, you'll probably like this. Smooth gameplay, interesting story, great music and settings/visuals. Love it!
They should def finish this game
[b]what i liked:[/b]

+ interesting and well thought out cyberpunk narrative with it's own unique charm and an intriguing lore.

+ compelling and emotional story. the opening really caught me off guard, be prepared! loved the overall writing so far.

+ gorgeous pixel artstyle and a stunning art direction. definitely one of the best looking pixel games out there. the backdrops are crafted with care and an eye for details.

+ the animations are quite well done. excellent work which makes the scenes feel more a live.

+ fast and responsive controls which makes platforming and combat a pleasure.

+ the grapling arm is such a fun tool for toying around and you'll get more and more possibilities in use the further you get.

+ difficulty seems pretty easy at first, even on higher difficulties, but will get much tougher once you progress further into the game.

+ a fair amount of checkpoints and repair stations (healing) to prevent frustration.

+ diverse and enjoyable boss fights with different themes and unique mechanics. the overall difficulty is pretty high and i loved every second of it.

+ many memorable characters throughout the game.

+ insane soundtrack, so many bangers - it's a delight.


[b]what felt debatable to me:[/b]

~ keep in mind sanabi is a plot heavy game with many "cutscenes" and dialogues, so if you're coming only for the gameplay, you may get somewhat disappointed despite having some excellent gameplay to offer, since there are a lot of slow paced narrative parts without any  gameplay at all. personally i do love the game how it is, so more of a pro for me, but i had to point this fact out for other players.

~ no achievements in this early access at the moment.

~ the length of the early access is on the shorter side.


[b]what i disliked:[/b]

- didn't like the dialogue font in general and there are some even more disturbing aspects to it. it's partly different sized to highlight people shouting or so and the letters are shaking at times - pretty unpleasant to read, i have to admit.

- sometimes the dialogue boxes are almost completely overlapping each other which makes the back one kinda impossible to read.

- yet again another dialogue issue. sometimes characters are auto continuing their dialogues quite quickly and i was barely (or unable) to read everything.

- cut these modern meme words (boomer, jk, sheesh, yada yada, sus, and so on - you get the point) from your dialogues. it simply feels lazy written and is killing the immersion to a problematic degree. i really don't need some internet douches talking meme language in my videogames, at least not in this kind of game.


8.5/10 due to some excellent design choices, but they definitely have to step up their dialogue presentation. sanabi is narrative heavy and story driven with much text, so you have to make this aspect of the game as pleasant as possible. the potential for a 10/10 is definitely there!
I didn't expect that I would be so invested in the story of the game when I read the description 'Katana-Zero meets Spider-Man', let alone have the game make me laugh and cry, but here we are.

Absolutely brilliant focused experience, so much fun. Gameplay is fantastic, music is banging, story is wonderful, the art is gorgeous. Truly one of the greats and I hope to see more from the creators.

Cannot recommend this game enough.
TLDR: 
- after completing all the content currently in the game on normal difficulty, I can *heartily* recommend SANABI - even at full price! Solid action platformer with fluid movement, surprisingly engaging story (very much looking forward to future chapters), and some amazing art/music direction. Minimal cons, really just nitpicks. Buy this game! 

Pros:
- Good Music 
- Great Art 
- Fluid Movement - some of the best of any platformer i've played 
- Interesting (enough) Combat 
- A story which was fine in the beginning, but really hooked me into the building story-arc by the time i reached the end - it left me wanting more in a good way. Lots to look forward to as more content is added to the game!!!
- 2 good bossfights 
- inclusion of a speedrun mode is really nice, for those who want *everything* timed. and getting rid of cutscenes for future playthroughs
- the protagonist has real motives and, despite his somewhat limited dialogue, acts like a fairly real person. written concisely i think would be a good term 
- the deuteragonist was a little annoying at first, but definitely grew on me
- there was a really really cool moment towards the end of the currently playable content, i won't spoil it but i made me jump a little lol 

Cons: 
- 1 bad bossfight. middle child is always neglected, i guess? it's not really *offensively* bad, just not nearly as good as the other two. 
- Some of the stage gimmicks are too easy 
- the higher difficulties don't change the game enough, they just make you health progressively lower. in retrospect i could've even put the game on the highest difficulty (where you have 1 hp) and only really struggled with a handful of platforming sections, and one of the bosses in particular
- there's only one save slot atm
- this means in order to play the timed portions of the tutorial you need to erase current progress ( a way to access these in the main menu maybe?)
- some of the signs and notes in cutscenes are untranslated from korean (as this is a brand new korean indie studio, i give them a lot of slack in this department, the english TL of the story is better than a lot of native-english game writing these days)
- some of the audio settings are too loud by default, even with my system audio being pretty quiet, and some of the audio effects are disproportionately tuned (footsteps on a steel floor in a cutscene being louder than some of the gunshots right after). not a massive deal though, only broke my immersion once at the very beginning, and after i tuned audio sliders all was well.

Overall i'd say the majority of my Cons are nitpicks, and i purposefully kept a lot of what i *couldve* praised in the Pros concise or absent so as to not spoil some of the great fun in this game. 

Very very much looking forward to what the team at WONDER POTION do with this project next!
I only play on very hard which wasnt even hard and here are the cons:
- songs dont continue after death
- cant pause the game during cut scenes
- the cursor is very big if you use lower resolution launch commands
- death timer is too long a fast paced game
- camera can be annoying between room transitions
- cant skip during justice phase transition
- black transitions on alot of tensed moment
- not alot of music variety
- justice boss arena is badly designed

Hope the game will get more polished on full release
[h1] Getting to the end is not important. What's really important is how we get there. [/h1]

Gameplay - Play as a legendary retired veteran and use your signature prosthetic arm to jump over cliffs and skyscrapers, zip through bullets and traps and defeat powerful enemies.
Story - I really can't say much without spoiling anything. It's a very good story, it has it's mystery but you get all of your answers when you reach the end.
Soundtrack - Out of this world.

Verdict - Do you like fast paced games? Do you like a simple gameplay yet it keeps you 'hooked' for hours? Do you like a very good story? [spoiler] Do you like crying over some pixelated characters? [/spoiler] Then this game is for you!
this game is a lot of fun, great story line.  Ignore my play time, this will take about 4 hours

WARNING, it is a good story line.  It ruined my whole weekend when i got the splash screen thanking me for playing the beta.  I got a cliffhanger, i was devastated. I will recommend playing game, but please note it is a unfinished product.
best dad goes goblin mode with a zelda hookshot
Great game with a similar artstyle to Katana Zero, but the gameplay is vastly different. Highly recommend.
Sanabi is an awesome platformer. The moves are quick and snappy and feel good to chain together. The art is goregous and the level design is awesome! For $15 it is 100% worth it.

but why does the Overseer bit exist I hate it
I found Sanabi being recommended in Katana 0's Reddit. I started playing it with low expectations, just thinking about it as a korean katana 0 clone.

The first couple hours my opinion didnt really change, but the gameplay kept getting harder and I decided to give it a fair shot.

Soon after that, I started loving Mari. Next thing I know, i am swinging around like a madman while solving a huge conspiracy involving a whole city. Also, the ending made me emotional lol.


Super good game with a unexpectedly good story, definitely a hidden gem. Pick it up if you like platformers or the vibes.
I was planning writing up a review about how butt-clenching some stages get but after finishing the game my eyes are wet. 


This, this game is awesome, it feels weird to play at first but then you realise it's just because you don't know how the controls work. But once the brain clicks and the controls are down, you are zooming and I mean ZOOMING through this game.

This is truly what it must feel like to be Spider-man 2099 and I love it.

It feels good to have some great platformers coming again.
[h3]~ ~ ~T E C H N O S T A L G I C ~ ~ ~ [/h3]
[h3]~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ R E V I E W ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~[/h3]
[quote=Macho Man Randy Savage] "I've cried a thousand times and I'm gonna cry some more." [/quote] ⠀
Gameplay: 10 (Amazing Grappling mechanics and good physics.)
Story: 9⠀(You might cry. Go in blind.)                                          ⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
Graphics: 10 (Sanabi has beautiful pixel art.)
Music: 9       ⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
Length: 8-12 hours (Depends on your skill level.)                                        ⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
Difficulty: Easy to Very Hard (If you are playing on the lowest setting you can't die.)
Value: $13. Worth it! (A friend gifted me the game.)
Replay Value: Similar to Celeste if you enjoy the mechanics you'll probably replay the game.

[h3][b][i]Greetings Nostalgic Travelers,[/i][/b][/h3]

⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⡤⢾⢯⠫⣽⡞⡍⠿⢴⡤⣤⢤⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⡠⣊⣌⡌⢮⡜⡕⠮⢑⡈⠸⠗⢐⣀⠡⣦  
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⡼⣷⡁⡞⠣⢅⡐⡡⢒⢤⡀⢀⢿⡤⠑⣨⡨ ⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⡅⡪⣜⡫⢃⡠⠈⠠⡑⢑⠁⠔⢀⣷⣦⢐⠸ 
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠠⣯⢑⢱⣇⠰⡕⢆⢄⡄⠐⠀⢀⣾⣿⣿⣿⣗⠃ 
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢠⢏⠀⠐⠅⢈⢑⠯⠩⠀⣁⡪⠈⣗⠘⢈⣿⢟⠀  
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⠈⣘⡀⢆⠀⢱⢄⢅⢱⠈⣿⣶⣽⠀⡇⣿⠂⠀   
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⡇⢰⢎⠀⠂⠨⣷⡳⢓⠀⠈⣿⣿⣁⢍⣽⠀⠀  
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠸⠳⠑⣾⡑⣿⣿⡕⢐⠀⠀⢿⣿⡁⣢⠈⠀⠀  
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠸⠌⢱⣿⣇⢿⣿⢕⠈⡄⠀⠰⡀⢟⡵⠀⠀⠀   
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠨⣼⣿⣿⠀⡈⢮⢇⡠⢂⠈⠙⢿⠅⠀⠀⠀   ⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⣿⠄⣿⣦⠈⢈⡪⠧⠚⠋⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣴⡿⠱⣿⢕⢸⣿⠀⠺⣿⠅⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⣠⣾⣿⢽⢎⠂⠑⠱⠧⠀⣿⣿⣶⣿⠂⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⣤⣾⣏⡻⣎⠻⠷⢛⣿⣵⠀⠀⢿⣿⣿⣿⠢⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠨⣿⣿⣿⣧⠘⢜⡇⢷⠽⣿⣿⣤⣈⣿⣿⣿⣆⠀⠪⣿⣀⠀⠀
⠀⠛⠻⣿⣿⣷⡱⠜⢪⡕⢻⠩⡿⣿⣿⣷⣿⣿⣿⡀⠘⣿⣷⢄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⢻⣿⣿⡝⠌⠕⢧⢆⠀⡳⣟⢿⣿⣿⣿⡯⣦⠈⠿⡿⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⣿⣿⡄⢛⡁⢸⠀⠈⠢⠙⠶⣽⣯⣿⣿⣵⣂⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⣿⣿⡄⡇⠪⣧⡢⠈⢀⣄⣀⢈⠿⢷⡿⢿⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢿⣿⡷⠇⢈⢿⣽⡤⠁⢙⠿⣦⣔⡺⣿⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢿⣿⣷⢂⡈⠈⢟⣟⢺⣴⣧⣶⣿⠃⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⠙⠃⠃⠘⠑⠊⠐⠊⠉⠉⠑⠂⠀⠀

Sanabi is a pixel art action platformer with smooth fluid movement controls. If you have ever mastered games in the past like Sonic The Hedgehog for the Genesis, you will feel a lot of satisfaction as you quickly progress through each stage section and master the simple to learn, but hard to master grappling hook mechanic. The grappling hook is the main mechanic and focus in Sanabi. As you get better at the controls the more freedom you will have while traversing the stages which is extremely satisfying.

If you love older platformers like Sonic and Mario this is a must play for you. I can't stress how good the grappling mechanic is. Only time will tell but this will potentially be a classic in the years to come.


⠀
An outstanding experience. Rarely do I go on about a game without talking a bit of smack for fun beforehand, but I cannot with SANABI. I just completed the EARLY ACCESS on it's hardest difficulty (Die from one hit) thinking I could handle it. And while I did make it through, it was harder than even Katana Zero.

Gameplay - 10/10. This game not only plays smoothly, especially when you get a hang of it, but it makes you look cool while doing so. Maybe it's my appeal towards hookshots but man oh man, was it fun. Platformers are generally not my thing, but SANABI is a whole new level that allows you to move in ways most platformers wouldn't and in an intuitive manner. Though some of the bosses (JUSTICE) were extremely difficult, the frustration never fully seeped in cause of the learning experience behind it.

Story - 8/10 - I cannot fully evaluate the story to be fair, cause the reality is, it's not finished quite yet. But the story is entertaining. Maybe it's cause I voice acted over the characters speaking, but it brought in intensity. The characters were likable to say the least. Honestly, if they need a voice actor, I hope I can be the one who does it for the main (Unnamed?) character. (I legitimately voice acted the whole game for each character too) The game provides charm and a bit of something else to it that really brings out the environment. One thing I will state for the benefit of the developer though.
(THERE ARE SOME GRAMMATICAL ERRORS! I WISH I SAVED A SCREEN SHOT OF EACH ONE! I APOLOGIZE! THERE WERE ABOUT 3!)

Graphics/Art Style - 10/10 - This one's a bit of a tricky situation. Maybe it's my appeal to pixel art, but the animations really emphasize on making the game feel what it is. As mentioned before, the game play makes you look cool, but the animations themselves are part of the reason why. From flipping into the air, to landing on a wall in specific ways. This game provides a lot and puts heart into it that I cannot deny.

Music - 6/10 - Maybe it's because I'm picky as a musician, but the music didn't exactly WOW me compared to everything else in the game. It wasn't bad, just not mind blowing. Though I will say this much, it did it's job well. It provided to each environment in the correct tone. Though, there was a bit to be desired from it.

Overall - 10/10 - While I may dismiss some aspects of the game, I'm not going to just deteriorate my overall score. The game play more than satisfied what I've wanted out of a game in a long time. It provided a challenge that was fabulous and an intensity that most games don't in this day and age. A fantastic game that I cannot wait to finish in the future.
MFW I swing into a red zone on legendary for the two millionth time.
gamer girl called me sus great game 10 / 10 would spider man again
(I played the full game now; I'm changing this review to positive and will write more details later. The rest of the message is the old review)

-----

(Keep in mind this review was written back in Early Access; I still need to revisit the game to give it a more fair rating and review)

I can't, with a light conscience, recommend this game as it is right now, as much as I want to.
Keep in mind that the game is in early access, and a lot of what I'll be saying might change for the better; this is exactly why I'm writing this review.

First, let's start with the negatives:
(-) The cutscenes and dialogues are too frequent, and break the pacing of the game quite a lot. There are dozens of very long cutscenes, many of which don't seem to be necessary.
(-) The dialogues have several problems; even in the intro sequence, it's possible to spot moments where text boxes don't seem to match the context, or dialogues don't make sense, at least in English.
(-) The translation is incorrect or inaccurate, which adds to the dialogue being bad.
(-) The dialogue goes TOO FAST during action sequences. I think dialogue during action sequences is great, but having it be unreadable is just frustrating and not fun; I had to pause during my playthrough during these dialogues, when I cared about it.
(-) The story is intriguing, which makes this all the more frustrating; you really want to take the game seriously, but these problems make it so that it's hard to.
(-) The game doesn't really explain to you about clockwise and counter-clockwise movement with the dash. Although players will eventually figure it out, I think with the amount of tutorials, the game could have told me that as well.
(-) There was some untranslated Korean text in a few cutscenes. It's understandable with the scenery, but I think it would do good just to have some subtitles, you know?
(-) Some areas seem very empty or incomplete, bland, with nothing new. I think these would be a good opportunity for the game to put some of the exceeding dialogue, instead of cramming all of it into a million cutscenes. Namely, I can see the "plan" sequences working out during these more empty parts.
(-) There were some opportunities lost with gameplay. I think this would be a perfect game to play with more momentum mechanics and bunny hopping. Making that easier and accessible for the player would be a good idea. Instead, touching the ground while attached to a hook just makes you lose all momentum. Also, retracting to your hook does not make you keep your speed when you cancel the retraction, and I think that's a big lost opportunity.
(-) The parts with throwing the enemies into the laser just felt a lot more boring than the idea sounded like.
(-) There are no secrets and no real hidden easter eggs or anything like that. At least none that I could find. I feel like this game would greatly benefit from having several collectibles and hidden areas, to explore everything you can do with the tech of the hook.
( ? ) This might be just me, but I didn't understand health and checkpoints very well. I've finished the game in about 3 hours or so, on hard mode, and had about 2 or 3 deaths; but I thought I was supposed to die after 2 hits? It semeed like I had 4 health instead, despite playing on "hard", where I was supposed to die in 2 hits.

Now let's talk about the good points:
(+) The gameplay is fluid and satisfying; it's a character that is "fun to play as". The hook movement just works, and having a game based solely on that is a good plus.
(+) The artstyle is beautiful; it reminds me of Katana Zero a lot. There is even a Katana Zero reference inside the game (time samurai, lmao)
(+) Add this to having several animations for the characters. Characters have many different poses and expressions, and it seems like it never ends. Specially, Mari and the Daughter were really adorable during the cutscenes.
(+) The screen transitions feel smooth! I like that a lot in the game.
(+) It has a good sense of humor in the dialogue. I feel like some jokes drag on for too long, but in general, it's likeable and I did laugh a few times.
(+) The music is good! Not phenomenal, but it was nice to listen to.
(+) The story is intriguing, and it did make me a bit emotional. Although the beginning is so positive and wholesome, that you know exactly what's going to happen after.


Overall, this game needs little to be an amazing game, but it's important to let devs know about the problems with it.
As the game keeps getting updated, I'll keep playing it, and I'll update my review when I can and when I think the game is in a better state.

If you want to try it out yourself to see what I'm talking about, and perhaps just feel that sick gameplay, I do recommend the game; I just can't tell anyone to try playing this game for a fun and enjoyable experience.
[b]Katana ZERO + Spider-Man = Sanabi[/b]

Plays [i]GREAT[/i] on Steam Deck, after 2 hours at time of review I had zero issues with the game; despite the warning that it sometimes shows MKB controls I had no such problems. The story is good, the setting looks amazing, it runs smoothly, plays smoothly, has fast fun action in a cyberpunk setting, and the only complaint is [i]how dare you make me feel things![/i] 

I could tell you more about the story or the gameplay, but that's what the Steam Page is for, I love the grappling hook mechanic; it's smooth, and when you hit it just right you feel [i]awesome[/i]. 

There is a slight resolution issue where the top part of the screen is black, as though it's on widescreen mode, but the bottom of the screen is just fine. It's weird, it doesn't fix regardless of resolution setting, but it doesn't bug me as much as it might bug other people. The fact I can't remove the version number from the top left of the screen bugs me more than the letterbox resolution issue. 

Overall, it's a great time and I'm having a lot of fun with it, it's honestly the sole reason I dislike Early Access games: I know I'm going to reach the end of the content and have to wait for more without getting the whole game and the story I'm so far very invested in.

** Edited Review Below **

As of 10/08/23 I've now played a near total 6 hours of the game and completed all the EA content. I need more, I want more. Hopefully I don't have to wait too long for the finished product but as of right now it's a fun game with minimal combat, decent story, fun characters. You could probably speedrun the content in an hour, the story itself is probably 4-5 hours itself as long as you don't die often, which admittedly I did.

No glitches, no bugs, the game says use MKB but again, zero issues on Steam Deck. The control map in the settings does show MKB controls which is probably where the Steam Deck verification "Playable" label comes from, but I made no adjustments to the settings.

Full recommendation, if you liked Katana Zero and/or grappling hook/swinigng mechanics this is the easiest recommendation of my life.
[h1]Check out my 60 sec review:[/h1]
https://youtu.be/fJpT3eE8mnY

I will make a full gameplay also!

[h1]Short Version Review:[/h1]:
Sanabi is a dystopian action-plataformer.
Note: I’m reviewing the early access version.

Freaturing a legendary retired veteran that is seeking revenge against SANABI for what it has done to him!
You will be dodging bullets, creating havoc and bringing destruction to your enemies!

You will also meet a very cute hacker, ops, expert intelligence acquisitionist, named Mari.
She will help you out in this chaotic and corrupted world

The [b]sound design[/b] is superb

The [b]gameplay and controls[/b] are fluid and responsive

The [b]art design[/b] is gorgeous

The [b]characters[/b] are memorable and very charismatic

The story is very interesting, after all, it is a dystopian universe
You will try to figure out what the heck is happening around you in this very aggressive universe, where everything is trying to kill you

The English translations is good enough, but some scenery background and drawings are not fully translated yet
I could use some more portraits when the characters where talking, but, unfortunately, the portrait section is limited to some sparse moments

[b]Game length[/b]:
In its actual early access patch (06.22.2022 - mm.dd.yyyy), I took [b]3h50min[/b] from the beginning until the LAST released chapter ([b]**IT IS NOT the full game**[/b]).
[b]It may vary[/b] depending on how good you are in plataforming and with the mechanics of the game, and, of course, if you skip or not the dialogues.

The Game Final Score is Nine out of ten
"이번엔.. 아빠 연주 괜찮았지?"
Though I've only played for around 2 hours, I've gone through the entire game. There is a good amount of content here for what it is and more to come. Clearly inspired by Katana Zero, this game focuses much harder on the movement aspect of these games to great effect. Highly recommend the pick up if you are looking for something similar. 

There are some complaints I have though, the main one being polish. While this game looks and plays great, there are some things that become apparent when you start playing. The settings don't reset when reloading the game. Some of the grammar in the dialog is messed up, probably an easy fix. Your grappling hook reel-in is tied to the up arrow, however if you put jump on the up arrow as I do in my platformers, it can cause some annoying movement, reeling in when you meant to jump and continue your momentum. Also speed-run mode, probably what will be the main draw for games like this, still displays cutscenes and dialog and can even bug out to the point of turning the screen completely black. This is early access though and I expect that these bugs and features will be ironed out for the final release.

As for the rest of it? Movement is smooth and flowing when the level allows for it, you can get REALLY fast here. Some of the levels are worse than others, requiring you to stop and wait for something before continuing on. Mostly a personal gripe, I like flowing and continuous movement in my games. And the OST, it slaps. Where can I find this music, I need it.

Overall: 7/10 Very solid platformer with a good story and crisp movement. Some things need tuning but when the game is released, I suspect this will be an 8-9/10. Easily worth the money.
"THANK YOU FOR PLAYING EARLY ACCESS" FFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUUUUUC
First and foremost, I need to say if you are somebody who has played purely from the demo and just picked up wherever your save file left off at, I strongly encourage you to scrap it and restart. There were a variety of wonderful touch ups and additions added to the beginning which, while not essential to view, are fun and can add nicely to some subtle moments. And who are we kidding this game is succinct and lovely to play through any number of times for the movement alone. Now to the actual review:


I have been invested in this game prior to its release, having played on the original demo available and the betas available at the given time, the game even then was passionate and filled with heart that greatly excited me for its final release. To my surprise, when it did actually release I already had access to the game, presuming it was an error or a final demo update I played through immediately.

Much to my surprise I had received the full game for free, at this point I'm still not sure if this was an error due to me having the demo and beta in my library or intentional on the developers part for the final release. This aside, I seldom feel obligated to comment on anything, but I was genuinely taken aback by this game having been granted the chance to play through it fully completed now. 

The art and style was phenomenal and only grew stronger beyond the already released demo section. The integration of mechanics was tied nicely often with story beats and transitioned seamlessly into teaching applications of the mechanics directly in the platforming promoting alternate methods of using some of them. The platforming also encouraged creative problem solving for those looking for more unconventional solutions or speed running advantages. I'm avoiding talking on the story as it is incredibly well done for the tale it wishes to tell, and I am no one to spoil that. What I will say on it is that it is well structured in the sense the player is only as aware as they choose to be; which I think perfectly builds into the aesthetic and narrative itself. The games story delivers where it matters most, being heartfelt, meaningful, and while not getting so broad as to water down its core story. All in all, I loved this game, it vindicates the player and makes actions feel worth it even more so by that ending.

For nitpicks, most of my issues are realistically non-issues, and more so quality of life gripes(3).
-In the English translation specifically there are a variety of grammatical errors, however none are overly detrimental to the moment or the overall understanding of what's going on. 
-There are a few issues in terms of optimization at this current point, the amount of assets present seems to be delaying the rate of level loading times which can lead to longer black screen load times. While load screens aren't entirely a bad thing, these also apply to falling off the map in which your speed run timer will keep running, which presents some issues.. 
-The last is a more specific issue for those who played the demo. If you had a save file that had unlocked Legendary at that time period and was using it, upon beginning the full game from where you left off you were locked to that state and unable to change due to Legendary being an unlock feature, which required a full game restart to be able to change it. Given how this would be difficult to adjust I understand how this came to be a bug and may be helpful to simply make a toggle if the game reads the save as having that setting enabled prior to the unlock to allow for the player to adjust down to an appropriate play level to still earn the Legendary mode.

TLDR; Game good, very pretty, heartfelt story, chain arm go zoom, and actually play from beginning. I wish the team the best, thank you for your wonderful game.
10/10!!!!
I think this game is awesome!

The Pixel Art is absolutely STUNNING 
(reminding me of the pixel art in "Katana Zero" BUT BETTER) 
and it is the BEST I HAVE EVER SEEN a game utilise the art style!

The Grapple-Hook Movement based gameplay is also extremely fun and different, with unique layouts in each area making each new level always feel fresh.

I love the charm and writing of the characters and story!!! 
The devs show true passion in this product, 
also they put in so many extra unnecessary details such as references to countless other games hiding away in the background.

also there were a few really cool badass moments 
and there were also some parts which legitimately terrified me lol XD

anyway I would highly recommend to people who...
hell I'd highly recommend this to anyone!

As of writing this the game is still in early access and I can't wait for the rest to come out!
Truly an incredible game.

Gameplay was a blast, music was good, art style was incredible and the animations of the characters surprised me with how good it was and the story is just so good..
[h1]SANNABI The Revenant[/h1]

Let the anguish take control and swing for the fences. SANNABI The Revenant launches you over, under, and across the dystopian future with an agonizing vengeance. I’ve really fallen in love with the platformers recently published by Neowiz, such as Metal Unit and Skul: The Hero Slayer, which I had the pleasure to review. So when I caught wind of this project, developed by Wonder Potion, my heart leapt with anticipation. I had no idea what I was getting myself into.

You are a retired veteran soldier, who has gone away from the violence to a quiet life with your young daughter. Being a father is amazing, and the memories you create with your daughter are priceless. Life is bliss. Until you get a visit out of nowhere from someone in your past… who brings a pain that will soon become your driving force.

SANNABI is a 2D action-platformer, but not like any other I remember playing. So far, in this demo version of the game, the enemies aren’t actually your main concern, the environment is. Not with spewing balls of lava or with bodies of water to drown in, but just by being itself. Sure, there are a few enemies here and there that you need to take care of, but I found myself being killed by the landscape I was trying to latch onto (or land on) more often than not.

This introduces the most difficult aspect of the game for me: the platforming is done mostly by swinging. Your chain-hook prosthetic arm gives you the ability to latch on to most of the surfaces from a distance, so you’ll use it to literally fly across the screen. Some of the objects you latch onto will let you redirect yourself off of them, giving it a controllable pinball feel.

Swinging from one platform to the next sounds serene and calming, right? Not in SANNABI. This game takes the concept, represented in my mind most by a friendly neighborhood kid in a red and blue jumpsuit, and smashes it into a mixer with bolts of body-jolting electricity and break-neck speed. Which is where the difficulty comes in. Most times I was swinging so fast I had hardly enough (if any at all) time to react and shoot my chain-hook at the next ledge. And if that wasn’t difficult enough, some of the surfaces are too sheer to grab onto, or even electrocuted. Partner this with insta-deaths when touching electricity, and a very low threshold to take damage from enemies, and this is one of the more difficult games to get the hang of in recent memory.

SANNABI takes place in MAGO. The city of MAGO is a dark, neon-lit technological metropolis set in a retro graphics aesthetic. From what you recall, the city was run by a criminal faction when you were an active soldier. in the time I spent on this game, I felt enveloped by the dark atmosphere, like a vigilante launching myself over buildings in a permanent nightfall. The music was very “cyber-esque” and set the perfect backdrop to the stage.

SANNABI was a really fun experience. This small taste of the story has me excitedly anticipating the full release of the game. However, the action and mechanics applied were extremely difficult to wrap my fingers around. I’ve never been good with fast paced games on the keyboard, because my fingers usually move off of the keys due to excitement. This problem came out in full force as I played through this demo. The ability to play with a controller is there, but it only made things even more difficult. It uses the same controls to move your character as it does to aim your chain-arm. The option to customize the configuration would make the experience a million times better. This being considered, though, I still really enjoyed this experience, and look forward to more. I’m hyped to swing for the fences in the full game.
It is frustrating how this game is not more popular, I genuinely am shocked to how fun this game feels and the story telling alongside the characters are very well made! 100% recommend from me I cannot wait for more.
I hoped it would have been harder, but still an awesome adventure with a lot of surprise intrigue and a touching ending. Some awkward translation to English, but still excellent writing. Pretty securely in my top 5 of the year, if not top 3.
The second game that ever made me cry
[h1] We are owls that never cry. And tigers that don't leave foot prints. [/h1]

but after the ending I'm like 

[h1] We are owls that cry like a babies. Tigers that leaves tear marks. [/h1]

10/10 must play.
Only problem is dialogues and its speed. It really irritated me to read them.
I'm not crying, you are crying... S-SHUT UP!
SANABI has fantastic physics, great graphics and art style, fun story, and it runs amazingly well on my 2016 potato PC.
[h1]Sanabi[/h1]
Cool dramatic game with elements of humor, gameplay is easy [i](but not on bosses)[/i]. Art style is incredible and detailed! Soundtrack is just okay but some extremely clingy ones!
Better than spiderman
Fun game, great mechanics. A combination of Bionic Commando and Katana Zero.

The one issue I have so far: the story bits are way to much, interrupting the gameplay bits far more than they should. Most of the dialogue can be cut down significantly to tell the same story with impact. I hope this is actually fixed. I played far less game and saw far more dialogue than necessary.
For me, Sanabi is one of the rare games that can make the player feel emotions while playing. It made me feel sometimes happy, sometimes sad, sometimes frightened, and sometimes made me laugh.

Gameplay-wise, the levels are not too hard but still fun. Mechanics are easy to understand. Movement is smooth and feels good

I have only one complaint. It's not anything serious but I think the death animation could be better. The game is currently at early access so I'm sure this will be fixed in the future. 

If you like similar games to Sanabi I highly recommend playing
Genuinely phenomenal, took what made Katana Zero amazing and managed to make it better
An absolutely amazing game, the movement, combat, story everything is top tier.
Awesome game, super in depth movement mechanics. Can be a bit cutscene heavy early on, but the story is incredible so not a negative for me. If you tend to skip story in games, youll get a lot less out of this game than I did.
Do you like K-Dramas but wish they had more grappling hook action and cyberpunk aesthetics? This is the game for you. My nomination for Best Game You Suck at but would also recommend nominating for Outstanding Story-Rich Game and Best Soundtrack.
I absolutely love the story and the platforming in this early access. I just love the comedic moments mari show in the sooner stages. But I just dont like it when the main character has flashbacks... It makes me want to die inside
Still think that this is good as Katana Zero!
This stupid game made me cry
Spiderman Katana Zero
I don't want to compare this game to Katana Zero too much because it deserves to be its own thing, but as someone who very much enjoyed Katana Zero, this game is great. 

Soundtrack slaps, story is good, and gameplay is very fun.
The game has really nice controlls(even if you play with a controller). The story by far is good and I believe it will get even better when it's finished. If you liked katana zero, you are going to like this game too.
So after finally playing the full release I can't be more happy with having supported this game. Honestly even the frustrating bits and rage just fully melted away after the ending and I don't have any regrets. I'm grateful to have been able to see this game finished and to have played this beautiful story. Thank you for the experience. From the wonderful platforming, to the wonderful story. I hope many more people can find the enjoyment I have had through this game.
This. Looks. AMAZING. And the musics is Superb.
This game is well made and the game's pretty entertaining for what's there.
sadly is under-rated
This is a great game, 10/10, the problem is, at least for me
when you go to the left your robotic arm automatically changes direction(not really a gameplay thing but its just too painful to watch)
awesome game, would play it again
to meny women this is unrealistic
We are owls that never cry.... T_T
No we very much do!! T_T
playing this game on very hard when its your first time playing is fucking awesome
98/100
I know the reason why you're here because it looks like Katana Zero alternative while the sequel is not out yet. Don't worry, that was also the reason why I bought this game. But I tell you this, Sanabi is a completely different beast. Not just a copy-cat but a completely great game of itself.

The sound track is great, the environment is fantastic, the platforming and the mechanics are really fun to play. But what impress me a lot was the animation and the story. It is one of the best game I've ever played. The end gave me a little sobby eyes because of how touching the story was.

 Definitely a recommended game.
While not a bad game, there is a large amount of story and cut-scenes that break the flow of game play a lot. I think for every 5-10 minutes of actual game play there is about 5- 15 minutes of story or slow walking segments where exposition happens. This may not turn off all players but for me personally the story here was not that engaging or interesting. I began skipping the cut-scenes which thankfully you are able to do. Overall the game is fun but the constant story trying to break you out of the game ruins the pacing if it does not capture your interest. 

Probably best to wait for a sale.
The game's story goes from 0 to 100, really fucking fast, and and it's the highlight of the game, by far. Characters are interesting, and it does have some funny moments here and there for what I would describe overall as a pretty dark and dystopian atmosphere. The mystery that's going on isn't cut and dry, so you're kept guessing what's going on. The only "twist" that you could see coming from a mile away is essentially having to go through this game's version of the Mines of Moria. Only small nitpicks are that the game does have a few small typos here and there, and some world building gets left out. One example being when the main characters mention that the government says some research is banned and illegal, and I'm sitting here wondering, "Why is it illegal? Was there some event that led to it being made illegal?" But again, nitpicks.

My only gripes are that the main mechanic of the grappling arm doesn't control very well in some places, the platforming can be really tight in some areas, and it makes it difficult to tell how you're supposed to progress through some areas, as in, "where am I supposed to go? I can't see anything on the screen to latch onto". For context, I'm playing with a controller here, so maybe it's less finicky with a keyboard and mouse? Additionally, there are times that it feels like the invincibility frames after getting hit are way too short, and I get that it's meant as a recovery mechanic, but when some random platform goes into a danger zone, you're knocked off, and some bullet randomly hits you and you get hit again by the danger zone...it gets kind of tiresome. I will say, I wish there was a type of general purpose dodge sometimes, that doesn't involve getting hit.

Combat's pretty decent, the normal mooks aren't too much trouble and it's insanely fun to zip around the map killing enemies. That is, until this one enemy starts showing up partway through chapter 2, and turns some fights into less of a combat encounter, and more of a puzzle fight, and not in a good way. Having to maneuver enemies into certain positions gets really annoying, but outside of that section, that particular enemy did not reappear in chapter 3, which is the furthest you can go at the time of review.

Boss fights on the other hand are much more entertaining, with a few small hiccups here and there for some fights. The only downside I can say is that there's no checkpoint system for any of them, so if you die at any point, you're starting at the beginning of the fight once again. It's a pro for some people, a con for others. It's not that bad for the first boss since it's not the longest boss fight in the world, but it becomes a pain for the second, especially considering how many times you need to knock them down, and the "process" to knock them down...

Overall, the game's pretty entertaining for what's there, and I'm pretty invested into the story at this point, so I'm really interested to see where it goes.
The gameplay portions feel short but the story makes up so strongly for it. 10/10
Very good game, suffers from pacing issues throughout and a weird difficulty spike but the narrative payoff in the last third is worth every bit of it. Maybe one of my favourite last thirds in any indie game I've played so far. Great pixel art, a kick-ass synth soundtrack and fun gameplay, basically Katana ZERO with a grappling hook.
I recommend

[h1] 8.5/10 [/h1]
I cried. I've never done that for a game before but, God damn it, [u]SANABI[/u] perfectly punched me in the God damn heart and wrung me dry of tears. 

Basically, think if a fan of [u]Katana Zero[/u] wanted to make their own [u]Bionic Commando[/u] game; you have a hookshot arm that's extremely fun to use and that's all compounded by a story of incredible twists and turns.

The localisation kind of sucks, which undermines some of the more emotional moments and makes certain logistics throughout the story threatening to the immersion, but the story beats are all solid.

I just think the game lacks something at the end: [spoiler]a proper final boss fight. After the final cutscene before the credits, I thought it would've been nice to put everything we've learned into one final adventure and put a stop to the nuclear reactor THROUGH GAMEPLAY. It would've capped off the emotional climax of that cutscene and provided us with a great final challenge. As is, the game just kind of sort of ends after we've run through every level again and it's a bit anticlimactic.[/spoiler]

All in all, absolutely sublime. Thrilling and exciting to play, story strikes you where it hurts. Play it.
You know what most of the best platformers don't have? A good story. This one is different (ಥ◡ಥ)
wow. WOW. WHAT. A. GAME. What a story. Hats off.
PLAY THIS GAME- PLAY  IT-
 
I can't recommend this game enough. It's beautiful, the story blew me away, and most importantly, I don't know if I've experienced smoother gameplay. It can be casual or challenging, depending on your preference. For the price, it's worth 5 times more to me. Awesome game.
PLAY IF:
   - You enjoy 2D platformers similar to Katana Zero or (somewhat) the gameplay loop of Hotline Miami.
   - You are willing to withstand occasional nonsense level design/bugs.
    ---------------    
This is quite possibly the most conflicted I have ever felt completing a video game. This game's highs are jubilant, featuring some of the most freeing movement in a 2D platformer and a story that subverts one's expectations in a way that feels earned and powerful rather than a cheap plot point like many lesser stories.
Inversely, however, this game inspired such frustration within me that I had not previously thought possible, with the game's targeting system with the hook and the late-game charging move. (I am aware that there is a setting for aim-assist for the hook, but I had problems both with it on and off.) I also encountered several bugs during the final boss fight in which the boss would freeze in an idle pose with full invincibility. (In hindsight, I believe this was caused by resetting to last checkpoint on the frame she was transitioning from or to a move) This game was also originally written in Korean, as while it is very well localized, the translation itself features some minor errors and, more importantly, many vague sentences that make it unclear what exactly is happening.
This game has undeniable faults, but I still recommend it to anyone who enjoys intense 2D platformers or, thanks to the game's many difficulty options, anyone who would be interested by a heartstrings-pulling story. I would also highly recommend playing on keyboard and mouse, as despite the unwieldy keybindings, you may edit them as you choose and aiming the hook is significantly more satisfying. 
...Yeah, I think that about covers it.
This is a fast paced action platformer. People who love games with a good story will love this one.

It speaks for itself that speedrunners will be satisfied also. The movement and controls work very fluent. The game is made to play with a keyboard and a mouse. 

Also the level art style and the musice are nice done.

Here is my first gameplay. You will see that there is around 50/50 story and gameplay:  https://youtu.be/GaDc7T1MvqM


Grapple deez nuts
Innocence is a sin.......
This shit got me fucked up
10/10 game.

I don't even like platformers, but the controls are great. The story is great. The artstyle is great. And the soundtrack is amazing.
Very promising grappling hook platformer with roughly 2-3 hours worth of story mode gameplay right now.
The grapple mechanics are fun and well built upon.

Story is intriguing enough but it's quite wordy and cutscenes happen a bit too frequently. Unlike Katana Zero, there is no player input or dialogue options during cinematics. The cutscenes themselves are a lot of fun however, with lots of small animations for both the characters and the environments.

Pixel art is obviously fantastic, particularly the background art and aforementioned character animations. Music is fitting but not very memorable.
I think its an amazing game with a great story. Not much to say regarding the mechanics since its pretty simple, but its fun to swing around and try to go as fast as I can. The story was interesting, but some parts were pretty predictable after a while. I still teared up at the end though :')
Its worth the buy and I'd recommend playing with mouse and keyboard instead of a controller
came for the cool grappling hook game.
left a sobbing mess.
10/10 would cry again
Excellent characters mixed with perfect game-play. I played for an hour and when I stopped the only thing on my mind was getting back in. I was genuinely mad when I hit the end of the early access portion because I just want to keep playing. 10/10
THIS IS WRITTEN IN BOTH TRADITIONAL CHINESE AND ENGLISH!!!!


[h1] SANABI, A GAME THAT WON'T DISAPPOINT YOU  [/h1]

SANABI, describe with one sentence: father swing through the city, seek revenge for his daughter. 

That sounds pretty cliche, isn't it? That's what I originally thought, too, but it's more than that,
the plot is [b]GOOD[/b], I'm definitely not a crier, I even figured out what the end might be , so I thought I'm well prepared for it, but in reality, when the time has come, and the music played, the only thing I can do is to squeeze my face so hard to try not to cry.

This game comes with a price that similar to a movie ticket, but it will give you the emotion of multiple great movies, with the cozy of being at home, snuggle in a blanket, drinking hot chocolate and enjoy killing the enemy at first, but might need multiple bags of tissue and a therapy later.

10/10, makes me want a cute daughter.









[h1]THE FOLLOWING CONTAINS MAJOR SPOILER!![/h1]
YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED


[h3]THE WEIGHT OF DEATH[/h3]

[spoiler]
I'm very very sad when the father has to die for his daughter, especially the father just remembered how to play the harmonica, and with that, Mari accept our main character, is indeed her father, not a modified copy of her father.

What a touching moment, but without waiting us to finishes wiping our tear, the game continue to make us cry more, because the father has to dies,why the father has to die? 
For Kim Mari and we to growth, to move on, whether as a daughter, or as a player.

Everyone is someone else's child, this is probably why I'm move so much by this moment, everyone express their feelings by a different way, so there no need to tell your parents that you love them, you can express this by action, do everything you can before you regret, because when the regret has come, besides move on, the only thing you can do is regret.

[b][u] With every hello comes a goodbye, if the end comes for everyone exactly the same, what's really important, is how we get there[/u][/b]
[/spoiler]

THE BAD ENDING

[spoiler]
I'm not a religious person, but I just think this is the best way to describe this.

the metaphor of heaven or hell in the game is quite obvious, going up the stair, light, heaven; going down, dark, hell. But why heaven is to know the truth? isn't that just more suffering? Because the Pearly gates should be a narrow door, without suffering there would no happiness. And the hell is to living in the lies, without suffering, without happiness.

“Now I have neither happiness nor unhappiness.

Everything passes.

That is the one and only thing that I have thought resembled a truth in the society of human beings where I have dwelled up to now as in a burning hell.

Everything passes.”― Osamu Dazai, No Longer Human

[/spoiler]







[h1]SANABI，瑕不掩瑜的神作[/h1]
SANABI，用一句話形容，就是[b]老父親一邊在大城市裡盪鞦韆，一邊為女兒復仇[/b]的故事。
聽上去是個老套的復仇劇，不得不說，這遊戲在一開始時也給我差不多的感覺，一款有著老套劇情的平台動作遊戲，甚至在關卡設計方面有著幾個讓我感到有點高血壓的缺點，但那些缺點可以一筆勾銷，就因為SANABI的優秀劇情。我自認是一個淚點非常高的人，甚至在結局前我已經大概知道劇情會怎麼演了，但是遊戲尾聲我還是強忍著眼淚在看劇情的，伏筆以及玩家的情緒，在優秀的音樂下一同被引爆。這款遊戲用大概一張電影票的價格，可以給你超過一場電影的感動，10/10神作，讓我也想要一個可愛女兒了。

但遊戲在翻譯上有幾處讓人覺得有問題的部分，我看英文評論也有人提到，或許有些是劇情需求? 但若想體驗到真真正正100%的遊戲文本可能得要會韓文了。





[h1]
以下含非常大的據透，請酌量攝取。
[/h1]


[h3]死亡的重量[/h3]
[spoiler]
我非常不捨主角在最後為了女兒犧牲，尤其是才剛吹完口琴，父女相認，玩家可能還在感動的一把眼淚一把鼻涕的時候，主角卻得死，但同時在心裡深處也曉得這個死在劇情上是必須的，相比奇怪的喬爾夫球，主角的死亡被賦予了一個重要的意義:讓瑪莉跟玩家一起放下主角，繼續向前邁進。 也是主角作為一個父親最後能為女兒做的事。
但是我還是好想看到父女一起回家，不過正如遊戲裡提到的，天下沒有不散的筵席，重要的是，我們是怎麼走到這個結局的。
[/spoiler]

說說壞結局的部分，
[spoiler]
在抉擇時那個天堂與地獄的隱喻挺明顯的，為什麼天堂會是知道真相？因為天國之門應當要是個窄門，只有願意承受苦難的人才能得到救贖；而地獄則是沉溺在謊言之中，[u]同樣的事日日反覆， 只需遵循與昨日相同的慣例。 倘若避免大喜大悲， 徹骨的悲傷便不會到來。 前方路遇擋路之石， 蟾蜍都會繞路而行。[/u]----人間失格 。

遊戲給予這個抉擇之時，也是金瑪莉做出決定的時候，自己復活了被改造的父親人格副本，跟著他行動，在過程中不斷地給各種提示，從塗鴉到叫他吹口琴，也不斷的失望，最後做出決定:這個機器人已經不是我父親了。 
所以告訴主角，SANABI就在地下室，而自己則前去處理反應爐，趁自己還記得父親時死去。

[/spoiler]
WOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO
First Lies of P, now this. Korean game dev is looking REALLY good this year.
awesome linear game! love the atmosphere and the characters.
Also perfect on steam deck
AVOID | LACKING | MAYBE | WORTHWHILE | [b][u]COMPELLING[/u][/b] | UNMISSABLE

SANABI is a fast-paced action-adventure platformer that has a strong narrative backing it. There was much more story than I was expecting, with probably 1/4 of the time playing being plot-driven/narrative-based. While I wish there was less story than this, that's mainly because of how the main gameplay works - as I said, it's fast-paced and the movement feels super smooth, so it can be a bit jarring to go from that to a discussion between characters. Ultimately, I think the devs delivered this juxtaposition as well as they could with an engaging storyline to boot. Aside from that, the only other thing I wish was different is that in some areas, hitting terrain that hurts you (primarily areas with red lasers), you can easily get stun-locked into dying. It's not a big deal given save points are frequent, but there were several times I hit a laser and knew I would have to wait for it to hit me three more times so I could die and start over instead of having the chance to reposition myself (which would be more skill-expressive, IMO) and carry on.

SANABI has a little bit of everything going for it - action, adventure, platforming, combat, a relevant storyline, and a fantastic soundtrack to accompany it all. If you dig the look of the game and want something that simply feels great to play, I recommend this title.
My personal GOTY of 2024, and the year only started, i haven't been this emotional since watching the ending of Stein's;Gate.

Must Play.
Incredible, fast and fun gameplay, well written story
Brilliant graphics, expressive characters, and a heartwarming plot about father and daughter, packed with a slick grappling hook platformer with a banger soundtrack.
It good
Every moment in Sanabi is narrative gold. I have not before played a game that is so purposeful in its gameplay and story choices. I cherished every minute, every level, every character I met with. This is a title you need to pick up this year.
Absolutely excellent story, made three grown men cry.
It's a terrible day for rain...
Tissues please
If you love crying then you'll love this game!
A great game, with great pixel art, fluent combat and AMAZING music.  Game made me cry the last minutes...

"With every hello comes a goodbye".
Shoulda called it Grapple Zero
Most games are fake, and most reviews are fake as well. Sanabi is subversive, therefore it starts out fake, but at a certain point in the story it becomes real. Therefore I must attempt to write a review for this game, despite the fact that there exists no guarantee that a video game review finds its intended audience.

To put it simply, the reason to play Sanabi isn't in the steam description and must be given indirectly. The story of Sanabi involves deep questions which cause it to be a good, authentic, and immersive video game:
-What does it mean to be human?
-What does it mean to see another as human?
-How can you be sure that what you see is reality?
-Do memories accurately depict reality?

and ideas:
-An unfeeling entity that possesses an automatic and unfocused drive to kill
-The purpose of one's entire life depending on a single independent concept that, taken by itself, is meaningless
-love
-and so on and so on

Sanabi's story is subversive, much like Omori's, which is why the above text seems absurd compared to the summary given on the steam page. However, this is the nature of subversive stories. In short, play the game.

Fun fast Paced Gameplay, Gorgeous Pixel Art, and One Of The Best Stories, Not Just In Indie Games, But Games As A Whole. If you liked Katana Zero, This Is A Must Play
Despite the lacking in combat and slightly cliche plot, the story telling was great, and I inevitably cried at the end. Don't think this as a replica of Katana Zero, just appreciate the story. Great job from a small Korean workshop, I look forward to a sequel playing as Mari. Recommend on veteran mode.
hsigaw.sg...h. iwfgh...,,,,,,,,,,, . ,,ll
(live transcript during the ending)
ㅠㅠ
I Wasn't expecting this high of a production level.
One of the best gaming experiences I had in the last 5 or more years.
I came up with a nice benchmark on whether you must play this game: [i]"Did you like LittleBigPlanet 2's grappling hook?"[/i]. If so, you [b]have[/b] to play this. [b]There's no choice, it's your destiny.[/b]

Even if you have learned about LittleBigPlanet 2 (rest in peace, 2011-2021) just now, this game is still amazing. In terms of the gameplay, there's nothing beyond your Hook Arm. This is actually for a good reason, as the developers decided to put all of their effort, soul and talent into polishing [b]that one mechanic.[/b] Swinging from ceiling to ceiling and from enemy to enemy in an acrobatic dance as if you're the neo-Doom Slayer feels amazing.

This would have still been a good game even if you only had the gameplay, but the art, the setting and the story are excellent as well. I think that SANABI is the first 2D game to give me an immense sense of scale. The story is beautiful, and so I won't discuss it so that you'll experience it blind, like I did.

All in all, it's a [b]a modern classic, a masterpiece[/b] that deserves a lot of attention.

[b]Edit after beating the one-hit-death mode and getting 100%:[/b]

I'd say that the English localisation for this game is a bit dodgy (missing punctuation, weird spacing, etc.), but nothing absolutely nonsensical that betrays any attempt at comprehension.

This game does a good job at referencing in-universe things without making the plot incomprehensible. Some of the examples (spoilers): 

[spoiler]What is the cleansing chip? Does it erase everything from the "memory chip"? What is the Uigeumbu? In-universe it's definitely not the equivalent for the Supreme Court like in the real world. What seemingly impossible feats did the General do during his life? Why does Korea still have a monarchy? Is it absolute? What is the extent of a soldier's augmentation?[/spoiler]

I think that therefore the universe is a good fit for some additional games. They don't have to be direct sequels, prequels or even the same genre, just games that take place in the world.

However, upon further inspection, this game does have some glaring plot holes and contradictions (MAJOR spoilers):

[spoiler]Why does the AI-General still have memories of his wife's death together with the ensuing events? Irreversibly deleting them was the very point of Mari's project, so why did they suddenly reappear?[/spoiler]

[spoiler]On a related note, why does the AI-General have recordings of research team meetings in his memory? It's a rather weird thing to include in a senseless revenge-killing machine: remember, Mago wanted to keep the vulnerabilities to a minimum.[/spoiler]

[spoiler]What was Mari's plan with AI-General? I don't really think that you can magically upload AI into the biological brain. She could have just gone with altering the memory chip that she mentions.[/spoiler]

[spoiler]Why didn't Mago kill (or kidnap, for that matter) Mari when they stole the AI-General? I imagine that they knew that she created the AI-General via the backdoor, it's an egregious loose end that eventually destroyed them.[/spoiler]

It kinda hurts the story's integrity, but I think that one can fix all of them with enough retconning.
스토리 갓겜 이라고 생각합니다....게임 요소도 좋아요....
Korean Spider-man [spoiler] or as they call it in game, Captain Korea [/spoiler]


[h1] Pros: [/h1]
- Great story, rare for its genre of action platformer. Short of perfect because of some mistranslation in the dialogues that causes some "huh?" moments. But I am sure it can be improved later on
- One of the most well-made pixel art style that blends incredibly well into gameplay
- Once you get familiar with the controls, the speed is quite addicting. Great fuel for adrenaline rush
- Oh man the [i] music.[/i] Goes super well with the flow and state of the game
- Levels can go pretty long in between cutscenes
- Great boss fights
- Amazing background art and atmosphere
- Good characters, although they lean into the tropey side early on

[h1] Cons: [/h1]
- [spoiler] After knowing the whole story, Mari's actions throughout the game are hard to justify to me [/spoiler]

- Voice acting could vastly improve the story experience. The emotional moments do not hit as hard without voice acting. Though I understand the reason why there is no voice acting for a retro-styled game to keep the classic vibe.
- You live and die by the grappling hook. Although you get some power-ups to your character and your hook, you literally do not use anything else. Would be nice to have a button to trigger some hacker girl's abilities whenever shes with you for more flexibility and options in gameplay
- The cutscenes may break the pace of the game for some people, especially the "slow walk" scenes. Imagine the pace of the game going from 100 to 10. Thankfully there are long levels in between major cutscenes.
- Very Linear levels, there is zero exploration. I personally prefer some kind of exploration for hidden lore or dialogues, but there is none here
- Camera does not pan fast enough sometimes, leading to deaths
- Muffin needs more presence in the cutscenes. It is only expressive very early on, the other times it is just a vehicle for Mari

TLDR;
8/10. Nothing comes as close as capturing vibe of speeding through a 2D neon cyberpunk world as this game, supplemented by an amazing story. Please buy it if you are looking for what I have described, you won't regret it.

I will be looking forward to the next game from Wonder Potion. If they could learn from some of the shortcomings from this game, I believe the next game has the potential for a masterpiece.
Games worth it just for the story. Damn the piano hits right in the feelers.
I'd rather give a thumbs up than a thumbs down, but i am mostly on the fence. On one hand the gameplay is tight and fluid. 

On the downside, way too many cut scenes. And multiple in a row. My experience is as follows.

Cut scene > Cut scene > Gameplay > Cut scene > Cut scene > Cut scene > Gameplay.

At this point for me it was

Skip cut scene > Skip cut scene > Skip cut scene > gameplay > Skip cut scene > Skip cut scene > gameplay


Absolutely amazing action-platformer with brilliant storyline, visuals & music
10/10 Katana Zero vibes go brrrrrr


If you like To the Moon and grappling action games, this is the best game for you.
Just play for 30 min and you will play all the way to the ending.
A beautiful narrative, Sanabi's story hit me harder than any game I've played before.

The characters have a lot of depth to them, and Sanabi does a really good job at infusing dialogue and interactions with as much personality as possible, whether through numerous text effects, subtle character animations, or controlling how dialogue advances. I'd like to see this level of detail picked up in other narrative games.

For a long time I thought I'd never see pixel art visuals as gorgeous as Hyper Light Drifter, but just watch the trailer for Sanabi and you'll know it's among the top.

The soundtrack complements the story really well--it's very reflective of the emotions I felt in any given moment while playing the game, and it's cohesive.

The artistic elements of this game (story, art, music) are all through the roof.


The gameplay itself isn't quite on the level of everything else, but it's solid, and this works perfectly fine because the game is very story-driven.

Make sure you're not skipping cutscenes or you might as well be throwing your money down the drain.


10/10 experience overall
Solid 10 hours action movie but also touching.

You might not be the best dad ever, but you are working on it.
2023 最佳像素游戏/最佳叙事游戏
9分剧情 8分演出 7分关卡
平台跳跃的爽点不错，但是对于机制的挖掘比较浅显。
手残党建议直接简单难度速通看剧情。

Great game with shit checkpoints
Very fun movement system. Not necessarily the most precise but timing and reflexes allow for a very high skill ceiling and exceptional skill expression which can really get you in "The Flow".

The grappling hook is on point aside from a specific boss where you fight both said boss and your own auto-lock system. This led to a bit of frustration but nothing unbeatable by slowing down a bit from my reckless style up to this point.

There came a few instances where I wasn't lost per se, but rather the next necessary step was unclear which led to a bit of confusion. Again nothing overly frustrating and that could not be overcome by trying different directions. I was never lost in guessing which way I should proceed through and the straight-forwardness of the levels never took away from the feeling of exploring.

The english translation is serviceable. Sometimes ok, sometimes bad; featuring missing words or simply so poorly done the meaning gets lost across.

Some of the blame may also fall on the story. Its is very corny and straightforward and... the emotional beats are insane. I was not expecting this intensity out of my cyberpunk samurai grappling hook game but here I am, telling you it was a great time.
10/10 give me more of this
on the same level as katana zero. 10/10
Yes.
It's quite good, but the factory level is so boring looking and it just never ends
-takes a deep breath- okay, let's talk about Sanabi.

Not sure how this game found itself on my wishlist, but I'm glad it did. I grabbed it on a small sale and saw a lot of the reviews praising this game and saying it is similar to Katana Zero, another great game I love. Upon finishing Sanabi, I have to say, this is one of the best 2D action games I have played. I feel like it is Katana Zero meets Celeste. Let's dig in.

You play as a retired General who is spending time with his lovely daughter. While living the good life and using your awesome grapple hook arm, your daughter heads inside your home and sees a clock with the name "Sanabi" on it. Before the General can warn her, she dies in the explosion. Days have passed, the General now wants to hunt Sanabi for the death of his daughter. He takes on a mission to enter a city where are the humans have mysteriously vanished. All, but one. A woman has sent a distress signal from inside the city. Your mission is to figure out why all the humans have disappeared from the city and to get the woman out of there alive.

Sanabi is a 2D action platformer. The controls are tight and very fun to get used to. As the General, you will be jumping and grappling onto walls, platforms, and more as you traverse the city to complete your mission. I felt like I was playing Celeste but with a grappling hook as the levels got more and more complex. Everything is very simple to master and as you progress, you will learn one to two more skills that enhance the gameplay.

The pixel graphics are gorgeous as well as the music. I was bobbing my head to the great soundtrack as I was swinging across chasms and fighting enemies. The boss fights were very fun and memorable. However, gameplay aside, Sanabi's strongest asset was its story. While playing, I kept thinking I had the story down, and then curveball after curveball hit me until I got to the good ending (which was so EFFIN good!!!).

However, this game does have its flaws. While the story is very strong and beautiful, it also hinders the game as well. You know how Metal Gear Solid is a great game but it has long cut scenes? Sanabi has that same issue as there will be times you will be sitting through long scenes in between gameplay that will just break the flow. While these scenes are skippable, you really need to watch them to fully immerse yourself into the story. Some of the later levels really hit you with a skill check and may take a while to beat. I also had a bug here and there where my jump button was also tied to my grapple button, but a quick reset on the controls fixed this issue whenever it occurred. There were times when I got stuck in walls or laser grids that got me some cheap deaths, but nothing game-breaking.

Final verdict? This game has definitely planted itself into my top 10 games. I tried to keep my review short and sweet because I don't want to spoil anything, but I just have to say, the scenes leading up to the end of the game literally had me in tears. I legit sobbed at the end of the game and I am so grateful I played it to the very end. The characters were great, the story was amazing, and the gameplay and boss fights were top-notch. This was a perfect indie game and I highly HIGHLY recommend you play this masterpiece. The story will slow you down and there may be a bug here or there, but the overall experience was just perfect and I praise the developers for a wonderful journey. Thank you for reading.

PS: "Getting to the End is not what's important......"
Positives:
-Slick presentation with some beautiful scenes and backdrops 
-Emotional and suspenseful story
-Snappy grappling hook platforming action that will definitely appeal to players that like to go fast
-Game encourages speedrunning for added replayability 
-Multiple difficulty levels
-Banging OST

Negatives:
-Lots of typos in dialogue for the English version 
-Constant story scenes will annoy those that just want to play the game
-Tone of the game is rather depressing which some may not vibe with
-Upon dying it takes about 5 seconds of staring at a black screen with no audio to respawn. This wouldn't be terrible if it wasn't for some rather tough sections that can lead to a lot of back to back deaths. The audio pausing was probably the most grating aspect tbh since you have this bombastic music playing then it stops for 5 seconds and then it comes back. When this is happening constantly it gets annoying. You may only experience this if you try playing on a higher difficulty like I did. 
-I experienced some bugs where I was stuck to a wall and had to finagle a bit to get unstuck. There was even a time I glitched through a wall entirely and had to restart at a prior checkpoint to fix. Hopefully the devs can patch this out. 
-No d-pad control when swinging. 

Despite all my criticisms this was a very unique and memorable game that I would like to return to at some point. I wholeheartedly recommend it if it looks interesting to you.
[b]"Getting all the way to the end is not what is important"[/b]
I knew you were right... Indeed, it wasn't...

I purchased Sanabi during early access without knowing anything about the game, and I was waiting for its full release since then to make this review. Buying this game was one of the best decisions I have ever made because Sanabi was, without a doubt, one of the best gaming experiences of my life...
I never thought the story of Sanabi would be this intriguing and absorbing. It's a must-play for anyone who enjoys action and deep story games. I would genuinely like to volunteer for the games Turkish language support if I could as a Turkish player because more people need to know about a game like this...
Excellent story and gameplay.
10/10
this is a really good game with an amazing story
A game I REALLY want to like but the more I think back on my time the more I feel like there is a huge wealth of missed potential.

This game demands both speed and precision, however there are numerous pitfalls (metaphorically and VERY literally) that hinder the overall experience. This is almost exclusively because of level design. There is almost always an instant-death pit beneath you, meaning that one minuscule mistake will cause you to restart however you are encouraged to go as fast as you can due to the many timed puzzles and pursuant enemies driving your forward. You can become stunlocked and die with no way to recover and the sheer amount of information you need to be processing in the later levels is nothing short of insane. It's like you're expected to fail just so you can see what's coming up ahead. Once you know what you're meant to be dealing with the game becomes much easier to enjoy as you can actually plan your next moves. As a result I feel like this game would benefit strongly from a slow-down mechanic. Maybe it can be tied to certain actions you perform or simply a button toggle but if I could have had even a second to take a breath and assess my surroundings my frustrations would have almost completely vanished.

The art in this game is beautiful, the music is fantastic and the characters are engaging (although the story does beat you over the head for way longer than it should about certain plot points). When the level design allows it you can really fly through the city and simply enjoy traversal. Heck, even the combat is fun for how sparse it is.

However there is a specific boss "fight" that goes on for FAR too long. It was such a long encounter that there are multiple checkpoints IN the encounter itself, and the difficulty of what you're supposed to do isn't consistent. Some "cycles" are nigh-impossible to do in time without knowing what you're dealing with ahead of time while others are so easy you could do them in a wheelchair. And this sporadic difficulty is all over the game, there's no real sense of difficulty progression because the problem is often "you don't know what's ahead? Better die and figure it out on your second try". And then when you DO get ahead you have to repeat the process allllllll over again.

I think the best way of summarising my feelings is this:
Instead of "cyber Spider-man" I got "trial and error: the reckoning".

There is a good game here, it just wasn't hitting the right notes for me. Too many issues were compounding on one another and the only thing keeping me engaged was the story and character interaction. Despite my frustrations I'd say there's more to enjoy than dislike here, even though it seems like I've done nothing but rant endlessly.
baya iyi alayım mı almayayım mı ikilemine düştüyseniz alın son zamanlarda harcadığım en iyi 120tlydi alın aldırın oynayın oynatın
this game fucks like a movement based katana zero, but i'm really disappointed that mari holds the objecively wrong opinion about pidgeons, the most wonderful birds on earth.
Imagine crying over some pixels. Me..I did
Gameplay only gets more fun the more comfortable you get with moving fast, and the story has immaculate presentation, setup, and payoff. If you have any interest in this, get it.
Getting to the end is not important...
Great game.
i creid
This is absolutely crazy!

Makes me feel like I'm mechanically skilled.
Arguably one of the best single player games i've ever played. Incredibly good story and the movement makes you feel like a god once you get the hang of it. 10/10 if you have money just buy it

English:
I like this game with cyber style very much, and its fighting style is unique. But I still want to raise some questions. First of all, the battle background music of the game is too monotonous, but the background music in the end and the robot chase makes the game atmosphere very strong. The second is the game picture. The background of the battle picture on the ground is dazzling, and the protagonist model is small, and the dress is dark. In the battle, it is often integrated with the background, which is difficult to distinguish. I hope it can be improved. In addition, I hope the game will have a wonderful future, thank u again.

Spanish:
Me gusta mucho este juego de estilo cyber, y su forma de luchar es única. Pero todavía quiero hacer algunas preguntas, la primera es que la música de fondo de combate del juego es un poco demasiado monótona, pero la música de fondo en la persecución con el robot al final hace que el ambiente del juego sea muy fuerte. En segundo lugar, la imagen del juego, el Fondo de la imagen de combate en el suelo es deslumbrante, y el modelo del protagonista es pequeño y oscuro, a menudo se integra con el Fondo en la batalla, no es fácil de distinguir, con la esperanza de mejorar. Además, espero que el juego tenga un buen final. Gracias de nuevo.
Editing this review now that I've beaten the full release:

This game is a MASTERPIECE. Pure fucking art on every level, from story to art to music to level design it is actually the best game I have ever played and has become my favourite game of all time. It is sooooo fucking good, so much fun to swing around and the bosses are unique and majestic. To say I was blown away by it would be an understatement, and this game is an easy 10/10 for me.

If you love precision platformers and great music then please play this game as it is worth every penny. Top marks on all regards and I can only say that I am sad the game is done and that I can't experience it for the first time again. Worth the wait 100% and a huge props to the devs for making this!
its a much more polished game then i expected for the time that it has come out but its very nice the charecters and the deatails are insane its a very well priced game imo i would recommend the game to peaple who liked katana zero becuase its has a bit of the same vibe tho i still didnt finish the story but i hope its going to be amazing all in all its a very well made game.
Simply the best game ever I think
Although short it has very solid gameplay and a pretty good story, and the characters are pretty cute too so that's cool.
good
Great gameplay and platforming, a true gem of a game, but the "cutscenes" are really cutting into the pacing and the action, although the story itself is decent. Also, the music is absolute banger.
yes
Trust me if you've played Katana Zero, play on Very Hard. You'll thank me later.
Sanabi is a great game. It has some of the most fun platforming in any game I have played and the game is the perfect skill level for any new players but can still be challenging at times. 10/10
If you like amazing art, great combat, great platforming, great story telling you'll absolutely LOVE Sanabi
the movement is super fun, its been a blast playing this so far! can't wait for more!
"It's not about getting to the end. This isn't like that."
Genuinley one of the best gaming experiences I've ever had in a while. 100% recommend.
I WANT TO PLAY MORE I NEED TO PLAY MORE
P R O T E C C at all costs
So, I'm not quite done yet, but I felt the need to write a review for this one before I finish it up.

This game is a beautifully paced tide of intensity, starting with a simple layer of movement, and then the mechanics start packing on and punching in to make the pace frantic, the combat hectic, and the overall result a pulse-boosting, emotionally captivating experience. Soundtrack is absolutely bonkers level of tasty synthwave/electronic goodness. EXTREMELY high quality. The pixel art and general spectacle of the game are fantastic. Writing somehow manages to balance grittiness and some level of comic relief without feeling forced or having any "Well THAT just happened" moments. The highs are high and might give you a chuckle, and the lows will hit ya right in the gut.

Level design is generally great, with a few small sections that I found a little irritating, but were eventually passed with relative ease on the normal difficulty once I took a moment to step back and put on a momentary cap of thinking for five seconds and actually controlling my movement. Certain sections have a bit of a learning curve, so some levels will rack up the death counter, but if you really dig into the movement mechanics you mechanically feel like a dang superhero by the last few sections of the game. 

My best recommendation without spoiling anything is, when you are given the option to rerun the tutorial, do it a handful of times, mess around with the movement, get a feel for the speed and what directional inputs do while you're swinging. I ran the tutorial around 5 or 6 times because it's less than a minute long and I genuinely feel like it enriched my experience with the game.

It's also consistently adding in new little mechanics to make sure that movement never goes stale and ensuring that they tie into that delicious, delicious worldbuilding.

There are difficulty settings across the board from "You have infinite health and can only die in pits/instant kills, enjoy the story" to "A single fart from an enemy kills you". Also has a speedrun mode that you unlock, presumably after beating the game once. If I had to guess it's probably the levels and bosses in rapid sequence with cutscenes removed.

Game is positively dank. As I said, not quite done yet but I'm really, REALLY enjoying it. Kind of hoping that the game hits me with a plot twist and like six more hours of game.
If you like platformers, snag it, it's already relatively cheap.
gameplay wise ? katana zero X celeste but with a grapling hook
story wise ? katana zero X celeste but with a grapling hook
music wise ? katana zero X celeste but with a grapling hook
graphic wise ? katana zero X celeste but with a grapling hook

all of the above aren't even jokes or hyperbolic, if you've played either of those two you'll love it
100% recommended, probably one the the best video games i ever played
yes i think so
Getting to the end is not what's important
This game is like if Katana Zero's fast paced combat and the Web Swinging of Spiderman had a baby. 

My only complaint is that death loading screens are kinda long, but that's pretty much it. 
Go play this game, it's great.
For most of the game, I felt like there was too much text and not enough gameplay, but I was wrong.  In the end it ended up being the perfect balance.

This might just be the best indie platformer.  Don't miss it!
Bro straight up better then katana zero. don't research, don't do shit just buy it and play. Trust me this game will give that void feeling
Game is pretty great but it would be nice if the script got another editing pass because the dialogue is pretty rough. The game might be a 9/10 if the English were cleaned up.
Great gameplay and great story. My favorite platformer of all time.

FULL GAME:

My favorite game of all time. Up there with nge in terms of art form.
this is honestly one of the best goddamn games i have ever played in my entire life. The characters are compelling, the story is so imersive, the gameplay is phenomenal and the graphics are great! Congratulations to the devs that made such a wonderfull game and I hope that the full game releases soon!
Pros:
THE BOSS FIGHT near the end is the BEST one i have had in ALL MY YEARS OF GAMING
Better then: Sekiro, hollow knight, metal gear rising e.t.c
it also has more twists an turns than a goshdarn Rollercoaster
AMAZING music
Pixel art is astounding
story made me sob
con:
it is a little bit easy at the beginning (i was playing on hard mode) HOWEVER it recovers later and is made into a decently difficult game.
9.9/10
Just made it to the end of the early access content. Awesome game, def recommend.
playign on controller? 

nope!
don't even try, it's so so badly implemented in this stage, everythgin else is spot-on 
the atmosphere, the writing, all of it is great - but when you try to aim your arm and use moves with it ( on controlelr ) it all falls apart mega quick.

it's a wet fart after that amazing intro, how badly the arm aims and controls on a controller. 

Im sure it's great on mouse and keyboard - just another issue is the tutorials gives oyu the button inputs of KEYBOARD and MOUSE. 
which is .. less than helpful.

I'll note they didn't even put controller support on the page - but yeah. 
it's 2022. Controller support is at lleast a minimum requirement - especially if you wanna publish your game on a non-pc. 

work on those controls devs, the rest is superb!

- recommeneded if you don't use a controller -
[h3]Story: Amazing[/h3]

The story of Sanabi is… weird, strange and confusing. An entire city’s worth of people have gone without a place, all of the data is wiped clean, no clues on what is going on or why the city seems to be designed to self-destruct at the press of a button. 

…then you reach the end and everything begins to fucking [b]click.[/b] The game hits you with  one of the most mind-blowing twists at the end of the game. 

There was an empty hole in my soul for an entire day after I finished it.

[hr][/hr]

[h3]Gameplay: Fun[/h3]

The developers took one idea: The Grappling Hook, and practically built everything around it. The level layout, the fights and bosses were all designed to make the best use of the grappling mechanic.

And they make a pretty good job of it. It is fun and challenging.

The factory boss can go suck a dick though, he’s stressful.

[hr][/hr]
[h3]Problems: Minor[/h3]

I [i]haven’t[/i] encountered any game-breaking bugs or crashes, on that end the game is pretty stable on my PC.

The developers are Korean. English isn’t their first language… and some lines show that. The general gist of the story is clear, but occasionally you will have to think on what a certain line actually meant.

Personally… The Factory boss is annoying as fuck. Both of them. It’s a “Get to point A to B in a time limit” type of thing, but make any mistakes and you might as well restart back to the checkpoint because there’s no recovery from that.
i love how indie games keep ending up with more emotion and spectacle than the massive budget triple-a stuff lmfao
good gameplay+good story=good game
This game is so peak because it makes you so mad from being bad at the game that when the emotional parts come on you're too busy being mad that you forget to steel yourself and cry.
good game
Incredible, combat, story, movement, design, everything. 
Please do not make a sequel. Perfection cannot be improved.
Something to keep in mind going in is that the game is very story heavy. It's not Metal Gear levels of story imbalance where there's only ten minutes of gameplay followed by five hours of story, but be prepared for some lengthy bouts between gameplay. You can skip cutscenes if you really want to, but it is strongly recommended that you pay attention to the story to get the most out of the experience.

Doesn't change my opinion of the game personally, as I found both the gameplay and the story to be phenomenal from start to finish (to the point that I ended up playing for three hours longer than I intended to on my last session because I was so invested in the story and I wanted to see how it all ended)
バッジのためにかんたんレビュー書きます

バイオニックコマンドーよろしくグラップリングフックで飛び回る2Dプラットフォーマー。
アクションは小気味よく、数や火力で圧倒してくる敵をなぎ倒す英雄気分を存分に味わうことができる。

サイバーパンクディストピアを舞台にした脚本とドットグラフィックも素晴らしい。
fuckin buy it and play it bruh
Daddy? Daddy! *KABOOM*
What a story. Thank you, guys.
I came for the hook and got hooked by the plot


Solid gameplay, and very engrossing mystery.  I feel like the opening motivation for the Protag might be a bit of a cheapshot at our emotions, but effective in wrenching my heart nonetheless.  can't wait to see how the story ends.
WOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO
i like the funny arm
the music makes me
Indie GOTY 2023 right here!
Ive been looking for something new to tide me over while I wait for the katana zero DLC and this was perfect
katana zero with cutier story and cool hook mechanics.

I did finish the game after devs fully relase it and I felt like I should edit this review. I thought that story was going to be lame but It was surprisingly good and creative. The characters are well writen and the gameplay never gets boring cuz of the FUCKING HOOK ARM. I NEVER KNEW USING A HOOK WOULD BE SO MUCH FUN. I WANT RIP MY ARM OFF AND REPLACE IT WITH A HOOK PLEASE I NEED IT I NEED IT I NEED IT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!KEOKD'OKDŞOAKSDŞİOASKFDİŞALSFKAİSŞLFKASİŞLFK!!!!!!!!!!!!!
This game is honestly very amazing and I can't wait to see where it goes! I've played through the entirety of it and enjoyed every bit of it. The characters are lovable, interesting; the pixel art is gorgeous and the story is incredibly interesting. There's genuinely no words to describe how happy this game makes me! Best of luck to the devs, take your time and I hope things go well!! Looking forward to future updates and progress!
Amazing game with a cool story and a banger soundtrack.
I would highly recommend playing with mouse and keyboard. I started out playing most of the game with a gamepad, until i got stuck at a sequence pretty late in the game. I tried changing to mouse and keyboard and got past it almost immediately.
This game made me ugly cry.
This is an awesome game with dope mechanics, beautiful aesthetic and a banger ost. Can't wait to see how the game goes further
I loved this game, the story is 10/10 and the gameplay is awesome 100% should play this game if you like fast paced games with good story.
<3
Made me cry
MINOR SPOILERS



Might be my favorite ending sequence of any game I've played. Wonderful story and payoff once the movement and story beats really click.
This game has very tight platforming mechanics and some of the best-feeling 2D grappling hook traversal I've ever seen. However, the good news does not end there. Here is a bulleted list of what I liked about this game:

1. A compelling mystery plot.
2. A very moving character story-line with heartfelt emotional moments
3. A lot of humor and charm.
4. Set piece action sequences with a grand scale.
5. The details. There are so many cute, funny, referential details throughout the game.
6. Animations - Despite being relatively small sprites, their animations convey a lot of emotion.

This is a game where I kept finding myself saying "Whoa." Because there are a lot of BIG moments in the game and every one of them is set up so beautifully and masterfully. The game does a great job of building tension leading up to each major mystery reveal or epic action sequence.

Stop reading this, you should already be installing by now!
One of the greatest video game stories I've played in a long time.
Full Walkthrough: https://youtu.be/m7SZQ6EZV7I

★★★★★
Gameplay: Good
Graphics: Retro
Music: Epic
Story: Epic
PC Requirements: Potato
Game Time: 6.5 - 9 hrs
this game is really good!!! i thinky you should buy!
10 out of 10 !! This game gave me so many emotions. I love the challenge and story. This is the first platformer I've enjoyed playing on mouse and keyboard. This and Narita Boy are the best games I've played in years topping many AAA titles. You wont regret this purchase
Unironically one of the most creative and challenging platforms I've ever played
Sand got in my eyes while swinging
Can you add voice acting? I can't read when I'm crying.
It's not as good as katana zero, but it's still pretty damn good.
SANABI is well worth every penny.
10/10. Solid plot, high quality to price ratio, I will absolutely play through this again.
This was a very enjoyable experience, especially for early access. The controls feel smooth for the most part though there are some areas where the grappling felt stiff mostly when turning some corners. Combat felt awesome, dashing around from enemy to enemy felt satisfying and while simple there were some mechanics that can make things interesting. Being able to dash after being hit is a nice recovery option and I can't wait to see how speedrunners abuse this tactic. You can go really fast in this game and swinging around felt fun, though I hope to see a little more enemy variety in the full version. The final boss was definitely the biggest highlight of the game for me. All of the other bosses were great as well but I felt this one definitely will test your grappling skills the most.

The story and characters were nicely written. The story goes from seemingly cheerful to dark pretty fast and early on. I like the concept of the world, with it being some sort of cyberpunk Korean setting with shadowy corporate conspiracies. The characters have enough charm to keep things from being overly mopey, and the game throws in cute references and doesn't take itself too seriously but manages to keep you invested in what's going on. The character designs were also good. One of my favorites was the Gun Head boss encountered at the beginning of the game. The look of the city is fantastic, though I wish there was a little more variety in terms of level aesthetic.

As someone who is eager for the Katana Zero dlc I feel this game was able to scratch that itch while also being able to retain a distinct identity on its own. The comparisons were inevitable, and while it doesn't quite strike the same chords I feel that SANABI is on its way to becoming something great and I look forward to playing the finished version when it comes around.
[h1]Check out my video coverage of the game: [/h1] 

https://youtu.be/p1tpb8R4mzE

[h1]Written Review[/h1]

SANABI is going to scratch that fast-paced platformer itch you've had for the past few months. You play as the retired army general on the path of vengeance. Attached to your shoulder is the Chain Arm - part weapon, part grappling hook that you use to not only swing around the dystopian cyberpunk streets of Mago city, set in Korea. The Chain Arm is also used to...

*checks notes*

...rip enemies apart in an instant.

This is a one-hit kill platformer that makes you feel powerful when you pull off a sick move, and like an absolute loser when you whiff it. Speedrunners rejoice - this is the one you're looking for. There are various tools to traverse the environment, boosting through swings with your Chain Arm at the right moment will propel you to the next area in a single swift move. Memorizing the environment will make it even easier to chain your movement from zone to zone quickly.

Which is a bit of a shame because...the environment is beautiful. Mago city is full of neon lights, industrial corridors, and beautifully-designed robots both friend and foe. The game gives massive Katana ZERO vibes, with the fast-paced nature of Super Meat Boy and similar wall-jumping platformers in the genre - all wrapped up in tasty cyberpunk vibes.

There are some minor graphical issues in some of the cinematics, and there were TINY but noticible performance issues I while playing. But this review was made literally hours after the game's early access release so there's still time to tune these things up.

I have a lot to play and experience in Sanabi so far, but if you're a fan of fast-paced platformers like Katana ZERO and Super Meat Boy then you're really going to like this one.
10/10
had me crying in the end
Sanabi is as satisfying to play as it looks, boldly making another case for the ol' question: "Does a grappling hook make every game better?". In the case of this cyberpunk platformer, the answer is yes. Drawing heavy visual and storytelling inspiration from the fantastic Katana: Zero, Sanabi is a story about transhumanism, capitalism, trauma, and family. While in some cases the anti-capitalist nature of the story comes off as ham-fisted especially as it conflicts with its seemingly pro-militarist narrative, the game is at all times tongue-in-cheek with it's delivery of this message (there is a painting of Elon Musk in one of the levels). Aside from thematic criticism, the writing in Sanabi is occasionally muddied by what is clearly haphazard translation from Korean to English, but this is a criticism specific to the English version and I can't speak for other versions of the game. Overall I thought the writing was very good, with good dramatic and comedic timing, so this is more of a nitpick than anything. I highly recommend this game for people looking for a fast-paced platformer with a good story, good art, and satisfying movement mechanics.
This was one of the greatest games I've ever played. Probably the most fluid and fun movement mechanics I've ever seen in a 2D platformer, amazing boss fights, incredible music, the pixel art is probably the best I've ever seen in a video game and the story is one of the most emotional and impactful I've ever experienced. Game was about 9 hours long for me on Hard difficulty and the quality stays high that whole time, there's no point where it drops off, which is insane given the quality of the animation in every scene. It has a ton of wit and charm, I genuinely love this game. All of that AND it has a grappling hook. Do yourself a favor and just buy the game as soon as you physically can
Great game, great story, overall if you like games like Katana 0 or other platforming roguelikes, this is the game for you.
I bought the game during early access, but wanted to wait until the campaign was fully fleshed out and finished. The waiting paid off and the release is truly a wonderfully executed, finished game.

As great as the music, the art style and the combat is - I'm mostly happy that the developers stuck the landing on the campaign and delivered an amazing story that quite frankly is even better than Katana Zero's. It hit me in the feels like KZ didn't.

A lot of comparisons with Katana Zero have been made - in a very positive sense ofc, but now having finished the game I can honestly say, that the comparisons should probably stop. Yes, the music and the art style is just as great, but apart from that Sanabi stands on its own. It has it's own unique gameplay, that is far closer to Celeste than Katana Zero. Traversing levels at 'high octane' speeds and killing enemies along the way has a very different feel compared to KZ. The boss fights are all unique and fun. The difficulty is even on Veteran mostly fair. There were one or two passages in Chapter 3 or 4 where the next checkpoint was a little bit too far away and you had to repeat 'a little bit' too much for my taste but otherwise it was a great experience. 

What is also interesting to note is, that the further you get in the campaign, the more abilities you unlock and the more fun (!) traversing levels actually becomes. I thought that was quite a feat, because usually the further you get in a game the more difficult and frustrating it simply gets - this is somewhat true for Sanabi as well, but trust me, you will have the best time in the game when you blast through the last chapter with all your abilities unlocked.  What a great finale and feeling, when you reach the ending!

Uh yeah, so.... recommended! In fact..a tie for Game of the Year for me (with BG3 and Dave the diver)
Bro made grappling hook the game and accidentally dropped a banger story along with it
Better story than 99% of Netflix shows
If you haven’t already, look at the other reviews. They’re probably far shorter than this review, more elegant, and, above all, far more humorous. But most of them share the same point:

That this game is phenomenal, in so, so many ways, and one that you shouldn’t miss. 

The grapple hook is done extremely well here, and, with the other mechanics it introduces, makes you feel like a boss as you zip across the screen, killing enemies with crunchy sound effects and a badass soundtrack.

The story starts off pretty simple, but, at least for me, it was quite engaging (hey, maybe I don’t have taste, I don’t know). But as it unravels, there are twists that completely table the turns and a satisfying ending that blows your socks off and leaves you hungry for more (yeah, it’s satisfying, but as soon as it ended, I was like “that’s it?”). I heard that the developers were making DLC, which I hope is true, and really hope is coming soon. 

The characters here are great too, and, throughout a game, you really do feel a connection to them. Mari serves as a great side character, adding humor to the game and strengthening its many serious moments. 

I do have a minor nitpick with this game, which is when you fall off a cliff or die. When you die, the music completely stops, it pauses for a few seconds, and then you start back at a checkpoint. It kills the flow of the game and I feel it would have been better if the game involved quicker deaths and allow you to get back into it faster (according to my memory, it did this for ONE BOSS FIGHT, and I frankly wish it did this for the whole game. I did do this on normal mode, and didn’t try it on legendary or other difficulties. The pause button also speeds things up a bit, although it still pause the music and you still have to wait).

Regardless, this is just one small blemish on a masterfully crafted painting, and it beats out most 59.99 and now 69.99 games out there (for the sweet, sweet price of 14.99).

So just get it.
Got it for the silly grapple swinging and left with tears streaming down my face
10/10 game
A friend of mine gifted me this game for my birthday. I played it thinking it would be a nice indie platformer... Boy was I wrong. Not only is it nice, it is an incredible game i would like to forget so i can play it all over again. I loved it so much. Still sobbing over some pixels :')
My profile picture is my honest reaction to this game. I wish this game's story would have an anime or series adaptation.
It's about the journey, not the destination
 How am i supposed to swing around with these damn tears in my eyes?
please play this game, it deserves your time
Ok, for starters if you enjoy platformers go no further and get this game.

For people that might still be on the fence let me tell you why you should buy Sanabi.
- Incredible pixel art
- Engaging story
- The smoothest platforming
- Amazing bossfights and combat mechanics
- Great music
And the list could go on for much longer.

What I'm trying to say is play the game, you won't regret it one bit.
awesome momentum based gameplay, good music, crazy narrative, I cried, 10/10

Slick gameplay and excellent story. I highly recommend it.
Time to be the best dad in the world
gapple hook game good 15 dollars on steam buy it now buy it now buy it now buy it now
Idk bruh ~ someone cutting onions when i finished the game ~ 10 / 10
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀ ＿＿
　　　　　／＞　　フ
　　　　　| 　_　 _ l
　 　　　／` .ミ.ܫ.ノ
　　 　 /　　　 　 |
　　　 /　 ヽ　　 ﾉ
　 　 │　　|　|　|
　／￣|　　 |　|　|
　| (￣ヽ＿ヽ)__)
　＼二つ
 You received kittys recognition
⠘⡀⠀It"s pretty freakin sweet and   ⠀⡜⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠑⡀⠀you should get this game ⡔⠁⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⠢⢄⠀ King⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀  ⠀⣀⠴⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢸⠀⠀⠀⢀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⡀⠤⠄⠒⠈⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠘⣀⠄⠊⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡿⠿⠛⠛⠛⠋⠉⠈⠉⠉⠉⠉⠛⠻⢿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡿⠋⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠉⠛⢿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⡏⣀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣀⣤⣤⣤⣄⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⢿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⢏⣴⣿⣷⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡆⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣟⣾⣿⡟⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⢢⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢸⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣟⠀⡴⠄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⠻⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⣄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿
⣿⣿⣿⠟⠻⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠶⢴⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣧⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿
⣿⣁⡀⠀⠀⢰⢠⣦⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣼⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡄⠀⣴⣶⣿⡄⣿
⣿⡋⠀⠀⠀⠎⢸⣿⡆⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣴⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⠗⢘⣿⣟⠛⠿⣼
⣿⣿⠋⢀⡌⢰⣿⡿⢿⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⠿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡇⠀⢸⣿⣿⣧⢀⣼
⣿⣿⣷⢻⠄⠘⠛⠋⠛⠃⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢿⣧⠈⠉⠙⠛⠋⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣧⠀⠈⢸⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠟⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⢃⠀⠀⢸⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⡿⠀⠴⢗⣠⣤⣴⡶⠶⠖⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣀⡸⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⡀⢠⣾⣿⠏⠀⠠⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠛⠉⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣧⠈⢹⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣰⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⡄⠈⠃⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣠⣴⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣧⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣠⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣴⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣦⣄⣀⣀⣀⣀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠘⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⡄⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣧⠀⠀⠀⠙⣿⣿⡟⢻⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⠇⠀⠁⠀⠀⠹⣿⠃⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡿⠛⣿⣿⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢐⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⠿⠛⠉⠉⠁⠀⢻⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⠈⣿⣿⡿⠉⠛⠛⠛⠉⠉
⣿⡿⠋⠁⠀⠀⢀⣀⣠⡴⣸⣿⣇⡄⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⡿⠄⠙⠛⠀⣀⣠⣤⣤⠄
Amazing Platformer. Best Indie Game in 2023 for me. Looks good, plays well, story is great and it's challenging but even managable for me with my boomer fingers. Controller is recommended, keyboard works just fine as well. If you like fast paced platformaction this is the game for you!
Incredibly great story and super fun gameplay. I would consider it one of the best plattforming games i've ever played.
10/10 Story.
10/10 Art.
9/10 Gameplay.
It should be noted that the game is currently unfinished, and temporarily ends on a cliffhanger.
This game is one of the good diamonds in the pool of sludge that is the industry.
Great art, interesting story, and good gameplay.
If you like platformers even a tiny bit, play it.
IF YOU'RE READING THIS and haven't spoiled the game yet, I would reccomend not looking any further and just playing the game.

very fast paced and satisfying platformer that doesn't have its skill cap hinged on just being insanely difficult like that other game everyone keeps mentioning.

great story with a lot of excellent pixel art animation and a great soundtrack.

best played with a mouse and keyboard, I highly reccomend this game
great story, lovable characters, wallow in the depths of despair and self loathing, solid mechanics, satisfying maneuvering and combat. Really enjoying it so far.
Came for the grappling stayed for the emotionally smart driven story that says a lot about society.
good enough instead of katana zero dlc ;-;
If you want a story driven platformer with very unique traversal and combat mechanics, this is the game for you. It's like Cloud Strife became the bionic commando and borrowed John Wick's backstory, but it's a child instead of a puppy. Very fun gameplay when you get it. (Quick tip, you can skip cutscenes by holding esc, you'll thank me).
Oynadığım en iyi pixel art oyunlardan biri oldu. Karakterler çok şeker, hikayesi ve müzikleri güzel. Kanca mekaniğini çok sevdim. Full sürümünü sabırsızlıkla bekliyorum :D
Buttery smooth platforming, very fun mechanics, and an interesting story. I love all the characters and the mix of serious and funny moments in the game.

My only real gripe is the fact that the game is pretty short (so far). I finished the existing content in a little over 5 hours while taking things slowly. One other minor annoyance was the fact that the game does not lend itself well to the controller. The game is designed for the mouse and keyboard, which I wish was pointed out in a starting tip -- trying to use the controller was an exercise in frustration when needing to do some of the more intricate movements.
katana zero if it was not katana zero but a completely different game

tl;dr it's good get it now
I'M NOT CRYING UR CRYING ITS JUST DUST IN MY EYES
Awesome!
OMG the movement is ADDICTING
katana zero dlc için beklerken bu oyunu oynamak iyi geldi.
Pros: Games goes fiiiuuumm, so fast, good gameplay

Contras: Dialogues are Zzz, but you can skip almost all of it
i think i might bust a cumb in my pant 

10/10 video game
Gameplay : Fun (8.2/10.0）
Graphic : Good (8.5/10.0)
Music : Ok I guess (7.1/10.0)
Difficulty : Easy to learn / Hard to master (7.8/10.0)
Story : Good (8.0/10.0)
Price : Cheap (9.1/10.0)
Gametime : Unknown (Only half game is done)
Bugs : None (10.0/10.0)

Overall rating : 8.7/10.0

我要先聲明一下，我是滿驚訝這游戲竟然是韓國人做的，因爲很少會看到韓國人做的游戲，沒有要冒犯的意思
整個游戲玩起來還不算太難，需要一點技術吧
但是我覺得游戲製作不錯，簡單明瞭又好玩
這個游戲是一款2D平臺跑酷游戲
游戲本身給了我一個KatanaZero和蔚藍的氛圍，蔚藍的跑酷機制以及KatanaZero獨有的畫質以及快速移動的玩法。
特別是女兒的部分，超有KatanaZero的感覺
總體是說希望這游戲可以開發的完整一些，因本身還處於開發階段，所以故事也才做到一半

First of all, I'm suprised its made by a korean, since I rarely found a game made by korean, no offense
Entire game is fun for me, probably needs a bit of skill
But I think the game is good, easy to play and understand
The game itself is a 2D platformer parkour game
This game gives me a KatanaZero and Celeste Vibe, Celeste's parkour, and KatanaZero graphic and fast movement gameplay
Especially the daughter part, really have the feeling like KatanaZero
Well hope the game itself could be more complete since its still an early access

Very good game, quite similar to Katana Zero (includes a neat reference too). Has some spooky elements but most of all, the mechanics with ya giant metal arm makes the game a little difficult but interesting.
Near future of South Korea.
14$ for a early access
Its a good game, but man is it repetitive.  I haven't finished it, but I really just have no desire too.  I don't know why people were comparing this to Katana Zero they're nothing alike.  Don't care for constantly repeating areas over and over because i made one little mistake.
Katana zero on crack
katana zero but also good
⠀⠈⠢⢄ ⠀ Very Cool Game⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢸⠀⠀⠀⢀⣀⣀⣀⣀⣀⡀⠤⠄⠒⠈⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠘⣀⠄⠊⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⣿⣿⣿⠃⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⡜⠘⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⣿⠀⠁⣿⢳⠁⢈⢰⡦⠈⠀⢻
⣿⣿⡏⠀⠀⢀⣀⠀⠀⡀⠀⠀⢀⠀⠀⠁⠀⠀⠈⠉⠀⠀⠀⡘⠀⢰⠛⢠⣴⣄⣌
⣿⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠁⢠⣠⡀⠀⠀⠀⠂⠀⠀⠀⠐⠀⠈⣡⠻⢹⢿
⣿⣿⠀⠀⠀⠁⠀⠀⠀⠄⠀⠀⡀⣀⣼⣟⣿⢵⣤⣤⣤⣤⣤⣤⣄⣀⣀⣠⠀⠢⣽
⣿⡿⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢐⣌⢖⣰⠊⠁⢸⣿⡟⠈⠀⢾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣾⡄⢰⢺
⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⡀⢴⢖⣠⣣⣴⣿⢿⡇⣈⠐⢺⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡀⢠⣸
⣿⣷⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠸⣼⣿⣿⣿⣿⡷⠋⠅⠀⡀⢼⣿⠯⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡇⣼⣿
⡿⠁⠸⣄⣦⡀⠀⢡⣿⣿⣿⣿⣏⡤⠄⠄⠀⠀⠈⠉⠁⠘⢿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣯⢸⣿
⠇⠀⠀⡹⢿⡏⠀⣾⣿⣟⠋⠉⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⣀⣀⠀⠀⠀⢸⣿⠎⠉⠉⠉⠛⣤⣿
⡆⠀⡀⢣⢈⡟⠠⠻⣿⣿⣷⡄⠀⠀⢸⣶⣷⣷⣧⡄⠀⠀⢿⣧⢀⡀⠀⠉⢡⣿⣿
⣿⣦⡀⠘⢼⠃⣠⡲⠛⢿⡿⣿⡀⡀⠀⠹⣿⣿⡟⠀⠠⣤⠘⣿⣶⣿⣶⡾⣳⣿⣿
⣿⡿⣿⣶⡌⠰⡅⠌⠠⠈⠈⠙⢙⠑⢰⠀⠨⠟⠀⠀⣴⢌⡅⢻⣿⣿⣿⡇⣿⣿⣿
⣿⢇⣿⣿⠣⢿⣮⠀⢀⡀⠀⠀⠈⠁⣶⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠁⠀⢡⣺⣿⣿⡿⣸⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣾⣿⣏⠐⣿⢟⡈⠂⠀⠠⠀⠀⠀⣆⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣢⣼⣸⣿⡿⢈⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⠃⡀⠈⠑⠁⠀⠄⠀⠀⠀⠲⠀⠀⠄⣀⠀⣸⣷⣮⣍⠃⢹⠇⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⢀⣾⣷⣶⣌⠀⠠⠀⠀⢀⠍⠀⠀⠀⠀⠉⠁⠈⠙⠋⢰⡝⣼⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⠋⠀⣼⣿⣿⣷⣄⠀⠀⠀⠊⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠄⡀⢀⣼⢣⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣯⠀⢸⣿⣿⣿⡟⠛⠳⣄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠘⠌⠓⡀⢰⣮⣾⢠⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣧⠀⣹⣿⣿⣿⠗⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣀⡀⠀⠈⠀⠀⠈⠝⣡⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⡏⠀⣿⣿⣿⠿⠃⢀⣴⣶⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⣾⢠⣶⣾⣮⣙⡻⣿⢿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⡇⠀⣿⣿⠃⠀⠀⣼⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡟⡼⠿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣮⡑⡝⣿⣿⣿
Why are you still here reading reviews ? 
Just buy the game to support the devs so they can complete this freaking masterpiece !
I finally found my katana zero dlc
good
Irrelevant to the review, but I beat the game in one sitting. Would do It again if I find myself with enough free time.

It may not be the hardest game, but the boss fights as well as later stages can take a good number of attempts to get through. Nothing ever felt unfair, with most of the harder sections leaving you feel satisfied with yourself.

This game is heavy on its story, with a lot of focus on the dialogue and character interactions. Fair Warning, this game will make you cry.

10/10, would play again.
This game is like if Katana Zero and Spider-Man made a baby.
came for katana zero, stayed for signalis/omori
7/10 if you want cute then play
I initially gave it a No; but playing through on Legendary (1 hit death) difficulty was actually a better experience, that and using Start to skip a bunch of talking scenes.

The music is pretty good, the story is pretty good, and the bosses are good. Though I do think the final boss (which is an hour or two before the end of the game) is a touch too difficult (or at least much more difficult than the rest of the game so you're not really prepared for it..)
I'm cold, I'm cold, Mariiiii, Mariiiiiiiiiiiiiii.... Noooooo.... NOOOOOOOOOOOOO
The feels
그......
이런 스토리를 두고 지금 저희를 파이널베타에 3달간 봉인해두셨다고요?
괘씸하네요

너무너무너무너무 재밌어요!
A solid sidescroller, controls feel great, and has a good plot. Recommend.
My favorite game of all time, without question. The full game got me cry and shi
I'm not crying, it's just raining.
I really enjoyed the game, so much that I went and 100% the achievements! Took me about 21 hours to complete it all. The music is banging, so I also bought the OST.

I really enjoy the fast pace chain arm, it reminds me very much of Speedrunners the game.
Such an amazing game with both beautiful graphics and story as well as fun and amazing mechanics . 
Easy 10/10 for me would recommend this game to anyone who enjoys platforms and a beautiful story that brought me to tears. 
Been here since the early release that stopped at the factory and can say the wait was worth every second.
Thank you for the amazing game.


Great mechanics, incredible story. *salute* (T_T)
good
PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it. PLay it.
banger
I came into this game for gameplay and gameplay alone, was not disappointed in that department even a little. For as much story as there is, it is a nice break from the gameplay.

And then the ending happened.
Very good game
My new favorite video game of all time. Well worth it, especially for the price.
TLDR: Fun game with a lot of potential. The story and gameplay have some issues but they never got in the way of enjoying the game too much for me. Since the game is early access the story isn't finished either yet but what's there is polished, I didn't encounter any bugs/glitches.

Pros:
Gameplay: The main mechanic of the grappling hook can get a bit to get used to but when you do it's super fun. 
Artstyle: Despite being pretty similar to something like katana zero in theme (pixel art cyberpunk) the game looks pretty different but still nice with energetic animations and gorgeous backgrounds. 
Story/World: What drew me in the most was the world itself, it's super interesting and I can'T wait until the story is finished and we get to know about all the secrets.

Cons: 
there are a few things that got a little bit annoying while playing.
Gameplay: Occasionally I found it difficult to keep track of the levels, what I could grapple on, where enemies were etc. Sometimes it also feels like you can't beat the level on the first try because you need to know what is off screen. [spoiler] This was mainly in the overseer section[/spoiler]
Visuals: When moving at higher speeds it got a bit difficult to distinguish which surfaces you could hook on and which you couldn't. A similar issue also happened with background sections looking too much like they're in the foreground as well.
Story: [spoiler] The story seems pretty predictable with the main characters having a plan -> something goes wrong at the final step -> they use a different plan. I also felt like the gameplay/story ratio was a bit too skewed towards story at times.[/spoiler]
좋아요
I bought this game only because SANABI close enough to Hasanabi hasL


yes i grapple with my hook irl
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡿⠿⠛⠛⠛⠋⠉⠈⠉⠉⠉⠉⠛⠻⢿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡿⠋⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠉⠛⢿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⡏⣀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣀⣤⣤⣤⣄⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⢿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⢏⣴⣿⣷⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡆⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣟⣾⣿⡟⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⢢⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢸⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣟⠀⡴⠄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⠻⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⣄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿
⣿⣿⣿⠟⠻⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠶⢴⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣧⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿
⣿⣁⡀⠀⠀⢰⢠⣦⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣼⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡄⠀⣴⣶⣿⡄⣿
⣿⡋⠀⠀⠀⠎⢸⣿⡆⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣴⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⠗⢘⣿⣟⠛⠿⣼
⣿⣿⠋⢀⡌⢰⣿⡿⢿⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⠿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡇⠀⢸⣿⣿⣧⢀⣼
⣿⣿⣷⢻⠄⠘⠛⠋⠛⠃⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢿⣧⠈⠉⠙⠛⠋⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣧⠀⠈⢸⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠟⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⢃⠀⠀⢸⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⡿⠀⠴⢗⣠⣤⣴⡶⠶⠖⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣀⡸⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⡀⢠⣾⣿⠏⠀⠠⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠛⠉⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣧⠈⢹⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣰⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⡄⠈⠃⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣠⣴⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣧⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣠⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣴⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣦⣄⣀⣀⣀⣀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠘⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⡄⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣧⠀⠀⠀⠙⣿⣿⡟⢻⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⠇⠀⠁⠀⠀⠹⣿⠃⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡿⠛⣿⣿⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢐⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿
⣿⣿⣿⣿⠿⠛⠉⠉⠁⠀⢻⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⠈⣿⣿⡿⠉⠛⠛⠛⠉⠉
⣿⡿⠋⠁⠀⠀⢀⣀⣠⡴⣸⣿⣇⡄⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⡿⠄⠙⠛⠀⣀⣠⣤⣤⠄⠀
OK ITS SPIDER-MAN WITH PIXEL ART AND FUNNYIESS THANY YOU

But honestly It was fun.
This is EASILY one of the best indie games I've ever played. A friend randomly recommended it to me and I was NOT expecting such a heavy hitter of a game. Fluid and fun gameplay, INSANE story, incredible art, bangin' soundtrack... its all here.
If you like SpeedRunners and want a bit more platforming and story, this is the one.
충분히 기대되는 게임이다
국내에서 나온거라곤 잘 믿기지 않는다..
goog gaem
Do you like Last of Us and have Elon as a bad guy?
You came to the RIGHT place
EA Action platformer + chain arm + good narrative = Fast-paced zipping through cyberpunk dystopian world. Swing, jump and climb through levels. Cool pixel graphics and scenes. Can't wait for updates.

[h1][url=https://store.steampowered.com/curator/35180752-3-point-play/] Follow our curator for similar games [/url][/h1]
Story based game with really nice platforming sections.

If you want a game with a good story, this is definitely for you.
VERY GOOD GAME, BUT THE ONE ISSUE IS THE LACK OF BOSSES IN SPEEDRUN MODE? THEY SHOULD BE THERE, LIKE KATANA ZERO
Update:
After finishing the game, i still despise the overseer escape and the car escape,
but the rest of the game is such a masterpiece, I have to look past it.
The controls are airtight, the gameplay feels badass (98% of the time).
The soundtrack is a real banger and the story.. oh the story.. you're in for a real ride.
Katana One
grapping hook big win
WHY DIDNT I FIND THIS GAME SOONER, I didn't expect this game to be so good, I just finished the story and now i'm in my feels FUCK MAN FUUUUUUUUUCK.
:(
Great game, movement is fun, boss fights are unique and fluid and the story is interesting. One small complaint is that for the majority of the game, the difficulty isn't too high (this is on hard mode). For the final stretch it moves up a notch but it would have been nice for it to be like that all the time. 

Anyway, I'd say buy it as it's pretty cheap for a decently long game with an engaging story, awesome movement system and innovative mechanics :)
REALLY FUN IF YOU LIKE FAST PACED 2D PLATFORMERS WITH COMBATI GOT IT FOR 89 CENTS ON SALE TOO

Overall, the game is fun but it has a lot of very un-fun things about it. 

Pros: Swinging around feels great most of the time and you feel very in-control of your movement. Nice, fun platforming in general, I just wish it was a little more difficult.

Cons: I don't really care about the story, so for me it had WAAAAY too many cutscenes, unskippable dialog, and slow pointless RP walking when I just wanted to get back to swinging around. My other big issue is that some of the "puzzles" have a very tight window to complete (which isn't a big deal once you know what to do) but it can be frustrating when you have to replay them multiple times because there's no way for you to know what's coming next and if you fail, you have to start over. Just zooming out a bit would honestly help this so you have at least some amount of time to react and don't automatically fail a section multiple times because you didn't predict what the next hurdle was going to be.
there's a bug in a later fight in the game (start of chapter 5, not naming for spoiler reasons) that makes them stop moving and attacking and also makes them invincible, so you have to reset the fight to continue it. but other than that, game is very cool, grappling hook based movement very good
편히 쉬십시오, 대장님.
Incredible game. There's no other way to describe this game.
great game, on veteran difficulty it took me about 9 hours to finish. story is immaculate, the ending is perfect depending on your choices up to that point
1)Cried like a b*tch
2)Now want a daughter
17.7/10
Play this game. Don't ask questions. Just play it.
I bought this game for the cool chain arm, I did not sign up to get my feelings violated like this. 11/10
A game of Action & Dreams
그저 갓겜.. 처음 해본 도트겜 할인때 12000원에 삿지만 어떻게 이게 12000원인가. 
애지간한 4-5만원 겜보다 조작감,연출,스토리 다 월등함 .  이 가격에 이정도 만족감은 너무 대단했다.
Started playing it, did not stop for six hours. A thrill ride.
Playing SANABI was such an emotional roller-coaster for me. The ending brought tears to my eyes, which is a feeling I've never experienced before while playing a game. Right from the start, the game captivated me with its compelling story. I was completely engrossed, never skipping any of the character interactions or narrative. The bittersweet and heart-wrenching tale of a father and daughter's love really touched me. However, despite the well-crafted story, the game had some issues with its mechanics and numerous bugs that often hindered my focus. As for recommending it to new players, it's a bit tricky. While the game is labeled as "not too hard," it does require fast-paced attention to obstacles and hidden objects. Additionally, it's not very controller-friendly.

안녕하세요 방송인 오마모리입니다.
산나비 재미있게 했습니다.
게임때문에 눈물이나 목이 메여서 멈칫 멈칫 했어요.
컨트롤러로 진행이 안되는것이 아쉬웠고, 이곳저곳 붙잡아도 떨어지거나, 난이도가 높은 구간이 많이 있더군요.
그정도만 빼면, 스토리 좋았구요. 딸바보와 귀여운딸에 대화는 정말 가슴에 남는 순간이였습니다.
좋은 게임 만들어 주셔서 감사합니다.

Holy shit, I bought this game on a whim not thinking much of it because I was 50/50 on it.



I ended this crying my absolute eyes out, 10/10 would play again
A diamond in the rough, this games gameplay, music, level design and story are all amazing. Why a diamond in the rough? The translation, some crucial story moments when Mari is by herself are not translated properly. If it wasn't for the shoddy translation, I would say this game is a 9/10, however someone who wants an accurate translation might like this game less so.
神中神，剧情，叙事手段满分 11/10
Hidden Gem. Must play
much better than i thought at first, second half is great
eoqkr

i have no notes please just play this game it's so good
I will play this game again and do a more in-depth review, but here's my thoughts after my first playthrough:
This game has gorgeous pixel art, satisfying movement, simple combat, and overall wasn't *too* hard (playing on normal difficulty.)
It's a lot more story-heavy than you might expect walking in, which at times is great and at other times makes me wish I could just go back to using my grapple hook. It's almost a shame to put such a fun game mechanic in such a story-heavy game. 
There's a few moments of bad level design (some jumps that you need to make offscreen with little to no indicator that that's where you need to go) and the pacing really drags during the middle, but it has a rewarding ending so overall I'd say it's worth it. Whatever this studio does next I'll be checking out. 
TL;DR this game spend half of its time ruling and the other half of the time playing like a visual novel, and both parts work well in a vacuum but together they tend to clash. A solid pick for fans of the Ori series and Night in the Woods. If neither of those games do anything for you, you probably won't be too impressed. 

Easy 10/10, with difficulty ranging from very easy to hard depending on your settings. Play for the story or stay for the gameplay, either way it's a game worth trying.
A great game, gives vibes of katana zero but is it's own game completely. Great humor, incredible art, and phenomenal game play. 10/10

I thought everyone was exaggerating but, damn this game had me messed up. Well worth the price of admission.
Just finished it.  The soundtrack, the story, the movement... it took me a while to get used to swinging but once I was able to consistently get movement going (and not getting stuck on moving corners, pretty much my only quibble) I felt like I was inbincible!  Absolutely glad I played, which is what drove me to write this review, when I never write reviews.
What an absolutely stellar game.

Sanabi succeeds in every way that a game should or can. The gameplay is fast, fluid, and satisfying to master. The story is well-paced with an excellent finish. The music is awesome and does a great job of adding to the narrative weight of heavy scenes and jamming out when you're platforming across the levels. The pixel artstyle is beautiful and expressive, with each of the game's regions being memorable and distinct. It's the full package at a very reasonable price point and I'd recommend it in a heartbeat to pretty much anyone who likes action games and great stories.
Absolutely fabulous game.. 20 hours of wonder, emotion and surprise in a fast-paced gameplay with progressing abilities.. the story is rich, nothing over the top, well build and well revealed.. got it for 10 bucks at a sale, it is worth more..
Finally finished the game offline and might I say one of the best games I've played great story great music and amazing concept I hope to see more in the future
fucking phenomenal better than katana zero
i cried
story is beautiful, made me cry like a baby.
gameplay is smooth and fun.
music is emotional and awesome.
there are minor mistranslations and typos.

9.8/10. one of my favorite games of all-time.
it has a melee reference
peak
Amazing story
so far this game feels amazeing to play love it
why am i crying
My heart can't take much more of games like these
Very very good 9.9/10
Oh, right! Don't worry, I won't [b]spoil[/b] anything. You should watch for yourself.
Bro, this is a masterpiece it's AMAZING! This is more than a game.
Amazing & interesting story & characters, fun gameplay & atmosphere and great soundtracks.
That was a very good experience that I had with this game, especially at the end.
It's such a underrated jam to be honest, I recommend to give it a shot.

It would have been awesome, if this game had a level editor & a modding community like Celeste does because this game has also the potential to it.
Holy crap, I just finished the game and Im honestly amazed. Such a good story, such a good platformer. Honestly words cant even begin to describe how this made me feel. Literally a must play for everyone and anyone, I was in genuine ugly tears by the time I finished, one of the most hard hitting moments Ive experienced in a game, I just cant.
뻔해서 충분히 예상되는 맛 그래서 더 맛있는 맛
The harmonica is the worst instrument in the reed family

also funny loland reference for some reason
Excellent indie platformer. Easily worth the $10 price.
good play now
(spoiler-free review)
What I liked:
 - Game play was fun and was engaging, starting out can feel a bit rough with the lack of abilities you have.
 - Beautiful visuals.
 - Amazing music.
 - Decent enough level design and progression.

What I disliked:
 - English translation issues; A lot of redundant wording and odd phrasing. This is a glaring issue on such a seriously-toned story-heavy game.
 - Pacing is a bit rough; game is often interrupted by story/character developments
 - Story is a bit predictable, I found out the main twist about 3 hours in. The characters will beat you over the head with clues to the point where it's almost funny.  
 - undeserved quick-time-events, It happens so rarely that I might as well not mention it, but sometimes the game wants you to "press the button fast" or "hold the button" for no good reason. Might be just nitpicking here but it fails to convey any tension or drama at all, and it feels very out of place.

tl;dr
Overall, a good experience with the potential to be a great one, all it really needs is a better English translation. If you keep in mind the "general concept" of what is being said, so much as what's literally being said, you can look past it pretty easily.
Plays like Katana Zero with more focus on platforming than combat.
i wasn't planning to spend my whole day playing this, but here we are. 11/10 play the game
This game is a masterpiece. Amazing pixel art, great soundtrack, and fun gameplay.

I'm not gonna talk about the story, other than the fact that it is peak and is best experienced yourself. Bought a game thinking it would be pretty good, had my expectations blown into the stratosphere.
I'm going to say this right now. This is officially the best game I have ever played! This game is also the first game ever to get me choked up. The storytelling, the scenery, the characters everything about it was so enjoyable from beginning to end. If you haven't played this game, I suggest you do. Money and game time were very much well spent!
terrible story awful i hated every second of that ending 10/10
Outstanding gameplay and movement mechanics, touching story.

Amazing game on the same level as Katana Zero.
In order the fill the void in my heart left by Katana ZERO I've found this game and now I have a new hole in heart, what an magnificent game, what an emotional story
This game is in my top 10 platform games :D
Before playing: This'll probably be a pretty decent clone of Katana Zero/
After playing: INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN INNOCENCE IS A SIN
A korean man played ori and the blind forest, then played katana zero and went, I could make that. And god damn, he could. This game is criminally underrated, an easy buy, even when not on sale.
good
Tired. Ran out of tissue.
holy fuck i've never cried so much for a game
Gotta go fast, with feels and a plot
2nd ever game to make me cry. Get this if you can, you wont regret it.
Came for the grappling hook and cyberpunk vibe, got drawn into the storytelling. The gameplay is cool, offering an emotional rollercoaster. While the pacing in the final section feels a bit off, the ending definitely pays off.
Amazing
I'm trash at this game but that doesn't stop me from bawling my eyes out
innocence is a sin.
This is a Slow Burn game. For those who might be tempted to stop this game after playing for only the first few hours, I highly suggest you to stick to the end for 1 of the most well written and emotional roller coaster of your life.

10/10 Indie Game.
fun gameplay. better story. don't play if not willing to cry
made me want to go hug my daughter

i dont have a daughter
Great plot and dystopian environment. I would love a sequel as it's just generally very entertaining.
Cute storytelling
This game ticks a LOT of my boxes!

Great mechanics, GREAT story, great visuals and sound, and the ending made me cry.

PLEASE play this game it's amazing!!
10/10
What is this game, I bought it intending to play a funny grapple hook game, not to get my heart broken.

10/10 will play again.
This game was sold to me as "Katana Zero with a grappling hook" and that alone was enough to sell me on it. What I didn't expect was that I would blast my way through this game, and end it with tears in my eyes. Play this game. It has amazing music, a fantastic and well told story, super fun gameplay, and beautiful art. Again: Play it now.
One of the best platformers i have played
SANABI
great platformer with a lovely art-style. Grapple-hook mechanics are always fun and this is no different, the freedom it gives feels fantastic and only spider-man does swinging better. But what stands out here is the story, just incredible. Only people with a rock for a soul will get through this with dry eyes.
good game
fine. do better
God...
What happened?
I bought this game on a whim, a Korean Katana Zero clone made dirt cheap by the Christmas summer sale. I expected fun enough gameplay and a passable story that played off what I believed was its obvious inspiration.
What I did not expect was to be left a blubbering wreck by the credits.
I am a game quitter. Many of the games that I enjoy sit at best three quarters complete, and this is nothing to do with how much I like or dislike these games, I suppose I just have a low attention span. Sanabi is one of the few games that has had my ass glued to my chair as I became utterly absorbed in the gameplay, story, art, etc. I would not mind this game having fourteen or more additional hours of bonus content, but as tight as it is, I can't complain. I will be watching this developer with great interest on any projects they attempt in the future.
Thank you for coming to my TED talk. The exit is on the right, and the "buy" button for this game should be located somewhere underneath the screenshots on the store page. Enjoy!
Katana Zero but more story-heavy.
The movement/combat system is very fun and fluid. Music is great. However, the dialogue does interrupt the flow of gameplay often. And the story made me cry :(

8.5/10 I wish I had a daughter
The story is not bad, i love the gameplay its smooth and fun
fun movement good story only problem is dialogue feels slow and interrupts gameplay
It hurts, it burns, the game does make you cry,
that is to say, the art is more than Amazing,
the music is very good, and the characters are engaging.
My only issue is that is quite short, and that dificulty wise it is easy, don't expect something like "celeste"
The English translation is a bit rough at times, but overall the story is still intact and impactful. I strongly recommend this game to those who enjoy solid platforming and story telling.
买口琴去了，差女儿
[h2] 10/10 Instant New Favorite Game [/h2]

If you have ever liked a single action platformer, or if you're the type to remember a game's story more than anything else about it, [B]you need to play this game.[/b]
Rarely do I encounter a game so good and so artistic that I purchase it three times within a week of first hearing about it. (For those curious, I gifted it twice immediately after finishing it, and the 20% discount of the winter sale contributed to that decision.)

The emotional hook is instant, and caries strong through the entire story. No other game has come close to the level of emotional impact SANABI can provide, and I hope I'm wrong when I say nothing will again. The gameplay starts a little later, but is very easy to pick up and becomes familiar and extremely satisfying in no time. Every single environment, every single character, is crafted to perfection and refined even further into a masterpiece. Just look at how many reviews are positive here, and ask yourself if so many people can be wrong about a game this good?

To be clear: This game is NOT for everyone. There are people who will find it too easy, there are people who will find sections too difficult. There are people who will find the story too short, there are people who will take issue with the story slowing down a fast-paced platformer. There are people who will love this game as much as I do and people who will find a flaw to fixate on and let it ruin their enjoyment of it. At the end of the day, the issues some people may take do not stop this game from being a masterpiece, as no game can be all things to all people. But if from this description you think you may like the game, then you should absolutely give it a shot.
:(
Fluid mechanics, I am glad the levels did not get even more difficult as it would break the story flow (I was so worried the levels would turn into levels like B-side in Celeste) as it became apparent there are no separate branching level designs for additional challenges. 
The story is really good. Definitely go in blind, it is worth the price.
the main gameplay loop is addicting and the story was enthralling
be prepared for sadness
wow! This game story blew my mind, I literally couldn't sleep before finishing the whole thing in one day....
Never cried this hard from a game before. 10/10 masterpiece
i grapplehooked punched and dashed my way up mago city, in this wonderful game that also has a pretty good story.
Calling this "Katana Zero with a grappling hook" is a gross understatement of how good this game is
This is one of the greatest games ever made, I only bought it because I liked the graphics and grappling hooks are rad.


My life will never be the same.
Incredible fucking work. Everything hit me like a truck.
Somehow got the good ending in my first try out of pure intuition.

Can't suggest this game enough. Genuinely.
Prepare to cry.
https://tenor.com/view/its-peak-peak-fiction-one-piece-gif-26139262
fast action, strong progression of main character's power and gripping story with twists and turns.

In a world of wonderful 2023 games, definitely one of the hidden gems
I really like how the game uses your eyes tears to make itself harder, brilliant level design
I came looking for cool combat with grappling hook and found emotional damage.
10/10 
Would cry again.
I didn't expect this game to absolutely destroy me emotionally at the end, so much so I cried like a little bitch. 
I played a fun platforming game with some hook arm combat and jumping around huge areas, but instead got hit by the most unexpected heart pulling story I could have imagined. It's incredible, if you are still on the fence if you should play SANABI, don't wait, play it right now!
맛있다
The platforming feels amazing, the writing is great, and it made me cry for a solid 20 minutes straight, 10/10 its amazing
went in blind, was not disappointed.

movement is fluid and satisfying, combat is quick and gratifying. the pixel scenery is beautiful. the story... i don't want to spoil it, but it's an excellent story - well worth finishing. 

if you enjoy platformers, even a little, play this game.  


I think there are two things you should know if you're thinking about playing this game:

First, it has some of the best platforming/grappling controls I've ever seen, and does a fantastic job of pushing the player without punishing the player. Ideal.

Second, the story at the start will seem very paint-by-numbers action hero fare - charmingly so, but still. Don't spoil yourself, but trust that the developers did that deliberately so that they could play with it later to create a very good story when all's said and done.
Excellent story-driven platformer. Good characters and compelling story that leans heavily on tropes at the beginning but gradually becomes more interesting.
An excellent action-platformer based around a grappling hook.  Controls are occasionally wonky, but it plays pretty well overall.  The best part is the story though, which is mysterious and intriguing while still managing to tie everything up in a beautifully emotional ending.  I won't forget this one for quite some time.
Excellent action platformer with an interesting story and beautiful art. It's a little slow to take off and kinda story-heavy at the beginning for my taste, but I was happy that I kept playing.
This game left me speechless, I loved everything about it, from the seamless gameplay to the emotional and intriguing story. I wish I could experience it all over again. 10/10
if you liked katana zero and are waiting for the dlc (like me) this game is definitely for you!! 
definitely inspired by kz, but plays very differently. love the movement, its great when you get good at it!! 
the story is so good its peak i fear. made me cry like a bitch (positive)
This game is good. Ending destroyed me.
금잔디와 잔나비
I came in with high expectations and they were met and possibly exceeded.
kind of like john wick, but getting to the end isn't what's important.
Seriously, I hate you guys. You just destroyed me. What the hell was that intro huh? And you know what? I KNEW IT! I knew what you were doing and I still played! I hate you so so so much!

Anyway. Gameplay, totally worth it. Tight controls and totally satisfying. 
Story. If you are into revenge stories. This is for you. I haven't finished the game yet. I just know the types of games. This game is good. 

BUT. Don't play it if you want to keep your good mood intact. Seriously I want to cry. This game is brutal, storywise.
Stop reading the reviews and buy the game.
Outstanding game, a good platformer with great ost and story. If you loved KatanaZero you will love this game as well.
this game is awesome, i cried
Well, I just beat the game and I have to say. This was probably one of the most unique experiences I've had in a game in a LONG TIME. Everything from the story, to the music and the gameplay was so wonderful. My only complaint I have is with one of the aspects of the gameplay, getting stun locked and dying in those DAMN RED BOX DANGER ZONES, it really kinda broke the flow of the gameplay, if you get caught in them the knockback from taking damage knocks you back into them making it impossible to get out of it and just ends up killing you. So yeah that;s my only complaint though. Everything else was PERFECT. The story had a twist I didn't see coming even with the constant hints they kept dropping to me. The story will really make your heart throb. The game does have some slight Katana ZERO vibes but I honestly found this game a lot more enjoyable compared to Katana ZERO overall. This game is a MUST PLAY!
good game :D
Fantastic story. Game play is fun, characters are amazing, and awesome twist. Left me crying my eyes out. 10/10 amazing game and the music is amazing.
I'd been looking for a new game to play for a while, and when I saw SANABI on the store page, its visuals and story setting immediately drew my attention. I had never heard of it before, but seeing the overwhelmingly positive review score, I decided to listen to what seemed to be the general consensus and go in blind. Now, after having finished the game, I absolutely agree with the sentiment. The story in this game is deep and emotional, and full of twists and turns. I can't, in good faith, say more than that, and if you have any interest at all in this game, go in completely blind. The gameplay revolves around your grappling hook arm, and features a lot of aerial movement. The game provides a decent challenge, and has incredibly fun and fluid movement that makes it feel good to go fast and pull off tricks, or just finish certain more difficult sections. The controls are responsive, and you can feel your momentum carry over in your movement without feeling too floaty. The combat in the game is an extension of the movement system, and fighting enemies furthers the momentum instead of bringing the gameplay to a halt. The pixel art is nothing short of beautiful, with several unique and cinematic locations and backgrounds. I will say, the English translation isn't perfect, and there are some lines that don't quite make sense and need to be read over more than once, but it was still very understandable and didn't really hamper my enjoyment of the story. I would absolutely recommend the game, especially if you like platformers, pixel art, and crying over said pixel art.
Sanabi really caught me off guard, I think that it's important to go in knowing that about half of the game is story in the form of dialogue or cutscenes. That said, the story kept me entertained and the gameplay itself is really fluid. Instead of becoming more powerful throughout the game, most of the progression comes from movement, which is interesting.
Holy hell this game is good. I honestly can't think of a single thing wrong with it  The gameplay is the most fun I've had in a game like this in such a long time. The characters are well written and the art and animations are superb also. When I finished I was left feeling so many emotions and I need more people to check this game out. Fantastic story, world, characters, boss fights. Amazing plot twist also!! Please play this game!!!!!!!!
i cried, so good, pls play
gameplay- 9.5-10 (smol qol changes can help some gameplay issues with the hooK mechanics late game)
story- 14-10 ( i loved skul the hero slayer and the pacing in this reminded me alot of the style used to write that game)
innovation - 10-10 takes alot of homage from other games but also has its own flare that you'll love
artwork- 10-10 some of the most beautiful pixels ive seen ( only issue may be accesibility for people who want less crazyness on screen this game may be confusing at times!)

BUT GOD IF ONLY FOR THE STORY PLAY THIS GAME
طناخه

ending made me cry time to play it again
Fantastic gameplay with cute and detailed pixel art, music that immerses you plus a story that i will count as one of my favorites for a long while to come.
Played on the steam deck without any issues.
Enjoyable movement and combat, with a nice story to boot. I only wish the levels allowed for a bit more freedom of movement - the game has satisfying traversal that rarely gets to truly shine outside of boss fights.
Amazing story
10/10
"Do not cry" challenge. 
Level: Impossible. 

Why does the samurai and little kid got to be so sad.
good
Great game
:'(
Gameplay 7/10
Visuals 9/10
Story 9/10
please play this for the love of god

11/10 First time crying from an indie game's story since To the Moon years ago. 
Very well written story and fun mechanics, definitely the best indie game of 2023.
AMAZING game! Very satisfying platformer with a great story and some awesome moments.
Shit was too peak my eye sockets became dry from crying
Showed a friend this game to watch the adorable sparkles and flailing game play, stayed for the the soul wrenching story. Excellent game all around, only sadness is how it managed to fly so hard under the radar.
chain arm go weeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
'Getting to the end is not important.'
Me, dying 39 times at the Major bossfight:'Hear, hear!'
9/10 Top 3 indie of the year.
30 minutes in and I can already confidently say this game is going to be a fing masterpiece. Holly sh**t the sound design, animation, camera work, dialogue... stellar work all around.
We are the owls that never cry...
Great gameplay, pixel art, soundtrack and story. The grapplinmg is well executed and feels really great to use. The characters are great and full of emotion.  The writing and setting reminds me of Katana Zero, but I liked this story quite a bit more. The translation is a bit rough in a few places, but nothing that takes you out of the experience. I hope this gets more attention outside of Korea, cause it really deserves to be better known
Good
made my cry several times

a masterpiece worth every nickel
Awesome, fluid movement, great fights, and onions, and ninjas cutting them
[i] The game is pretty heavy on the story so there's a significant amount of reading, but man is it good. They story alone kept me playing this game for all 11 hours until I beat it in one sitting. I felt rather motivated to make it to the next screen as fast and efficiently as possible in order to achieve my objective and learn more about what is going on in this cursed city. [/i]

The gameplay I found a bit easy at times and a handful of b.s. deaths in all my 11 hours to fully beat it. Literally just a handful, the moments where it felt unfair were exceedingly rare. It's solid, responsive and fun but nothing too amazing or innovative that'll make me want to come back to it much. Its does its job and it does it well. Specially with how many gameplay elements are carefully introduced and woven into story moments to where its just obvious what to do in the next scene without having a popup, tutorial message nor obnoxious highlights and arrows pointing to "USE THIS BOMB HERE"

Now where the game TRULY shines for me is in the story. There is plenty of foreshadowing and things that were carefully written to keep the world consistent and making sense even among the insanity of what the main character is going through. Granted there are a couple odd translation moments but no typos nor anything that will just pull you out of it and ruin the moment. Everything is always clear and easy to understand, just a couple oddities with the way the languages work such as not knowing which pronoun to use on a specific character. Simply put its amazing. From the tutorials playing with the character's daughter the story is already digging its hooks into you and all the time its building up to the final grand reveal. A reveal that if you were paying attention from the beginning you could largely piece together already but is still satisfying in how it shows you the details of how everything happened and comes together.
slight spoiler: [spoiler] pay attention to how the characters talk phrases they say, you'll notice patterns* [/spoiler]
I cried
I cried
Great movement, great story, pacing and cutscenes were a little gratuitous. Would recommend.
10 steel tigers out of 10
*cries
Buy and play Sanabi, you dont need to know more
this game does have some difficulty spikes but this movement/combat is fun. the devs did an amazing job with the pixel art, soundtrack, and story as well. one of the few games that has made me cry and i can't wait to see what this dev team does next
Slight issues with localization aside, the story is great and gameplay is smooth and engaging. An unexpectedly good (and sad) time.
art is a 10/10, game play is also a 10/10 and the story lands a 12/10
this might be the best cyberpunk game I have played
질질짜는범 추가
Came for the gameplay, hooked by the gameplay, hit with a truck by the story. This game is so goddamned good I'm kicking myself for not playing it earlier.
This game is psychotic. It builds up the story, throws you for so many loops you get sick, makes you feel like a total badass and then rips your heart in half. It also put me in the credits. Based game, ඞ/10
very fun
Grappling loop is pretty good. Certain boss is a bit long. [spoiler] The fucken core boss [/spoiler]
Mari is so adorable
Epic gameplay, epic story, just the right length, 9/10
Movement so fluid it's a fucking plasma
this game is amazing please play it
I've only cried playing two different games before. That number is now three. 

The gameplay feels like a mix of Celeste and Hollow Knight with a grappling hook mechanic. 

This game is very story rich with a fair amount of cutscenes between gameplay. You can skip them, but please for the love of god pay attention to them for the best experience. As I said before, it's a game that'll make you cry if you're invested in the story. 

Other than some minor translation hiccups, (understandable for a Korean-based dev team) my only gripe with the game is this one boss fight ([spoiler]the flying trains one[/spoiler]) that goes on way too long, isn't exactly intuitive, and way too easy to die and have to restart the fight.

Overall, 9.8/10 game, would cry again o7
9/10 this is what you call SOUL
This game is an actual masterpiece, it has an amazing story, an extremely interesting world, top notch gameplay and deep characters.

It's artstyle is gushing with identity, it's animations have a flow I've only ever seen in Katana Zero.

The gameplay is extremely unique in the way the Swings feel, it's something unparalleled, the boss fights are amazing, only one has kinda frustrated me, but it still is pretty fun

This is one of the few 10/10 I've ever given in my life, and this game won it with flying colors
I don't think I've played a game that has made me bawl my eyes out this much in many years
10/10 Gameplay
10/10 Story
10/10 Mechanics
10/10 Plot-twists
10/10 Father Figure
I can confidently say SANABI is probably one of the best games I've ever played. 
TL;DR: Amazing game, play it now, thanks Wonder Potion for making something this good.

Most games have movement systems that make either the combat OR the platforming engaging, leaving the other as boring filler that unnecessarily fills up the game. This game capitalizes on both, having some of the most fun combat AND platforming of any game I've ever played. How does it achieve this? The protagonist's signature chain arm and other movement abilities, beyond being cool as heck, give the player unrestricted freedom over exactly where they need to go, how fast they need to get there, whether they need invincibility frames when getting there, etc. Pretty much any mistake or screw-up in this game is entirely the player's fault, while every success is a result of the player's skill, and adds to the feeling of flow the game allows. There's no better feeling than being able to breeze through multiple checkpoints in a row without dying or falling out of the map. 

The game offers different difficulty options for different people based on the experience they want (ex: I would imagine someone wanting to experience the story alone would probably pick Easy, where your character doesn't take damage, while people who want a challenging experience may pick Veteran(hard) or Legend(one HP)), so players have some level of control over their experience.  

As for the actual content in the game itself, the game is roughly 15 hours long with 5 levels. Each level has a different setting, platforming mechanics, BGM (this game has a really good soundtrack), and enemies. While different, all of these levels are fun and enable a player to achieve the flow state I was discussing earlier. The last level in particular is what I believe to be the best level I've ever played through in a video game in terms of mechanics, writing, and pure fun factor. Furthermore, there are a number of bosses spread throughout the game, all of which are fair, look pretty cool, and are a blast to fight. 

Visuals: well, you've seen the trailers. The game looks gorgeous, with a beautiful pixel-crafted world that encapsulates the futuristic city we all imagined in our heads. The game uses visuals well, never being too overbearing and never taking away from the gameplay while perfectly telling the story of the place you're in. Furthermore, animations are solid as well, making the protagonist look cool as the player platforms through these levels while ripping apart every enemy in sight. 

For the game's plot, I won't say anything except that it's really good. The plot centers around two characters, and their interactions throughout the game made me smile, laugh, and tear up at different points throughout the game. If you like a story with well written characters, play this game.

It's a great game, and you should definitely play it, especially if you like action platformers like Katana ZERO.
Touching story.
AMAZING 10/10 story, gameplay, pixel arts
I'm glad that I came across this game. Probably one of the most outstanding games I've ever played.
1. Story ✅
2. Visuals ✅
3. Gameplay ✅
4. Action ✅
5. Game of the year ✅ ;)
When starting out the game I thought it was just a good ole fashion Father on a raging vengeance for his cute Daughter with a Katana Zero vibe and a funny grapple hook. Oh boi did I get bambozzled so hard in predicting the story when I've only gathered a small piece of info before getting slapped in the face. HAHAH IM NOT SAD YOU ARE :_:
baller
SANABI is a 2D platformer focused on grapple hook based gameplay alongside a banging soundtrack and a particularly enjoyable story. The feel of each grapple mechanic was great and the level design was quite intuitive overall. Definitely worth checking this one out.
这游戏有不少小毛病，但核心机制、故事、演出都值得一赞。
Every hello ends with a goodbye.
so glad i spent the entire day playing this instead of doing my work
A absolute masterpiece
:sob:
Just a really cool game. Fast, fluid grappling-based platforming that gains just enough nuance with level design just engaging enough to stay fresh over the game's (admittedly pretty slim) runtime. Like, I do have my minor gripes - waaaay too many kill rooms in the second zone, some of the cycles in the latter half of the factory are a bit too unforgiving, generally the boss design feels overly punishing compared to the rest of the game, and I really do not like the "dash" move added to the kit towards the end of the game - it just feels like a second, worse version of a thing I already have and the targeting reticle just, doesn't always wanna show up but these are all relative nitpicks when 95% of the time I'm having the time of my life and the game isn't exactly that difficult anyways.

And the plot is really well done - especially impressed by the localization, which, despite the occasional grammatical error, still captures the personality and charm of the characters pretty naturally, and the story has just the right amount of foreshadowing and suspense to keep you hooked and some really well-handled reveals towards the end, it's shocking and compelling but always seems to take itself the right level of serious.

Like... it's not a game that utterly blows my mind, in any way, it's just really damn good all-around and runs just the right length to let its story breathe without overstaying its welcome. Also yeah the visuals and music are great throughout too but that's kinda self-evident. Play this game, you won't regret it.
Good game, had me crying at the end.
Masterpiece
(currently in car escape segment, will update later)

Great game, fluid movement, great artstyle. Would be a 10/10 if not for the fact that several segments very much outstay their welcome (tutorial, factory, that kinda deal)
Wow.
Amazing game. Just buy it.
Its a good game. Excellent platformer, gameplay is a blast, beautiful pixel art, the history can be a little bit cliche sometimes but its catchy and fun.  Play it. Its worth it.
[h1]Innocence is a Sin and Ungovernable Talent is a Curse.[/h1] 

[b]11/10 Game[/b]

Cool mechanics, Nice gameplay, Good dificulty curve, Excellent story with great plotwists near the end. 
Totally worth your money and your time

[spoiler]Buy it and cry with us[/spoiler]
Sanabi, a game that opens with lovely visuals and an intriguing plot, leading into a beautiful story, breathtaking scenes, and really fun platforming, with a killer soundtrack to boot. 

I'm in tears, What an incredible example of Games as an art, I cannot recommend it enough.
휴지 5장 밖에 안썼다
An incredible experience, super fun gameplay and a story that will stay etched into my mind for a long time !
Loved this game from start to finish. Amazing feel to movement, great visuals and a heartwarming story. Love this game. It had a couple annoying moments, the most annoying one being the helicopter boss, but it is nothing in comparisson to how great the game was.
8.2/10 Highly recommend; however, if the game had ended in the first half, I would have rated it significantly lower. The gameplay picks up a noticeable amount and the story really starts to come together meaningfully. Though it's worth powering through some of the more annoying parts to experience the last few hours of the game, getting to the end is not what's important...
2D, Terraria, Cyberpunk, Banger Soundtrack
10/10 Highly recommend this.
A pretty interesting story with a cool twist.
Game wise, it's pretty fun and can be more challenging that anticipated.
Overall, the game is pretty good.

At first I was a little put-off by the sheer amount of cutscenes, but the story was really good so I don't mind so much. The gameplay was super fun though, and don't get me wrong there was quite a bit of it, but I'd say you're maybe watching cutscenes close to half the time. The ending got me choked up, I think the characters are really charming and there's some very interesting plot twists. The chain arm swinging feels really good and is very fun to use.
This is why you hold "best game of the year" awards in January!

This is the best game of the year, no questions asked!

Without saying to much a wonderfully bitter sweet cyberpunk revenge story, that plays as smooth as butter on warm toast.

Play it, you deserve it!
Sanabi has absolutely beautiful pixel art/animation and a story I enjoyed.

I did however find it pretty difficult starting about halfway through the game, even after kicking the difficulty down to easy. Some sequences and bosses became very frustrating after numerous failed attempts. The pacing of the game (especially late game) is also hurt by the jerky stop and go between gameplay and story cutscenes, which is only partially alleviated by the quality of the story.

That said, it is a title I would recommend.
Great game. The platforming is fun yet challenging, while the game allows for adjustments in the difficulty for people who might find it to difficult, or too easy. However, more precise controls seem to be quite hard to pull off. The story, while not without its flaws, is great and heartwarming. The artstyle is pleasing as well. All in all, great game.
Very good
"Getting all the way to the end is not what's important!"


11/10 i'm crying rn
Yo what's it with recent platformers being unexpectedly emotional and having engaging, witty dialogue scenes which only use sound effects and creative visual presentation to convey the emotions better than some games seem to manage with voice actors?

What I'm getting at is this is very similar to Katana Zero in the sense that it's all of the above, but with a grappling hook instead of a sword. Both games have caused me to unexpectedly tear up, reload a challenge upwards of 100 times, and zig-zag around a room killing everything in sight, feeling like a 𝒇𝒐𝒐𝒌𝒊𝒏' 𝒍𝒆𝒈𝒆𝒏𝒅. So if you liked KZ, you'll probably like this too.

Bear in mind I'm writing this after just one session playing it, but it was a mighty session, the prologue/intro was great.
The Overwhelmingly Positive rating is well deserved. Originally, I was getting the impression this was a mid platformer with some nice graphics, but the game manages to stay fresh with each new area introducing one or two new mechanics which are combined well with previous ones. I would say you can tell by the 2nd area or so if this game is for you. I won't focus much on the positives here are my negatives:

- The early story is sloooow. Not a slog, just slow, with more than a couple walking segments. I can see this would put off a lot of people from otherwise fast paced game unfortunately, but it only happens near the beginning.

- The mystery of the story takes a while to start resolving, but by the time it does start, you kind of already know what the answers are going to be. Not to say it's unoriginal, but the themes have been tread before. That being said, I really like how this game's story plays out. I was interested all the way through to figure out what is going on. Some minor things are confusing at the end, and I spotted more than 1 plot hole, but it's nothing major.

- There is a gauntlet at the end. The game has frequent saves so it's not a gameplay problem, but you're running through areas you've already been to, which is always annoying to me. Thankfully it is a lot faster this time around. That reminds me,

- Levels are quite long some times. I finished in 9.8 hrs, and I played in one day in one sitting (because I really wanted to see how story pans out) so probably closer to 7 hours. On one hand, there is a lot of gameplay here, but at the same time a lot of that gameplay is the same mechanic throughout a level. It's not that the character is slow or anything either, the levels just start to drag at some point, especially Chapter 3 levels.

- The boss near the end is annoyingly hard. I don't even know if I want to come back and do Legendary because of how annoying that boss was to fight.

Overall, I will say the mystery and theme carries this game more than the gameplay. The gameplay is nice but I can easily see how it can feel padded or samey and boring. Unlike Katana Zero, if the game starts easy for you, it ends feeling just as easy. But if this isn't a deal breaker for you, it's a good game. Just a really well put together game with a really good story.
Revising my review to grant it a perfect 10/10 score. I now consider this game to be my favorite platformer.

To start off, the story is amazing. It's hard to find games nowadays with such a solid story which is not only captivating but had me constantly thinking about what is to come next even when I wasn't playing the game.

Characters are fleshed out, expressive, and you really end up feeling a connection with each and every core character that are introduced.

The developers deserve a big round of applause for creating such an immersive environment despite the game being limited to pixel art. All the environments are unique, and it felt like I was looking at a piece of art. I often found myself pausing in awe at the breathtaking landscapes, which further enhanced my immersion in the game. You can tell that a lot of love and effort has gone into this game.

Gameplay was also fantastic. Mechanics continued to evolve, boss fights were unique and exciting, mob diversity kept things interesting, and anything that initially felt redundant proved to have significant meaning later, which made me appreciate the game that much more.

All in all, this indie game surpassed my expectations by far, and out-shined many of the recent AAA game releases. I strongly recommend purchasing the game, especially given its price but the content it comes with, you really can't go wrong.

Super happy that I decided to give this game a try. What a masterpiece.
Katana zero tier nuff said
Great graphics, fun and addictive gameplay, beautiful story, profound commentaries on elon musk
after playing celeste i was looking for similar games and bought this 
i thought it would be a funny platforming experience with a grapling hook but got hit with a huge baaaanger
the story is amazing, controls are satisfying and you feel kinda slick destroying all the robots while swinging like tarzan (but in cool)
impossible to not cry at the end

and hop into the negative reviews of this game after playing can highly recommend - the ammount of unskilled and delusional clowns is unmatched
I've been on Steam for 15 years and I think this is the first serious review I write for a game I bought. I expected to have fun, I expected gorgeous pixel art animation, I expected really good art direction, I expected really good music and I expected sphincter tightening action.

What I didn't expect was to cry like a little bitch. Sanabi is easily the best game I've played in 2023 and in my top 5 of games I've played since 2020. It's just that good. I beg of you, please support this developper. They have done some truly masterful work that would put any major studios to shame and they deserve a lot more recognition. I sincerely hope we see more of WONDER POTION in the future.
Its rare to find an impactful indie game that is both very fun to progress through both from a narrative and a gameplay perspective. I absolutely loved the gameplay with the simple yet satisfying chain-swinging and feeling like a BAMF when you start getting better and fly through rooms tearing everything in your way.

Did not expect to start crying like a ***** though. 9/10. A beautiful experience from start to end.
게임도 잘만들어졌고,
스토리가 정말 좋습니다.. 
연출이 기가막힘.
the game is so sad yet so wholesome, it has amazing pixel art and a sad story and the movement is fluid
Amazing
Great platformer with amazing pixel animations.

[spoiler]Made me cry[/spoiler]
A action platformer that's centered around swinging and attacking with a chain arm. I died a handful of times due to my clumsy maneuvering and screwing things up, so there's a bit of punch to the game's difficulty that I appreciate. This game was at it's peak when you get into a flow state and start to zip through the puzzle elements and enemies. So, there's a lot of skill to be tested in your execution of chain grabs and swinging and probably dozens of hours for people who get hooked on speed running or replaying on the highest difficulty.

Finally, I'll give credit where it's due for story. It took a while for me to warm up to it, but eventually the plot builds up towards some pretty emotional moments that feel well earned. First impressions felt corny but I certainly wouldn't drop the game if the story doesn't affect you, because the game itself is quite good.
tl;dr - good game, 9/10, scratches the katana zero itch very well, plot is likely to be something you're invested in once you've played for a bit.

Long version:
Got onto my radar from a friend who had wishlisted it when we were swapping games we were interested in that were releasing soon/had released recently - must say, didn't disappoint - this scratched the itch Katana Zero left me with perfectly and I think has forever ruined games with grappling hooks for me now.

Gameplay wise:
I have a few gripes with one specific segment in the factory, and a couple of the hazard layouts in the final levels - but overall have no complaints outside of those.

Story wise:
Fuck man, I wasn't expecting what happened. Those reviews saying that its hard to play through the tears are right.
Vague spoilers in the box for general plot [spoiler] Started off fairly generic with the revenge plot, got a bit weird when I noticed a musk stand-in, had a few moments where I went ???? because Mari or Mister acted out of character for what they'd displayed so far but I assumed that was a translation thing. Some of them probably still are a translation thing - but a good chunk of them are actually wrapped up towards/at the end of the game and aren't out of character so much as not fully explained yet because you don't have the full picture and couldn't have until that point. [/spoiler]
:) :) :) :) :)
Beautiful story, music, and aesthetics. Fast pace game and well worth every dollar.
Eastward with faster gameplay
SANABI feels like two separate games slammed together, and the result turns out better than I ever would have expected.

It's a fast-paced, high-flying grappling hook-based platformer. And it's also a poignant, gut-wrenching story about dying to get revenge and living with regret.

Those two things don't sound like they really go together, and there was a point when I felt like they didn't. I almost quit the game because I was tired of it getting its own way. How many times is this game going to stop me in the middle of an intense grappling hook section to dump more talking heads in my lap?

But I'm glad I stuck with because the payoff is more than worth it. 

The grappling hook goodness, the surprisingly gripping story, the gorgeous and emotive pixel art that makes the characters come alive more than a lot of AAA games, and one of the best video game soundtracks ever recorded -- this game has so much going for it. 

Highly, highly recommended
Penis
Pretty good game if you love katana zero, fast movement or crying.
"It... It sounded pretty good this time, right?"

It did, and it made me cry.
grappling hook :)
very fluid fast-paced grappling hook movement. great story, awesome music, and amazing pixel art.
I think if you liked Katana Zero you'll like this game a lot
GOTY 2023
ㅠㅠㅠ
incredible grappling hook, good story
its overwhelmingly positive for a reason
The best story in a game ever made
Brainfart
Really enjoyed this game.. until i reached the half of it.. it was so damn annoying to run from the overseer and HIS FUCKING LASER, one more death or no checkpoint and I would deinstall it and the last levels are just aful too. So many precise jumps and respawning enemys, was a bit of a downer.
But overall a really good game with a great story.
good game
I love this game, I had just finished Katana Zero when I stumbled upon this game and everyone said "if you liked Katana Zero then you'll like this". And while that is mostly true, I wanted to clarify that although similar Sanabi is not just a Katana Zero sequel. The art style and setting is similar yes. And the story is the same to the extent where both are about a power larger than you that is going to have you sitting on the edge of your seats wanting to get to the end. The story overall is still significantly different than that of Katana Zero. The game play is quite different too. It is much more platform based than Katana zero and for the most part has zero time dilation. If you played Katana Zero, you will like this game. But if you are wary that this game is clone know that it a great, fleshed out world, with unique characters and story, and a fabulous movement system.
amazing game and plot
although the last hour of gameplay was pretty repetitive
the plot was amazing and made me in tears
really good game
Mobilidade FODA de fluida e intuitiva. História te envolve no inicio e emociona no final. Design de arte atmosférico pra caramba. Combate esquecível e descartável, exceto pelos chefões, q variam de muito bons à FANTASTICOS.
I'm not crying, YOU'RE crying.
Gameplay can be irritating at some parts, but its just a minor hiccup, it's a great game and a wonderful story
Much better than expected!
This game is just S-tier.
fire
Truly a wonderful game, Just saying what you love about this game is a spoiler of what makes it great. 

But Mari I did find your jokes funny!
*SWING* *SWING* 👍.
Movement feels amazing when you really get into it. The last section of the game, when you zip through the areas from all the other chapters and revisit their mechanics, is amazing to play through. 

The hardest difficulty is definitely the best way to play through the game, as it feels so rewarding to get through sections without taking a single hit. It also makes the combat sections, which are too forgiving on the normal difficulty, much more intense and satisfying to get through. The only time I got annoyed with this difficulty though, was in the final two boss fights. The pattern of attacks these enemies use is too random. When I finally beat them, I felt more that I had gotten lucky that they chose an easier sequence of moves rather than feeling that I had truly mastered them.

The story is interesting, but it interrupts the flow of the game. There are so many cutscenes. While it is interesting to uncover the mysteries the game has created, there were many times where I was getting into the flow of the game just to be interrupted by a 1 or 2 minute cutscene of dialogue.
8/10
like this game, only issue is little action and cuts of the flow with lots of "story". Still a sucka for games like this and have been skipping many scenes when in the zone!
top notch. needs a movie adaptation. 10/10
Amazing game with a great story and combat. Also, a Library of Ruina reference... 10/10.
찬양하라
Grappling hook - the game. Didn't expect much from the story but was pleasantly surprised. Overall great experience.
The gameplay is solid, grappling hook based platforming with some combat.
There's some frustrating portions here and there, but the game doesn't punish you for playing on a lower difficulty (i.e. there's no True Ending for playing on hard)
The story is surprising and good. The writing (or more likely, the translation) has issues here and there but it's nothing that really brings it down. Ended up beating the entire game in a single marathon session because I needed to [i]know[/i].
Genuinely incredible.
i don't know what i was expecting when i decided to buy this game, it's not a genre i usually enjoy but this, this was different. amidst beautifully designed levels mechanics and characters is a story of gold i played this game to its' completion and i must say that i have never played a platformer with this level of quality when it comes to story and characters. the characters are likable and very silly at times. but at the heart of there is a story of loss and revenge. if you're debating whether or not to buy this game i only have one thing to say, i also had that debate.
Fantastic game, scratched that Worms Ninja Rope itch I did not know I had. With cocaine. Also the story is pretty good.
What in the actual.... So I came into the game knowing I will be 100% delivered with amazing visuals with cyberpunk elements, an exceptional soundtrack, and of course a fun gameplay. But I was NOT expecting to BAWL MY EYEBALLS OUT towards the end there.... I am truly, truly blown away.
Nice gameplay. Better History. Buy it and get tissues.
Finding the game randomly while searching: Wow this game looks cool and fun to play let me try it.
At the end of the game: "Sniff..." WHY AM I CRYING?!?!?!?

This game deserves much more than just a rating. Truly an astounding experience!
My overall rating for SANABI 9.5/10. it's a great game which deserves you giving it a shot
what makes a platformer game good? 1-visuals, pixel art and art style. 2-background soundtrack. 3-movement and combat. 4-boss fights. 5-the story.
As for the first point, SANABI's pixel art and visuals are amazing (for a platformer game) and the animations are smooth. So 10/10 for graphics 
As for the second point, the soundtrack fits in perfectly in every stage and it's great. So 9/10 for soundtrack
As for the third point, the movement is great and the combat is simple enough to master and complicated enough to mess up sometimes, and the movement animations are great and satisfying. So 10/10 for the movement and combat
As for the fourth point, every boss fight was different and harder than the one preceding it and they fit in well with the story. So 10/10 for the bosses
As for the fifth point, the story is amazing and filled with plot twists and emotions, the ending was also great and the storytelling is just something else. So 10/10


however i do have a problem, Veteran difficulty (which is the second hardest difficulty) is too easy and legend difficulty (which is the hardest difficulty) is too hard
i played it for the first on legend and finished it on legend (i chose this difficulty as i had just played dark souls a few weeks before it and the rest of the difficulties felt too easy) and then i decided to play SANABI again but on veteran this time and it was too easy
This is absolutely phenomenal.  The minute to minute gameplay and near limitless skill ceiling is captivating, and the storyline especially blending with gameplay choices in chapter 5 is stunning.  New techniques are unlocked regularly, and though you can feel like they're complicating the gameplay, they come with an associated boost to the power fantasy that makes it feel worthwhile to immediately master.  Boss runs can hit some peak frustration but each time, again, you feel like such a badass to take down the target, it's worthwhile.
Very unique gameplay with grapple mechanics, interesting story< beautiful graphics
This game is incredible.  It is easy to compare it to Katana Zero - with it's stage progression, platforming-based game play, and it's story being told as the break from playing the game

But this game.  It is perfectly paced, difficulty is implemented excellently (and so fairly) on their hard difficulty.  

But this narrative?  It is special.  This is Signalis-tier and eclipses Katana Zero, just from the ending sequence, alone.  The entire end game of this game is an absolute masterpiece of story-telling, gameplay culmination, hype, environment and emotion.

This is my first Steam review, but I had to take time to say a bit about this game.  If you like unique platformers or have ever used a hookshot/grappling hook with swing mechanics In a game before, you will feel so at home and will be comfortable very quickly.  

Buy this game.  Wonder Potion, thank you.
gud
It make me cry, that's it...
Just play it until the end, such a great game <3
Hour 1: i love my daughter and i love swinging around
Hour 5: i like this mari lady. something fishy is going on but im having too much fun swinging around
Hour 10: Why am i crying
First hours: I don't believe that the story can surprise and make me cry.
After I finished: (இ﹏இ`｡) (⋟﹏⋞) .·´¯`(>▂<)´¯`·.
This is a hidden gem of 2023 that should have won some TGA title. The pixel art, the OST, the story, the gameplay are all 10/10. Do yourself a favour and play it, you will not regret it.
<3
what the fuck man...
my god, the story of this game is just freakin GOOD bro
it's sad, funny, depressed but also full of happiness 
u just create a masterpiece, congrat!!!
damn... :'(
this is the greatest game ever made no joke je busse
효도해야겠다
BIG sad
Sanabi was genuinely an incredible experience. I went in knowing nothing about the game and had great fun swinging around spider man style.
Little did I know I would get so invested in the story. To the point even that I cried at the end.

I recommend this game to anyone
A story about the least brolic Korean father
:(
Amazing story, although I wish the gameplay was more refined. Felt janky and checkpoints were brutal in some places. But the art, design, and animation is sublime, with a great story to carry it. 8/10
나는 이런 스토리에 약하다!!!!!ㅠㅠㅠㅠㅠㅠ

공장에서 너무 어려워서 포기할뻔했어요.. 난이도 쉬움인데ㅠ
액션이랑 스토리는 좋았어용
픽셀아트도 넘 멋지구 사이버펑크 조선을 볼 수 있다는것만해도 값어치를 한다고 생각합니당!
This game is phenominal. The story is so enticing, and the flashbacks and music are so emotional. The game's movement feels amazing, and you are really emerced when you play. The secrets that are revealed and the plot twists are amazing. Easily one of the best games I have ever played.
Very good very nice very sad
holy shit
The gameplay is simple at first but gets very fluid and fun as you progress. The story is great as well. Has a lot in common with Katana Zero, so if you liked that game you'll probably enjoy this one as well.
good game
A friend recommended me the game, believed his words. Got the game and soundtrack barely even knowing about the game.



it's peak...
Sanabi es de lo mejor que he jugado este año. Un plataformer 2d con mecánicas novedosas y que no se estancan nunca, siempre te da algo nuevo con lo que poder jugar sin salir de la mecánica principal del juego. La música es simplemente maravillosa es totalmente inmersiva y no desentona nada con su estética cyberpunk lograda excelentemente con un pixel art hermoso. Decir que Sanabi es un buen juego se queda corto, todo lo que rodea a este juego fue horneado con el cariño extremo y esto se ve en la historia tan bella que nos plantea, Yo quería entretenerme balanceándome por una ciudad, no llorar por una historia tan bien hecha. Es un juego que definitivamente debes jugar y creo que hasta supera su inspiración Katana Zero que tambien es un JUEGAZO. JUEGUENLO, COMPRENLO, ES HERMOSO
amazing
A fking emotion roller coaster, and a good one.
guud
im going to go lie down in a grave
Please play this game, on top of super fun game play it has one of the best stories I have ever experienced in gaming. Please do your self a favour and play it, you will not regret it
o7... :(
Perfect. Just perfect.
It was alright.
[h1]2D platformer that's filled with good music and gameplay and over swelling plot[/h1]

SANABI is a game where player take's control of a retired soldier whose right hand is replaced with a giant grappling hook. This weapon allows player to traversal stages with style and takeout foes very efficiently. Alongside completing maps by getting from left end to right end, player gets to experience a story filled with dystopian scifi-city, cold determination and comic reliefs delivered by npc's. Throughout the game there's great pixel art and soundtrack presence.

That is until certain point of a story (where player has to [spoiler]choose the ending[/spoiler]) where I think game starts to fall partly flat with some of the praises I just presented.

Let's start from the first thing after [spoiler]choosing going up the stairs[/spoiler], boss fight against [spoiler]Major Song[/spoiler]. Up to this point it's been always clear what player needs to do in order to avoid getting hit and when/ how to strike back against the present boss. In this fight there's very hard in middle of intense fight to read when attacking her is a good idea and not encountered by her. The [spoiler]final[/spoiler] chapter also struggles with flying foes equipped with [spoiler]swords[/spoiler] spawning indefinitely close to a player. What problem this causes is when player tries to do [spoiler]armor dash[/spoiler] against specific target (for example to [spoiler]move a container[/spoiler]) the game automatically aims for closest target that might be foe instead and limits player's control of the situation.
And story... let's just say that when [spoiler]Mari pretends to be so surprised about player character's voltage level and worker ID she would not be only a master in IT-field but also in a poker game to fake out her expression through out the journey[/spoiler].

Verdict:
SANABI feels to me like a good vanilla-chocolate ice cream in a waffle, which end part is filled with ginger or liquor. If you are up to a "bionic commando"-like 2D platformer and don't' care about the story, SANABI is a great pick for it's default asking price. If you care more about the story I'd rather recommend playing Celeste or this without getting too attached for the plot.
Really fun movement, less fun combat but an interesting story. I feel like individually everything is pretty good, but together it feels kind of weird sometimes. I think I overall enjoyed it, and I'm interested to see what this team makes next.
The best 15 dollars I have spent in a long time
I felt the love that the developers had while creating this game. Very well made storytelling and world-building. The art and animation was very unique and a well blended. Took approx. 10 hours for me and I wouldn't play it again, however the experience was amazing and still gives me the chills.
amazing gameplay. amazing story. amazing music. 10/10
One of the best games i have ever played. The story was amazing and had me crying which i never do for any game. All the negative reviews about the game play mechanics is just skill issue like fr get good at the game. I beat this on veteran mode for my first play through its not that hard until the last chapter. 10/10 would definitely recommend
buy this game
noice
Great game, fluid movement and combat, without being handholdy. The momentum physics are quite good as well! Gotta think about when to use abilities, and in what order.
I really enjoyed the story, you start by thinking "Okay this is just the method for making the story start" but if you still put yourself in the shoes of the General, it has lots of good moments that make the emptiness of the beginning make sense. Plus, I teared up at the end. So. emotions are good.

Really engrossing, didn't want to stop playing, whether it was the combat/gameplay making me want to continue or the story, I can't tell...
This game really make you FEEL like Spiderman
Underrated critically, would wipe my memory to play again for the story
If you like Katana Zero, you will definitely like this too
fun game, pretty similar to katana zero but not the same its nice
action, story, and music. everything is perfect. 10 out of 10. must play.
"Thank you for playing with me even though you're tired."
Been playing since early beta and it is...

One of the greatest games I've ever played.


One of the best Metroidvania/Platformers I have ever played.
Epic combat and atmosphere. Beautiful Neowiz pixel art. Challenging gameplay and a tearful story with mystery and many twists that rewards attentive players.

10/10 For me. May the song play on.
I came for the grapple hook and stayed for the excellent story
Great gameplay, even better story and plot. My only complaint is that the aim assist feels too high by default, but it is adjustable in settings so it's not really a big deal.
Sasageyo type game 10/10
If I could turn back time and re-experience this game again. I would.
fantastic with create controls and touching story that truly captured my interest  and made me laugh a punch. highly recomended
흥미로운 로프액션, 몰입되는 스토리, 아름다운 도트 디자인이 재미를 더한다. 하지만 한국겜이지만 약간 어색한 문체, 2와 3챕터의 기믹들이 불쾌한 기분이 들며, 스토리 위주의 5챕터에서의 약간 늘어지는 스테이지들은 아쉬움이 든다.
Great story.
Great soundtracks and sound effects.
Great gameplay.

Great Game.
GG.
(purchase it without a doubt)
Biggest surprise of the year.
I didn't expect this game to be that good 
i think the store page undersells how good this game is.
Highly Recommended , my indie game of the year of 2023

Came for the grappling hooked by the story
Cyberpunk K drama epic
와 이런 갓겜이 정말 재밌다 나중에 DLC 나오면 사야겠다.
처음에 내가 좋아하는 게임류 인가? 하고 들어갔는데 정말 재밌다 
한번 꼭 하는것을 추천함
very smooth gameplay, neat graphics, cried at the ending

worth
came for pixel man, stayed for pixel plot
Wow what a great story and really engaging game play. It was all about the friends we made along the way.
great game and soundtrack!
Gameplay is silky smooth and the story is riveting and heartbreaking, excellent game for anyone who enjoys story-rich games and/or platformers like Katana Zero
갓갬.
Yep...it made me cry T-T...dam and swings are nice
JUSTICE is watching you.
스토리를 다른사람이 꼭 봤으면 좋겠다
중간중간 오글거리는거 빼면 재밌는게임

[h3] Gameplay: [/h3] 
The combat in Sanabi is inspired by 'Katana Zero' -- with the most obvious change from its combat being the swing mechanic. Swinging around always feels satisfying when pulled off, and means that you are always moving and swinging throughout the levels that have been carefully designed for that movement, but can feel finicky at times especially since it is such an unconventional mechanic and takes a while to get used to. The difficulty is also trying to mirror that of 'Katana Zero' and scales exceedingly well as the game progresses and different enemy types and complications to the game are added a a pace that keeps the gameplay interesting while not becoming overwhelming. The controls also work well on both on controller and mouse and keyboard since it allows you to you your cursor to aim which is refreshing seeing as most 2D platfromers on PC have pretty mediocre controls. The game also has a harder unlockable difficulty and a speedrunner mode and due to its short length of 9 hours is replayable, but don't expect to be playing it over and over again since most of the main fluff of the game is in that first playthrough. The length of the game also means that it doesn't overstay its welcome and means that each enemy encounter feels meaningful and fun.

[h3] Visuals: [/h3] 
'Sanabi' has gorgeous visuals that mix real-time lighting and fog with beautiful pixel art that blends well with the fast-paced combat that needs that clear visual clarity. The game will constantly pan over vast beautiful cityscapes that set the atmosphere for the game and act as a moment of reflection in between the intense combat sections and are an absolute joy to look at. 

[h3] Story: [/h3] 
 Sanabi's story is a mystery thriller with a captivating and engaging story that leads to some genuinely jaw-dropping moments, but is tainted with annoying characters and a weak ending. I found the secondary main character 'Mari' pretty frustrating, with lines that are distracting in serious moments and unfunny in the calmer ones. It also does have different endings according to your choices but it isn't a big aspect of the game. Only one choice affects the ending, and one of the endings is essentially just a cutscene, which feels like a waste of an opportunity. The longer, more fleshed-out ending didn't click with me as much as I would have liked, and felt like it wasn't the ending the game had been building up to.

[h3] Music: [/h3] 
Sanabi's music is excellent, having adrenaline-pumping tracks with boss tracks being especially exhilarating and more serene slower-paced tracks that stick in your head long after you've beaten the game.

In conclusion, Sanabi can stand as its own next to the games that inspired it such as Celeste, Katana Zero, and Hotline Miami through its exceptional music, gameplay, visuals, and story and should get more of the recognition it deserves.
8/10 very poogas
SANABI's a great game. Possibly my favourite out of every one I've played this year, and I play a lot of them.
It's partially because the game makes me feel like I'm absolutely busted at it, but also because the controls, mechanics, and story are incredibly tight. And fun.

The game's introduction of new mechanics are paced excellently; its core gameplay loop is enjoyable almost regardless of what level of the skill spectrum you land on; the story is intriguing in both themes and its beats, dropping just enough hints that a player is capable of solving its mysteries incredibly early while still remaining fuelled with a jet-fuel level of emotional oomph that'll keep the player pushing to the end.
It's very, very good.

The only real criticism I have is on what is (technically) the final boss, whose mechanics are obscure in a way that encourages experimentation but tended to just leave me baffled. I'm still not sure why my shift would get blocked at some moments.
That's literally my only criticism. I'd recommend this to anyone at all who even mildly enjoys platformers, and it's the cost of 1-3 burgers and I'd wager almost any PC can run it. Give it a go
The best grapple-hook platformer you'll find on the market, with a better father-daughter story than The Last of Us.
Purchased this game really early in early-Access and i loved it. Followed the team all the way to the end and it was worth it ! 
Soundtrack is amazing. Writing, is good too it's not groundbreaking, but it has it's twists. 

the gameplay feels amazing the bosses were intense and cool to failed. 
love this game and you should give it a try
Its a GOTY in my book, the story is just perfect that it made a dead man cried.
A solid platformer with a great story, finished in about 8 hours
Really scratches that Nitrome itch that I've been missing.
The story and the gameplay sometimes get in the way of each other, but each is so really good in it's own right that this is an easy recommend. 

Try not to cry and keep hooking challenge: The Game
This game is absolutely amazing, story is engaging, combat is fun, and movement is so crispy it could make me bust. It's not super long (~10 hours long) and not especially difficult if you're used to platformers, but can still give you a challenge with the speed-run mode and Legendary difficulty. The music is also PHENOMENAL and can hit you pretty deep, like at the end. 

TL;DR, this is like Celeste and is clearly inspired by it, but differentiates itself enough to make a solid game with good movement, combat, story, and music. If you liked Celeste or a similar game I highly recommend Sanabi.
I usually don't leave reviews on any game I play but this one genuinely touched me and made me cry. It's an experience so rare in gaming I thought I'd never get to feel it again. 10/10 game
It was quite the ride Commander, Looking forward to the next mission.
The movement is so smooth i find it orgasmic.
Fantastic story. 

Platforming is a plus, but I wouldn't call it a tight experience like meat boy or celeste. The platforming reminds me more of Ori's time-senstive sequences. Facilitates the character you play very well. Feels great.

Not a very long game, but I didn't feel like I needed more. At best could've squeezed in one more boss before overstaying its welcome for me.
do I need to say anything? Just play then you will khow.
love it
I love when a game just blows up and gets the attention it deserves and I am so glad I tried Sanabi based off the positive reviews alone. The story is stellar and the gameplay is some of the most fun I've had in a 2D platformer in some time. And then the sythnwave soundtrack absolutely rips. One of the best years in gaming continues to keep throwing out hits.
Please play this game - the time spent playing has been so much fun with how enticing the story is and how much fun it is to play!
A lot of people are comparing this game to Katana Zero. As someone who seriously loved Katana Zero, I have to say, this game feels much better and complete. However, movement and platforming is the focus and combat is secondary.

I can think of very minor issues coming from this game. One is the sort of whiplash you get with constant switching back and forth from gameplay and cutscenes. 

When you are having a lot of fun playing, the game stops you and has you experience a cutscene. 
When you are excited by story progression, a new mystery is brought up, and becomes a cliffhanger that is interrupted by gameplay.

They don't want to info dump on you, but they kind of mess up the pace. A bunch of conversations investigate one idea and then for one reason or another, they have to drop the conversation and start running again. 

It takes time for the story to get good because the main character is deadpan rude and does not allow conversations to progress very far. There is a purpose for it in the story, but I can see how it would get on someone's nerves. 

Once the story begins dropping answers on you, it explodes into something amazing, and you wish you could just watch it like a movie. Shortly after, gameplay calls, and you will feel motivated to perform well and go wild only to still be stopped to interject small dialogue.

Despite this, time is minimally wasted and it didn't hinder my enjoyment of the game. I highly recommend it,
insanely good story, would recommend a hundred times over
Any game with a grappling hook is automatically S tier.
Came for the gameplay, stayed for the story.
Bionic Commando meets Katana Zero
9시간 영화같네요
very good narration. I would highly recommend this game to other players
I didn't finished the game still playing it but truly this game overwhelming.


Edit:

Finally I finished the game... I never felt so excited long time a go.
the story the action the music all combined together in a perfect way.
Truly thanks to the developers and all who worked on this project we need more like this.
This game is an absolute masterpiece, its the successor to katana zero and the game knows it.
I did not expect this game to be so downright fun, and to be weeping at the end. 
I need more games like this.
Truly a masterpiece

⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣀⣤⣴⣶⣾⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣶⣶⣤⣄⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣠⣴⣾⣿⠿⠛⠉⠉⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠉⠉⠛⠿⣿⣷⣦⣄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣴⣿⡿⠟⠉⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠉⠛⢿⣿⣦⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣴⣿⠟⠋⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠉⠻⣿⣦⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣰⣿⡿⠋⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠘⢿⣿⣆⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣼⣿⠟⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠻⣿⣧⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣸⣿⠏⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣀⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠹⣿⣧⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⢠⣿⡟⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢸⣿⣷⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢠⣤⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢹⣿⡆⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⣾⣿⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣼⣿⣿⣿⣄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⣷⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⣿⣿⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣰⣿⡟⠀⠻⣿⣷⣄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢰⣿⡿⣿⣷⡄⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢻⣿⡀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣴⣿⡟⠀⠀⠀⠈⠻⣿⣷⣦⣀⠀⠀⠀⣿⣧⠈⢿⣿⣦⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢸⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⠀⢀⣀⣴⣾⡿⠋⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⠻⢿⣿⣶⣦⣿⣿⣆⠀⠙⢿⣷⣦⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣸⣿⠃⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⡟⠋⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠉⠙⠛⠛⠋⠀⠀⠀⠙⢿⣿⣶⣄⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⢠⣿⡿⠁⢸⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⠛⠿⣿⣷⣦⣤⣄⣀⣸⣿⣿⡆⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⢸⣿⣇⠀⢸⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⣀⣤⣤⣄⡀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣀⣤⣤⣄⡀⠀⠈⠙⠻⣿⣿⠿⢿⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠈⢿⣿⣦⣸⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⢿⣿⣿⢻⣿⣿⠇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢿⣿⡟⢿⣿⣿⠆⠀⠀⠀⣿⣧⣠⣾⡿⠃⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⠻⣿⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⢰⣿⡇⢸⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⣿⣷⢸⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⢀⣿⣿⡟⠋⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣴⣿⣿⣿⣷⠀⠀⠀⠈⣿⣷⠸⣿⣇⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢰⣿⡏⢸⣿⠃⠀⠀⠀⢸⣿⡿⣿⣶⣄⠀⠀⠀⠀
⠀⠀⢀⣾⣿⠟⠁⠀⣿⣿⡄⠀⠀⢀⣿⡿⠀⣿⣿⠀⠀⠀⣀⣤⣶⣶⣦⣄⠀⠀⠀⢾⣿⡇⢸⣿⡆⠀⠀⢀⣿⣿⡇⠈⠻⣿⣷⣄⠀⠀
⠀⢠⣿⡿⠃⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿⣷⡀⠀⢸⣿⡇⢰⣿⡏⠀⠀⣼⣿⠟⠋⠉⠛⣿⣷⡄⠀⢸⣿⡇⠈⣿⡷⠀⠀⣼⣿⣿⡇⠀⠀⠈⢻⣿⣆⠀
⢀⣿⡿⠁⠀⠀⠀⢠⣿⡿⢿⣷⣄⠘⣿⣧⢸⣿⣇⠀⢸⣿⣏⣀⣠⣤⣀⣸⣿⡇⠀⢰⣿⡇⢸⣿⡇⢀⣼⣿⢻⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⠀⢻⣿⡆
⢸⣿⡇⠀⠀⠀⢀⣾⣿⠃⠈⠻⣿⣶⣿⡟⠀⣿⣿⠀⠀⠛⠿⠿⠛⠛⠻⠿⠟⠁⠀⣾⣿⠃⠸⣿⣷⣿⡿⠃⠀⢿⣿⡄⠀⠀⠀⠈⣿⣷
⢸⣿⡇⠀⠀⢠⣾⡿⠃⠀⠀⠀⠉⠻⣿⣷⣄⣿⣿⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢻⣿⣄⣴⣿⡿⠋⠀⠀⠀⠈⢿⣿⣄⠀⠀⠀⣿⣿
⠸⣿⣇⣠⣶⣿⠟⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠈⠛⠿⣿⣷⣤⣄⣀⣀⠀⠀⠀⠀⢀⣀⣠⣤⣾⣿⡿⠟⠉⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⢿⣷⣄⣠⣿⡇
⠀⢿⣿⠿⠋⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠉⠛⠻⠿⠿⣿⣿⣿⣿⠿⠿⠟⠛⠉⠁⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠙⠻⣿⣿⠁
In all honesty, I did not expect this game to make me cry that much.
This is now genuinely my favorite game of all time. The characters are so perfect for the story in it. 
I rate this infinity/10
Nothing hurt more then realizing what Sanabi really was. Nothing hurt more than realizing who the general really was. This game pulled on my heartstrings so much that they broke and I'm not getting over it anytime soon.
Welcome, new hyperfixation.
I started this game when only half was available, the game-play was clean and the story was confusing because... it was the first half, all the mysteries were being set up. Later, recently in fact, my computer died, right after I had found out that Sanabi had been finished. I was excited because I had written this game off as one doomed to never be updated again, liek so many others, but here it was.
I won't spoil any of the story because it's best experienced, but I will tell you, this is a high flying, swinging adventure through a doomed city... and that getting to the end isn't what's important... it's how you get there.
GOTY
Great game, Happy Feet would be proud.
An honest review of SANABI - 

SANABI is undeniably captivating, weaving a tale of intense gameplay and immersive storytelling. Although, there are some setbacks to it. 

Gameplay and Visual Charm:
SANABI's gameplay is a thrilling escapade, offering a challenging platformer that has its difficulty with a lot excitement. The 2D pixel art style, reminiscent of Celeste, adds a nostalgic touch, creating a visually compelling environment. The *initial* playthrough is a delightful rollercoaster, with engaging mechanics that set it apart from other games.

Replay Value:
While SANABI looks fun for another round, its charm begins to disappear upon replaying. The story really loses its charm, it's just not interesting after you know the ending, and the achievements, omg. The achievements that are left after completing the game are some of the hardest ones. 

Challenges and Achievements:
SANABI introduces a commendable level of difficulty, reaching its zenith in the formidable Legend mode. However, the pursuit of achievements becomes a double-edged sword as the overwhelming challenge, particularly in beating the game on Legend mode, can deter even the most determined players. The lofty difficulty may alienate those seeking a more laid-back gaming experience, impacting the game's accessibility.

Cutscene Overload:
A notable drawback lies in SANABI's reliance on cutscenes, disrupting the harmony between storytelling and gameplay. The engaging storyline is occasionally overshadowed by an almost 50/50 split between cutscenes and interactive play. This imbalance, disrupts the game's rhythm and could potentially remove the amount of overall enjoyment. 

Time:
It's really a short game, sadly. It's only got about 8 hours worth of gameplay, and like I said, it's about half cutscenes. I really loved this game, but it only being 8 hours really deterred me from it. If it were lengthier, I'd definitely rate it better than I will soon.

Conclusion:
SANABI stands as a commendable piece of indie gaming, offering an enthralling platformer with a narrative that initially captivates. However, the overabundance of cutscenes and the super difficult achievements in the latter part of the game pose hurdles to its long-term appeal. Nonetheless, for those seeking an adrenaline-pumping and challenging gaming experience, especially during the initial joyride, SANABI remains a solid choice. It IS worth the cost, 100%, 8/10 game.
11/10
I have not cried like this since I was young and played mother 3 for the first time. This game gave me depression, cured it with laughter along the way and then tripled the depression.

great story

game play is very fun but their are some annoying bits

music and art is great
GOAT
GOTFY JUST FINISHED IT AND I'M CRYING OKAY
Very fun game 100% worth the price.
grappling hook cool
SANABI is a game that's something truly special with how simple yet powerful it is. It's a game that set me up for a fun ride with its precise  yet incredibly fun physics and mechanics. But then it goes on, and begins breaking down and throwing you for a loop. It delivered information with the expectation the player would remember,  and pays it off spectacularly. The ending made me cry, with a story that is all around excellent, with very fittingly enjoyable music. Other than maybe the bosses (which were decent) I have nothing to complain about with this game. The fact it does so much in such little time where the game spoke for itself makes it an experience with little to invest and a lot to enjoy. Go play it. Now.
Highly recomend to play this game without watching anything about it, just go in blind and experience this masterpiece.
Definetly one of the best platformers I played so far.
bnm
It's hard to put into words how I feel about this game. I almost never cry, but this game made me sob like a baby by the end... The writing is incredible, the pixel art is out of this world, the music is catchy and fitting every minute of this game, and every character in this game is absolutely wonderful. I truly don't have enough praises for this game, I will treasure it forever.
wonderful game
simple nervous gameplay, satisfying fights, a lot of spider-man-like platforming, an awesome OST, and a truly great story.
A true masterpiece
getting all the way to the end isn't what's important
very intresting game
First impressions: One of the best 2D action games of the year, with a story that'll leave you emotional less than an hr in.

Post-game clarity: Bawled my eyes out.
I just want to say Thank You to the Devs for creating such an awesome game.
Everyone who worked on this should be proud of themself :)

사이버펑크 플랫포머 와이어액션 게임
단순히 아트 스타일만 한국풍으로 바꾼게 아니라 스토리텔링도 한국적이다.
(한국 드라마, 한국 영화등 한국식 시나리오에서 어떤 공통된 감성이 흐른다고 느껴본 적 있는가?)
(그렇다면 당신이 느끼던 그 감성이 이 게임에도 담겨있다고 보면 된다.)

언뜻 보았을 때는 무난한 대신 파괴력이 부족하고 디테일과 캐릭터성이 모자란 유형의 게임으로 보기 쉽다.
하지만 실제로는 정반대에 가까운 게임

초반부의 몇몇 설정과 서사가 다소 매끄럽지 않은 부분이 있는 대신에
뻔한 전개가 될 뻔한 서사에 파괴력을 더해서 막판에 플레이어의 안면을 몇 번 후려친다. 쾅~!
_______________________________________________________________________

그 외에도
디테일하면서도 박력있고 한편으로는 아름다운 아트 연출. 
그리고 섬세한 감성이 실린 대사 텍스트의 퀼리티.
충격력이 느껴지는 액션.
카타나 제로와 2077을 제외하고서는 여타 사펑 게임에서 비교하기가 힘들 정도로
페이소스와 감성을 듬뿍 담아 쥐어짜낸 사운드트랙.

등등의 장점들이 어우러져 이 게임을 카타나 제로의 '언더'가 아니라 '타이'로 만들었다.
_______________________________________________________________________

문제점

1.모르면 맞아야되는 유형의 패턴이 너무 많고, 그 범위가 너무 넓다.
공장 파트의 몇몇 구간은 모든 방향의 화면 밖으로 한 번씩 죽어보겠다는 마인드가 아니면
길을 찾기 힘든 구간이 제법 될 정도.
2.체크 포인트 배치가 정말 잔인하다.
시간 제한과 더불어 진짜 사소한 운빨적 실수 한 번에 3구획을 다시 처음부터 해야되는 경우가 있다.
감독관 누나랑 은밀한 개인 면담 시간 가지는거 나쁘지 않기는한데.
그것도 정도가 있어야지, 나중에는 감독관 누나가 거북목이 되더라.
Absolutely fantastic story and BANGER soundtrack. As someone who's not into pixel games that much, this really got me hooked in, and I will remember this game as the one that propelled me into finding more pixel game gems hidden from my point of view.
Easily one of the best indie game I've ever played, as well as my Game of the Year and it's not even close. The physics are on point, the levels are great, no gimmick ever overstays its welcome, the story is good, the music is good, the visuals are great, it's bite-sized and super addicting to speedrun. In conclusion: Play this game.
Its a really good story, smooth and awesome gameplay, and totally worth it.
재미있어요
Everything about this game is just beautiful T=T
Just had a random fix for a precision platformer and the game popped up in my recommendations...

Ended up being one of my favorite games in the genre.
Every thing is so good and made with so much care.
Na brotha this game came out of nowhere and is soo impressive. I love the pixel artwork, general design and just the flawless gameplay. Story was tense and got me hooked from the start till the end with all the plots and so on.

9.8/10
Incredible Experience. My game of the year.
This is by far the best game to enjoy. 
It has a great story, movements, and sometime wacky scenes which are hilarious. I absolutely love this game more than any game I've ever had. For a couple months I've haven't had any fun with any games. I bought this game because it looked so school and the movements as well. I played it for the first minute and loved the music, aesthetic, plot, and etcs. The only game I genuinely enjoyed and having fun at in months. It contains basically everything I'd image from the video and images of the game.
I'm really on the fringe of recommending vs not recommending. The game was a 6~7 for me personally. It's a fast paced platformer with good pixel art and great gameplay. Controls are super responsive, levels are great and reward fast and aggressive play, soundtrack really stands out. It has some solid set pieces, and really ramps up tension for boss fights. Although the introduction was slow and boring, as soon as I got to the first real level, I thought this game might hold me over until Earthblade comes out. The thought ended about 20-30 minutes later.

I do recommend this game on the gameplay and music alone. However, at least for me, it can't stand among the greats because of its presentation and writing.

Spoilers for the first 30 minutes of the game that provide some additional context for my criticisms
[spoiler]
Your daughter dies at the beginning of the game, and the game goes edgelord immediately. Then 30 minutes in you'll meet another young girl who will accompany you and the game loses that tone immediately.

The story wants to drive a father + surrogate daughter narrative like the Last of Us Part 1, complete with the daughter figure being naive and cracking jokes. 

The problem is, as you might expect, the quality of the writing and the characters is not good enough to make you care about the characters. Poor writing does impact the whole product negatively, but it would be a minor issue if the gameplay was the biggest priority. The problem is that the bad writing is given the same focus as the gameplay, and it got in the way of me having fun.
[/spoiler]

Every problem snowballs from here:
* The actual time it takes to scroll through text is WAY too long. The developers want to animate every line, but the cues are off and it takes 2-3 seconds to just get to the next line. This was a fatal flaw for me. The story constantly interrupted the gameplay, and I couldn't speed read past it,
* The quality of the writing is mixed, and pretty bad overall, at least it was in Japanese (I couldn't stand the English localization). It has its moments, but the sheer amount of time you spend in conversation gets in the way of the game's biggest strengths, its gameplay and music.
* The high quality pixel art in the first level shows what the game could have, but the second level is an industrial area made up of monotone browns that lack detail, and one boss is rendered as a 3D model whereas the other bosses are rendered with pixels. This shift in quality betrays the stellar visual presentation of the first section of the game, which is problematic because at this point I'm irritated with the dialogue. In the first section, having gorgeous visuals softened the blow.  The game makes up for this with strong art and presentation in the second half, however. 
* Speaking of which, given the talent that the artists have, I don't understand why they decided to tell instead of show most of the story. The animations are fluid and gorgeous, but they play out mostly during dialogue, which is a waste.
* The final chapter of the game ties up the story and has really great gameplay, but it also has the most dialogue and some of it is unskippable. Also (minor spoiler) [spoiler]there's no final boss, the game instead closes on story beats. I don't know what could be a more fitting end to this review where my biggest complaint is that the story gets in the way of the gameplay[/spoiler] 
* Last issue is minor. The game isn't hard and I wish the 1HKO difficulty was unlocked from the start.


I like this game, I recommend it, but I don't love it. There's a ton of talent and skill behind this game, which makes it all the more frustrating to see it get in its own way with poor presentation. Now I'm looking at Tevi as the next thing to calm me down for the long wait til Earthblade's release.
I just want to thank the developers for this wonderful experience.
Just finished the game, Amazing story that actually keeps you on edge and with questions added with great and fun gameplay leaves the game as one of the best out there, loves ever second I played.
역시 전개가 뻔할리가 없었어.
Recommend if:
- Loves cyberpunk
- Loves (very)fast-paced platformer
- Wanna cry like a baby
- ..Or just want to play a damn good f**king game.
看到最后哭成狗
Very good game, especially as a speed game. 

Mechanically the game can be a tad finicky for anyone starting off, especially since there haven't been that many hook games in some time. Last I remember was Grapple Force Rena, but that was significantly slower. Otherwise, once you get used to it and start picking up speed it gets pretty fast in a hurry. Otherwise, the one ability that is a bit finicky to use is the charge dash, but it's not TOO bad

Main issue that the game can have is the abundance of cut scenes and slow walking. Some cut scenes are unskippable, which can get annoying for folk doing multiple playthroughs, and during the slow walking segments it's hard to tell what's a cut scene and what isn't.
* Since Speedrun mode isn't out yet, we don't have that yet for proper practice or anything, but that should be resolved soon.

Music is great. Not much to really say there they all fit their situations. The Long Voyage was great.

Story is pretty strong, even if the translation is not the greatest. Typos, grammar issues, sometimes using the incorrect words entirely. Hopefully they can fix that all soon for future players.

All in all, good vidya. Play it.
crying rn
Excellent. Would recommend.
damn this game was beautiful.
Best Platform Game I ever played.

Story: 10/10
Characters: 9.5/10
Gameplay: Solid 9/10

Took 9 hours to finish the whole thing on veteran.

Simply amazing. 

Not gonna lie, I cried a couple of times.  



9.5/10 I'm sweating tears. Do think level design could be a little bit more polished and levels that aren't so straightforward / linear but the main selling point about the game isn't it's gameplay so I give it a pass. Very well executed story.
It was worth the long wait.
Gameplay is good,
music is great,
story is excellent.
Great game, enjoyed the pacing and love the story! Incredible experience
great game
one of the reasons why i love story games
Great game. If you liked Katana Zero, Ghostrunner or even Neon White, odds are you're going to like this one.
Great OST, visuals, and aside from some problems with the grapling (controller at least) and some parts that drag for a little too much, Sanabi is amazing.
this game is too cheep for what its worth definitely worth your money
:sob:
Great action, beautiful graphics, it made me feel all the feels.
If you liked katana zero you will probably like this
Awesome game
I felt cool. Didn't expect to cry
GOTY 2023
Just bought it because of the fascinating gameplay and didnt expected its more than that
The gameplay is fun, really picks up the pace in the latter half, and is also the reason I bought the game. The story is better. It's so good I can't go into details because it would ruin it. I will say that the story takes advantage of the fact that you are a player, WITHOUT breaking the fourth wall and getting meta. That's how to make a good story in a linear game that doesn't feel like watching a cut-scene (actually there are lots of those, but the point is that the game as a whole doesn't feel like one). Interactive medium, and all that. I could write paragraphs about how good it is, and about all the things it did right, but then I would spoil it. If you are itching for a good story, I doubt you'll be disappointed. I got it on sale, but it's worth full price.

10/10
This is why I play indie games.
one of the greatest games ive ever played. the second half goes nuts. If you see any bad reviews they have not finished this game.
Very fun to swing around. The game play reminds me of celeste plus a grappling hook. The game is cute during the intro and flashbacks. Loved the ending
Great game play, great story. Absolutely recommend
Super engaging story for a game of its type
Very good game. Completely unpredictable plot twist !!! But either way still solid.
A gem
Great game. My computer tries to off itself every time I open it now tho so I will be finishing it once I upgrade.
I was not a huge fan of Katana Zero - I thought it was like a B- game so pretty good but not great. 

This game is what I wanted katana zero to be - A+, feels amazing in your hands every second, never boring, always funny, music always amazing. 

If you're on the fence about buying this, get off it and just get it. It's a fantastic game at a steal of a price. You will get hours of fun, it's insane to get this much game at such a small price.
Want to write about some grip I had with certain stages  but after finishing the game, I just wanna contemplate life. Q.Q
Sanabi was such a wonderful experience! From the wonderful art styling, to the great soundtrack (and perffect use of silence), to the teeth clenching game play, to the tear inducing story.  I would like to thank everyone that worked on Sanabi, you all created something truly wonderful.
Honestly one of the best platformers I have ever played (definitely one of the best I have played in years) and was really excited when the full release came out after playing early access last year, the pacing of the gameplay including great implication of puzzles elevate this game to the same level as other greats like celeste. Honestly recommend it to all my friends that love platformers. The caste of characters are all bubbly and have great dialogue and the art is katana zero level of good. For me its definitely a 9/10 and as the developers work on improving the game it will definitely reach 10/10. It is already a staple for me in the genre and in indie games in general so I will always sings it praises. so if you continue to read my review know that my critique for the game is from a place of love and I really recommend this game.

However there are two problems that I hope the developers due read in my review that I hope they will address, one minor and one I think is pretty major
The Minor problem is the lack of a break in certain sections, for example without going into spoilers, there is was a part in the game where you encounter three set pieces (major action parts/boss fights) that happen one after another. The player is unable to find a suitable moment to exit the game without feeling that if he quits now he would it would ruin the experience in some sort of way. What do I mean by this? Well after the set piece ends the player immediately enters a cut scene that he is unable to pause and save than safely exit, he would only be able to pause the game after he skips the cutscene (which why would you? the cut scenes are great) or allow it to play out. Now for most this might not be such a bad thing, it just means there is just a lot of exciting and cool events in the game that can make a player play for hours. However not every player is like that and most times after a major set piece especially after a boss fight would normally save and exit the game. So it is not to start the next part of the game. Now you can save and exit after the cutscene but I feel like if a player came back the next week to play the game he or she would forget the context of the major set piece he or she was playing in therefore slightly hindering the experience. What I propose is before a cutscene starts (one that leads to the next boss fight or event) after a major set piece that the player must first interact with Marie than does the event trigger therefore not hindering pacing plus allowing players that opportunity that they now feel safe to save and exit the game because unironically the part of the game that I'm talking about the player's character is extremely exhausted which was how I felt after the three set pieces in the row.

The major one is using the controller. Since I have played the game mostly on the M&K I had no idea about how controller was like in the game until I had it plugged in the other night and decided to use it. There is a feature in the game the slows down time kinda like in katana zero (I had no idea this was even a feature) that allows the player to aim the grappling hook to where he wants to go. Now I didn't even once use it when I was M&K let alone I had even forgotten it was thing until I picked up the controller. Why is the ability triggered when ever you aim the grappling hook with the joystick? it should be a separate designated button, as it ruins all pacing in the game and makes it incredibly sluggish and frustrating as I was so use to just moving around super fast and making quick second decisions. I quickly unplugged my controller after that and continued to have fun on the M&K but please devs make it a separate button like in katana zero. allow controller users to decide if they are going to use the slow down ability or not than just forcing it on them.
Played this game because I heard it was similar to Katana Zero, and was not disappointed. Really enjoyed the story and the mystery behind the plot, trying to figure everything out was both fun and rewarding. The aesthetic was also great. My only complaint was I felt like the gameplay at the end dragged on for a bit to long, as at that point I kind of wanted to wrap up the story. Still overall a enjoyable experience.
SANAB1 best story ever
Good game. Has a soul.

After finishing the game, the only problem is the pacing. The game is about twice as long as it needs to be, so every mechanic and location stays well past its time.

And I'm crying.
I did not expected to merge into the story so deep in first 1-2 hours of the game

update: dayum the feels man...😭
One of the best stories I've had the pleasure of experiencing
Unreal. Maybe not as fluid as Katana Zero in some ways, but makes up for it with traversal.

The OST is incredible. The track - JUSTICE Is Watching You - gave me goosebumps.
cool depressing game 10/10
This game is super good and has become one of my favorite indie games, it has a great story and has an epic grappling hook
has anyone seen Elon Mask?
such a beautiful story (as a katana zero player i enjoyed this)
if you have some money laying around i reccomend trying this game
I can't believe how good this game's story is!!! The gameplay is simple but very fun. If you're interested at all, I highly recommend you try it!! Came for the fun gameplay, stayed for the gripping story!!
I originally got this game for free on another platform, beat it, and then came to buy it on Steam to leave a review. It's a really great platformer, super tight action, challenging but not frustratingly so. And the story is one of the best video game stories I've ever played through. I expected some fun, goofy, grapple hook action, which I got, but I did not expect to cry like a baby during the final moments of the game.
Extremely fun
This game is Kataza zerobi
再吹一次山娜菲吧😭
This is up there with some of the best platformers and story games I have ever experienced. It is masterful and doesn't overstay its welcome.
Fun game with great platforming. Story and art are great as well. Well worth the price.
Beatiful story, graphics, and music. The gameplay is extremely satisfying and polished. Beat it on Veteran mode and can definitely say that it was a challenge, but not a frustrating one like some platformers are.
Came across this game, saw the art and saw the Steam reviews saying this was like Katana Zero (a personal favorite).

I do see why people make the comparison to Katana Zero but I wouldn't make it personally. It has a a lot more platforming, and the grappling is quite different (and good fun). Even the combat is quite different, although again fun.

While the platforming and combat is fun, it didn't blow me away on its own. What did blow me away was the total package for an indie studio (from what I can tell) making their first game. The length, pacing, music, and presentation are all superb, and more than worth the $12 I paid.

The pixel art is gorgeous, and the framing of so many scenes highlights the art even more. The music doesn't quite hit the heights of Katana Zero or Hotline Miami, but you get the pounding synth tracks for combat and then the slower and more quiet subtle tracks for the emotional moments. Really good stuff overall, and used in all the right places.

The game is also well paced, no single combat/platforming section or story section felt too long, keeping everything moving. Each area in the game introduces new mechanics specific to that area that also keeps you engaged and having to learn new things. No area feels too long or drawn out. By the end you are zipping along and it does feel good. Without spoiling anything, the last chapter in the game pays off the progression in game mechanics throughout the game beautifully.  The game is just the right length I felt too to let the story properly play out and unfold without dragging or any extra fat.

Getting to the story- a lot of praise in the Steam reviews, and it is good. You get enough to put most of the puzzle together before the end, so you'll have some idea where it's going, but the way it unfolds is compelling, and you won't be able to figure eveything out before the end. The story really pays off emotionally with a touching ending too.

Writing and text delivery deserves kudos too, a lá Katana Zero, so much tone, flow, and personality is exuded in the way text bubbles are presented, the way they overlap, sound, changes to the font, etc. The delivery really helps get you invested in the characters, specifically the main two, but also the side characters. Even characters who get little screen time I found myself caring about. The writing and characters really elevate an already solid plot.

To put a bow on it- all of these elements make for a game that's hard not to come away satisfied with. It just hits so many high notes on the presentation with the art, sound, story delivery, everything. The gameplay isn't super complex, but it is fast and fun, and it stays fresh, introducing new areas and mechanics at just the right pace.

Spend $12, play this game. 

If you have a Steam Deck, great way to play.
A must play for people who enjoy games like Katana Zero and Hotline Miami.
if you love katana zero you should play this
THIS IS THE BEST GAME EVER...
I never thought  a pixel game could make me cry this hard
More than worthy of a second play-through.
This has become one of my favorite games of all time. Fluid, quick-paced gameplay, and a fantastic story. Probably the hardest I have cried to a game.
Sanabi is an excellent game that fans of 2D platformers/action games like Katana Zero and Celeste are virtually guaranteed to like. Bonus points for people who can't get enough of the Cyberpunk aesthetic or games with grappling hooks.

Pros:
-Excellent art and music
-Compelling story full of twists and tearjerkers
-Gameplay is focused, unique, and exciting
-No real bugs or jank to speak of

Cons:
-Some sections seem to stretch on for just a tad too long
-Minor translation issues
-Story feels a little contrived (very forgivable given the overall result)
-Death often spawns you back multiple rooms/sections, doing nothing but wasting your time
-The game could stand to be a tad harder (with more forgiving spawns, of course)


It's nice. Love it. UPDATE: Play Sanabi. NOW.
Getting to the end is not what's important... but get to the end
fills the katana-zero shaped hole in my heart
Rarely does a game make me feel this sad and also say out loud, on multiple occasions, "Man, this game rules."
Don't really post reviews but this game is amazing. If you like games like Katana Zero and Celeste definitely try this out.


😢
Both style and story remind me of one of my favorite games of all time; Katana Zero. If you have played that, then this game is pefect for you. If not, then you'd still enjoy the amazing story this game tells you.
Such a great game. Story entertaining, characters lovable and also intriguing - even though a bit obvious. 
Gameplay is also super fun with some twists during bossfights etc. 

Can only recommend.
Come for the wacky wahoo grapple arm. Stay for the feelings.
Astounding amount of detail in the sprite animations, especially during cutscenes.
Easily 9.9/10 amazing story and gameplay. only bad thing is the length of the game
Absolutely amazing game. I really love the story, the soundtrack, the gameplay, the story, the graphics, the characters... the story... basically everything. Would recommend this game to absolutely anyone, even if you are just starting to try out platformers or have never played one before. As soon as I started playing SANABI, I instantly fell in love with it. I used to like the old Spiderman games for the DS Lite, and I suppose this is a little bit like those games, seeing as it is a platformer largely based about swinging around. The Spiderman games sort of started my love of platformers, but then I started playing some other games like Minecraft and Terraria, but when I started playing this game I instantly started to love the entire genre again. 100/10
legendary pixel art painting of elon musk
Finally i found SANABI. oh....
fantastic story, gameplay was fast and smooth although finnicky in the begging its easy to learn. bosses were the coolest ive seen in alot of 2D platformers ive played. game feels so much cooler on the second play through 

highly recommend 82/100
Rich story, hihgly recommend
Let me preface this by saying I LOVED Katana Zero. Played it for dozens of hours so believe me when I say it's hard to top.

Sanabi topped it. Absolutely stellar. It's Katana Zero with a grappling hook and more of an emphasis on platforming than combat but still just as much if not more tension and hype. Even at full price it is still well worth getting and I highly recommend it to all who enjoyed Katana Zero and even those who didn't
good game
I expected it to be a lot like Hotline Miami, but it ended up much more unique than I expected. The gameplay and grappling hook is a lot of fun, and I never felt like the game wasn't registering my inputs correctly. Would definitely recommend buying it if you're interested.
Favour, surprise, murder, firmness, salute, contemplation, looking at idiots, crying. The last game that let me have all these reactions at once at the same time was Undertale
New personality unlocked
This is a great story driven game, with that perfect arcade-style gameplay. Inspired by Katana Zero, you feel like an awesome badass as you swing around and mercilessly destroy machines to defeat SANABI.
Amazing game, amazing story, I like to swing. very good
I havent had a game make me cry so hard in years. Beautiful.
good
i cried
This game didn't have the right to make me so emotional. I won't spoil it for you, but definitely is a game I highly recommend to any type of player.

Game-play wise is an amazing experience where you feel like some sort of Spider-Man swinging around the city, and the pixel style makes it even more nostalgic like the old times playing a Nintendo a home.

If you want to ride a roller-coaster of emotions through the entire experience, I cannot recommend this game enough as it is. 

Hope to see a Part 2 at some point, the story can continues its legacy.
Cool story, fun gameplay, 9/10. Only gripe is the translation is not great, but you generally know what they mean to say.
peak
comically large arm
One of the best introductions to a character I've ever seen is in the first minute of the game.  It's fun, it's fluid, it's sick as hells.  Also it made me cry.  Really gets you on all fronts 

6.2/7
GOTY
고티
Genuinely amazing gameplay and somehow even more incredible story
The game is a bit on the lower end of what I excepted on every level, except the art. The pixel art is gorgeous and tastefull. Otherwise story, gameplay and replayability were on the lower end of what I was expecting. The story felt short for me, it felt lengthy, corny and pushed. The gameplay, while still kind of functionning is imho on the low end of what you can expect from an action platformer, it's too "free" to be smb alike, and at the same time there is no exploration nor freedom.

Difficulty wise, it felt very easy, I'm close to 40 and playing non competitive games atm(work, day life) and I steamrolled it in normal dificulty while chatting or watching udemy course in accelerate on the side screen lal.

It's still a thumbs up because I recognize the hard work and production value, however I felt that it was really not that good overall.
Absolutely amazing experience. This is one of those games that once you finish it, you think to yourself "Wow, that was really good".
.
yes
Great game, good controls. Rich story, if you enjoy games like Katana Zero/Hyperlight Drifter/etc. You'll love this
damn robots cutting onions
SANABI
i just wanted to play funny grappling hook game :,(
What if Katana Zero had a grappling hook and an even better story?
Fun Game.

Story can be a bit dialogue heavy at times and occasional pacing issues, but its a real fun and beautiful game.
Something I wish I knew prior to starting though is there is a setting for aim assist of varying degrees in the settings, the default is fine but if ya wanna feel like ya have more control disabling it is always an option. Would recommend just moving it around and testing to see what works best for ya.

Alotta peeps compare this to katana zero, but it is very different imo. Though there is a healthy dose of killing bad peeps, unlike katana zero there is greater focus on platforming and the type of movement tricks ya can use with ya grappling arm. Combat depth when it comes to killing stuff like mooks is lesser than that of katana zero, but the freedom in movement with ya grappling around is far greater.  

Anywayz, had a good time. Would recommend and all that jazz.



.
Art. Kino, even. Would recommend.
yes
Story spoke out to me!! The grappling movement, the platform challenges, and the well written story with a exceptional plot twist is just amazing! I guess I did feel emotional but in the end, it was a blast. I waited for months for a full release and it was worth every penny!
Excellent movement mechanics, high skill ceiling, built for speedrunning in all the right ways. Well-executed and well-crafted. Smooth, but not too easy.
challenging, story rich and looks amazing, some cut scenes are unbelievable~!
I cried my eyes out really bad. This game is very important to me now.
A really good time, hope these devs make more things
I wish Steam would allow you to pick both "Yes" and "No" for the "Do you recommend this game?" option; that concept fits SANABI perfectly.

I want to recommend this game because the pixel art, animation, and music are honestly breathtaking. OTOH, I [b]don't[/b] want to recommend it because of the incomprehensible story (the spelling/grammar errors in the English translation certainly don't do it any favors), the interminable cutscenes, and that the game seems determined to do everything in its power to get in the way of you enjoying it.

Here's the thing - the swinging is pretty fun! It feels good, the "swing dash" is honestly a really cool mechanic, and chaining together moves is really satisfying. But in the normal flow of gameplay, you get few opportunities to actually [b]DO[/b] any move chaining, thanks to all the barriers, walls you can't latch on to, enemies shooting at you from a screen and a half away, etc. etc. ([i]Gravity Circuit[/i] this ain't.) And I can not go any farther into this review without mentioning SANABI's cardinal sin - the terrible, horrible, no good, very bad combination of overly bouncy knockback and a criminally short post-hit invincibility window.

If you ever hit the bottom edge of one of the red "touch here and you get shot by an offscreen laser" areas, you get bounced upward and thrown further into the red area, where you quickly get shot again, bounce up again, get shot again, rinse and repeat until you're dead. And after you die, you're treated to an instant halt of the music and a completely black screen for 5-10 seconds until it eventually gets around to restarting you at the last checkpoint. ([i]Celeste[/i] this ain't). The same sort of pause happens every time you fall into one of the game's numerous pits as well (including when you slide into one by accident, because there's no real way to tell if the bottom of the screen is a pit or the way you have to go to the next section of the level).

Thankfully, there is a way to mitigate these issues somewhat - do yourself a favor and set the difficulty to Easy. When you don't take any damage, there's actually a chance for there to be some flow to the proceedings and it makes the game much more enjoyable as a result. I did that for Chapter 5 - after nearly rage-uninstalling due to the Chapter 4 boss, where falling in the pit at the bottom of the area resets [i]the entire fight[/i] - and the experience was much improved.

I look forward to the next game from Wonder Potion - if they figure out how to make gameplay worthy of their art and music, it'll truly be something special.
This game, is in the purest sense, ART. The amount of passion poured into this project is very apparent from start to finish, from the stunning visuals to the constantly evolving gameplay and ever suspenseful story. It all blends together so well into one beautiful experience which will implore you to see the game through to the end and when its reached it would have all been worth it.
I came to this game for the cool grappling hook looking game play. Level and Sound design is great, bosses epic. Surprisingly this game has a very interesting story filled with mystery and emotion. Though the gameplay aspect (weapon, movement) is simple and straight forward, the game is very fast paced and encourages you to try to be a grappling hook ninja as you zoom your way to victory. 10/10
Katana Zero with a grapple hook. It's good

Ending left a void in my heart, goddamn you wonder potion.
First 50 minutes: Wahoooo! Zippin n swinging around with metal arm n hook!

11 Hours later: [b] *Sobs [/b]


But seriously, Game Does a fantastic job blending, action, humor, and story! Seems like just a really cool hook swinging experience at first but It keeps you intrigued and tugs you along excellently as all the pieces fall together! Its SOOOOO good!!! I cannot recommend it enough!! Give it a Try!
Game has nice graphics.
please play this game
Best indie game I played in recent years!
In 2023 I had high expectations for videogames. So many good games released this year but what I was not expecting one bit was a game I have never heard that I impulsively bought late at night of to blow me away. From the first two hours of the game, I was hooked. I wanted to know where the story was going but I also just wanted to play more of its unique and fun fast-paced combat. Neither disappointed me as I continued through the rest of game as the story started to build on itself and the movement became more and more fluid. This game is by far my GOTY 2023 and is easily one of my favorite games of all time.
Hands down best story I've experienced this year!
A story that easily allows you to get invested. Solid pixel graphics. Fluid movement, like a makeshift version of Spider-man. It's just really good. Check it out.
BEST PIXEL GAME EVER.
One of the best games I've ever played
Unironically 10/10 masterpiece
Lasts the perfect length, the difficulty curve is smooth as butter, the story is gripping and depressing, the music is groovy, and the gameplay even groovier.
Only addition I could think of would be support for people to make their own levels and share them online.
god DAMN this game is good. i have a few issues with it, but none of them are related to the gameplay, which is impeccable.
nice story ;)
didnt expect the funny grappling hook game to make me bawl my eyes out but here we are
 good
Getting to the end is... actually rather important.  

Because the ending will floor you.  100% worth the playthrough just for that awesome whammy of an ending.
I wish I could forget this game so I could experience it for the first time again
Very good game. Bionic Commando + Katana Zero had a beautiful baby with major feels. There is one minor con for me though

* Tons of chase sequences (game feels like you are running from something like 80% of the time). There is almost always a sense of urgency. You rarely get a moment to just take breather and enjoy the swinging mechanics. I suppose that's due to the linear nature of the game. You are always moving forward to the next goal.
* Sometimes when I saved the game and came back to this another day I didnt know which direction to go. I'd often find myself going the wrong way but not sure how they could have addressed this one easily. Luckily, I of course found a walkthrough online and when I got lost- I'd reference it to figure out which way to go. I suppose another alternative would have been to not put the game down til I'm at a good stopping point (instead of the middle of the level).

That's the only negatives I can think of. Ran great on both my Steam deck and home PC. I highly recommended this one
katana zero but with better gameplay and a longer story, honestly it's way better than i thought.
It has a clean and fun grapple action gameplay with a great story. Definitely worth the money
Daddyyyyyyyy T-T
Playing as an Android Spiderman is great fun. I was positively surprised how intriguing the story is. 
At some points I cursed the game for being to difficulty for me (even when setting it to easy), but the story kept my trying again and again.
shift능력 마우스 있는 방향으로 갔으면
This game threw me for a loop. Fast paced movement + combat that you have full control over--especially when you learn to reverse-grapple. Maintained that flow through the majority of the game. The gameplay, admittedly, slightly fell off after chapter 2, but it made up for that with the surprisingly good story and homestretch. Wish it was longer though; there are certainly some parts I imagine could have been fleshed out more, but overall, I enjoyed the game. My heart though God damn.
Fun and great story.
While the story doesn't reinvent the wheel here it didn't need to as it kept me engaged trough tight fast paced gameplay a great soundtrack and a few chuckles here and there i have yet to get both endings but i found the one i got to be pretty cool. If you want a quick game to binge over a weekend and like gorgeous pixel art a good soundtrack and fast paced platformer you can't do much better when it comes to new releases(at the time of review) Have fun (:
진짜 인생게임 탑3안에 드는 게임
absolute banger of a game. 

Gameplay is simple enough but never really feels repetitive. 

IMO there are precisely two checkpoints that are annoyingly placed and put you back to far. 

very good story telling
11/10
Combat was simple but fun and fluent, Story was VERY good and well written with a pretty good twist, and the ost was an absolute banger. 9/10 game. Played on the harder difficulty and despite dying a ton I had a blast. Would not recommend playing on controller tho. This game is best experienced on mouse and keyboard. A great buy and an awesome adventure.
Looked for a game because of katana-zero addiction. Found this. And now always stay high with grappling arm.
SMASH
Absolutely incredible game! 100% worth the investment!!!
난 울어버린 부엉이.
SAN....A...BI.......
Absolutely phenomenal writing and music backed by solid gameplay. Extremely emotional and well executed from start to finish. Definitely a big recommend.
Incredible gameplay, killer soundtrack, beautiful pixel art, and one of the best stories I've ever played. 100% worth the full price.
Fun and interactive gameplay :))
play it. Its a solid 11/10 game
Great art, music, and story.
Banger
Best game of all. its good as katana zero.
Emotional story, sublime gameplay, wonderful pixel art graphics. A must play. Got my vote in the Steam awards for 'Outstanding Story Rich Game' and would probably be my GOTY if not for Baldur's Gate 3.
Really fun game with a very interesting story line
Grappling hooks and tears.
Kino
it really makes you *feel* like spiderman.

edit: ok so i just came back from finishing the game for the first time and man that made me bawl my eyes out. it's a flawed game sure but that payoff makes it so worth it. 100% give the game a try.
IM SPIDERMAN!!!!
Katana ZERO but somehow better
OMG THIS GAME WAS SO GOOD LIKE REALLY REALLY GOOD. I CRIED SO BAD MAAAAAAAAAAAN I LOVE THESE IDIE GAMES ^w^
buy now noiw nown nwo n ownownonwonw nwo buy byu buy the game now buy tiitt itt now buy b uy buy
Robotic Spider-Man arm swinging device goes BBRRRRRR
Imagine you can play spider-man in low budget pc.

i cry :(
It has been years since I last cried this much. Absolutely love the game in terms of both gameplay and storyline. Thank you for making such a great game. (tears are literally still pouring out from my eyes while writing this review)
Initially was interested in Sanabi because I just wanted to swing around and be fast and because the art was amazing. Didn't expect to be so engrossed in the story. With an equally fitting and compelling OST to boot, Sanabi is amazing and worth the time it takes to complete it. 

I'm gonna go cry in my room, now.
A 1/1 scale katana from time samurai... actually this one looks like a knockoff. quality still looks good though
25 minutes of pure cuteness and dream like situations and then an onion ninja passed by real fucking quick, I could barely see it... I swear man, it was the ninja! 

But fr, that kinda hit outta nowhere ;-;

This game is more of a story driven one, the gameplay is kinda fun but there's no challenge so far. I'm not a fan of story focused games and I always end up quitting it after a few hours of gameplay, but man... those first 30 minutes got me hooked up, now I wanna know what happens next ;-;
The story is beautiful. The movement feels great. Love how each level builds upon the last until it all accumulates together to make terrific ending level.
"Oh boy, a game with a grappling hook! This'll be awesome!"
...
"Oh boy, I've gone through my third tissue box..."
I thought id be getting grapple platformer not crying 10000000/10 would recommend
Unbelievable banger. Obvious comparisons to Katana Zero aside, this is an absolute gem in its own right. I do think that some sections of the game do drag on too long, but the game has such strong story hooks that you feel the need to get through even the weakest parts of the game. Incredible animations with tons of unique ones for single story beats help the game feel even more important. It starts off strong on gameplay, visuals, and story, and rarely stumbles. Buy this video game to save the industry.
good gameplay,
very good story
one of the best indie in 2023
I really need someone to play the harmonica for me right now.

Because this game has turned me into an emotional mess...

What an incredible piece of art.!The BANGER of a soundtrack, the GODLIKE gameplay and this inconceivably well paced, well written, unique storyline. I have rarely cried this hard after beating a game. The ending of this one destroyed me completely. It's easily a GOTY contender.

I have no words.

A big warm heartfelt thank you to the developers and creators of this masterpiece. Thank you so so much that I got to experience this piece of art. I loved every second of it. The sheer amount of hard work and passion you all put into this, I could feel it in every scene, every pixel.

Thank you. And bless you.
Oh my god this game actually made me cry. I wanted to play a cool platformer what the hell :(
Went in for fun swinging adventures, Came out with a shattered heart
Best game narrative I've played through in a while, bonus points for the swing platforming
HOOKED ON A FEELING :(

*I cried a little*
0/10 the mechanical arm swaps sides as you turn

other than that its a very very very good game :)
As a huge fan of Bionic Commando on gameboy when I was a child, this game is wonderfull !
I love this game. A great story with great mechanics.
great game highly recommend, its at a good price for a quality product
Amazing game with fun movement mechanic and great story
Highly recommended
A genuine masterpiece platformer, Momentum / Physics based grappling hook is the main mechanic all tied together by an unexpectedly very good and for some an actual tear jerking story.

Must play for platformer fans this is easily among the best. Don't pass it up it's worth the money
It has charm.

*Edit* 
This is my GOTY. Took 9 hours for me to clear on normal difficulty.
This game ripped my heart out and crushed it in front of me several times.
You may cry. I did, several times.

The story is SPECTACULAR, the gameplay is smooth and addicting, and the art style is stunning.
PLEASE PLAY THIS GAME!!!
Katana Zero + UNREAL LIFE smashed into one game
BuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzzBuzz BUH UH USSSSSS!
When this game flows, it FLOWS man. It's what I wanted from a remake of Bionic Commando with a modern take, but it's even dumb to say this as this is something special.
Game is great, highly recommend it if you like 2D platforming and speed. 

That being said, take this as something I would prefer in the future and not really unremitting points of the game:
- Some levels / stage mechanics are underutilized or just redundant in the mechanics. Such as pushing stuff, it always goes back to place, but other things like cranes never do, it makes for weird design consistency and the pushing is highly underutilized
- Most of the mechanics are only used because of red walls blocking you, which makes for really stale mechanics
- Dialogue is HEAVILY repetitive, tons of information or plot structure happens too frequently, such as characters having conversations cut short by something or not answering questions, it could be cleaned up a bit more
- The "limit removal" could've been cooler, make the tackle not have a wait time and make the limiter feel even more powerful, because as is it feels just as a convenience
- Could've used more boss fights, the ones in here are ok but running away boss fights could've been really cool like in Ori

That's just some points I think, but this game for sure it's one of the shining star of this year. I'm dumbfounded not more people are talking about it.

Congratulations, can't wait the next project from this team.
GOTY 2023 in my opinion, an absolute must-play without question. The grappling mechanics are simple to understand and difficult to master, but are fun 100% of the time. The story hurts in the best way. I was never bored even ONCE in this game.

Play it. Just play it. Please. I need more of this.
I enjoyed this game when it was in early access and you were a badass robot spiderman, but I WAS NOT EXPECTING THE FULL STORY TO BE SO AMAZING! ;==; THANK YOU FOR THIS GEM OF A GAME!
I loved this game! It feels almost similar to celeste. My only complaint is the lengthy cut-scenes that seemed to take away from the pacing of the game. If you love the story this will never be a bother.
Its awesome. Just want more people to play this game
So good, so sad, must play.
very good
Play this game. Now. This is not a request.
game good
.
Absolute masterpiece of a game and one of the few stories that have made me cry like a little bitch.
The gameplay is extremely fluid and fun though it does take a small learning curve. The pixel art is really cinematic and the game is incredibly beautiful.
Fan of Katana Zero or good stories? Buy the game.
good one
Sanabi is a story driven platformer that feels great to play.  The main draw the game is the grappling hook where you base all of your movement and combat around.  The controls are smooth, responsive, and somehow very intuitive.  If you're looking for a good eightish hours of solid platforming with an emotional story, get this game.
It's hurt my finger and my mental. Recommended
bought for the gameplay, stayed for the story
I haven't cried that much in a long time my eyes hurt
Amazing and heart wrenching at the same time. I won't lie the ending had me teary. The game play is so fun and fluid (except sometimes the dash charge is ANNOYING) along with the music and graphics. Highly recommend!!
the pixel art, soundtrack and story is great, I just don't enjoy gameplay that much. For the 1st time I have to switch game into easy mode cuz I'm more interested with the story
Ever since i heard this was katana zero but spiderman, I was instantly excited and had huge expectations.. little to say, even with only 3 hours im HOOKED onto this game, first few minutes were so impactful, and learning more about the backstory of our mc little by little is quite interesting paired with the fast-paced movement & combat making you feel like a GOD at some times. This can also run quite well on potatoes such as mine. intel i3-7020U (2.3ghz), 4gb ram, and integrated graphics (intel 620) this still runs pretty fast
A dopamine inducing platformer with an interesting plot and a satisfying send off to the whole thing.

Masterful, absolutely worth your time.
love it

Beautiful.
10/10 masterpiece
korean spiderman but then you cry at the end
10/10
Somehow game feels good but the moment there are enemy the fun disappeared and you struggle to go to the right place you want to go. but the story is really nice so go play
DA

Don't overthink it, Katana Zero with a grappling hook sprinkled with some depression for good measure.
This is probably one of my favorite games now from the movement and combat to the story 100/10
(yes I did ugly cry)
Some of the bosses are rage inducing, and sometimes the lack of input buffering is a struggle - but you have to get to the end and play SANABI.
At first, when I saw this game on Steam. To my mind, it's just a silly pixel game. After 10 hrs played non-stop, my eyes can't contain enough tears. I don't want to spoil anything, but I would recommend this game you guys to tried. It isn't just a combat grappling hook, but It had a AMAZING story line in it. there is so much to tell, but here is my best comment for this tho. Thanks you Wonder Potion for delivery the best pixel game!
holy shit this game is amazing get it now
Hook "man" go swing around in a dystopia city with a young girl around

10/10 game
oh my... .. . god.... sanabi..................................................... more...................... me more yes..!
Easily my game of the year. Gameplay solid and the story incredible. Platforming + Feelz
Interesting story, great art style, and ball clenchingly hard platforming at times.
great story good gameplay
she took the kids
High octane gaming with a grapple hook
mmm Grample
gimme more of that katana zero juice, phenomenal game
Gameplay is super fun, smooth and inovative.
For some players too much convo might be boring, but for me the story build up is really good. I am immersed in the story. Music and background scenary is also beautifull.
I read comments before finishing saying they cried. I was thinking if i could finish this game without crying. I didn't make it to the end.....

S-Tier for me. Will cherish this as one of my favorites. It does get frustrating at times but just as the message in Celeste, "you can do this..."
If you liked katana zero, this will scratch the itch pretty well. But I do have to say, this one is a bit more story focused, sometimes the story interrupts the flow of the gameplay, which is excelent and otherwise very fluid and fast-paced but aside from that this game is extremely underrated and should probably cost more than it does, the soundtrack alone justifies its price.
P.S. If you do pick this up, which I recommend, enjoy crying over a computer game.
banger
I have never been moved by a game like this in my entire life. Holy. Shit. Please play this.
good but not for me
best 2d platformer since pizza tower
Just what I wanted for platformers - fast pace, not much dull waiting, etc. All the minor cutscenes are skippable so I don't understand what they are... but even without them it's fine.
SANABI is plot heavy, which you might not expect from "2-d grapple hook game". This game is probably about 20-25% cutscenes and plot. The plot is good, and is structured like a blockbuster movie with a twist. Mechanics are good, only encountered two bugs and they both stemmed from hitting the lasers/redzones from the top. If you're looking for more 2d grappling or IL grinding, consider Remnants of Naezith.

Fatherhood in video games can feel like a shortcut to heartstrings. Mari and the General have a good dynamic. The art can be evocative and expressive. It impressed me what was conveyed with the small amount of pixels on the character sprites. Feels/10.
I'm not a story guy but it had me hooked at the start and even more so at the end. The game play was extremely solid and lets you feel yourself getting better with the controls as time goes on. I easily say this game is one of my new favorites of all time. If you are even remotely interested in this game please buy it!
welp you took my money AND my tears.
so good, like damn
-100% it, Firebird and Song hard af

This game is a "Shut up and takes my money" tier.
good!
好玩
Ending Means Starting Again
GOOD
Just finished the game and wow, truly amazing storytelling and it felt so immersive, the stages weren't repetitive and everything felt fresh. I cried at the end and I got the good ending naturally you just know the its the right thing to do when you get to that position, I loved the characters and twists the story had. 10/10 would love a sequel or prequel
This is about 50/50 game and pixel-art animated story. It took my aprox. 9hrs to complete.
Aesthetically it contains absolutely beautiful pixel-art and animation, with a few mediocre hand drawn bits.
The story telling is done quite well, tropey (not necessarily in a bad way), some translation issues, but surprisingly good with some fantastic twists.
The game-play has some awesome fast-paced grappling hook platforming, but suffers from mediocre level design, a few bugs, and there is a bit too much luck involved in some parts. When you do well you feel like a bad-ass though, and the last section of the game is brilliant and stands to exemplify just how much you've improved in your skills throughout the game.
Excellent game. Good gameplay, good music, good sound, good story, absolutely fantastic animation. Only flaw is in the english localization/translation and the way some of the level designs feel more like game levels than they are real places, otherwise it's pretty much a perfect game.
10/10 game 
amazing story fun game play
made me cry like 3 separate times
would 100% recommend to pretty much anyone
Katana Zero'ya yaklaşır dedim dengi çıktı, çok iyi alın oynayın
wow
Katana Zero with a grappling hook and finished story. Just buy it already.
This game makes you feel like the living legend you are. Then you cry, then you are a legend again, cry some more for good measure, repeat.

Now that we got that out of the way we can go back to real stuff. The level design is superb, your move set is really simple but once you are presented with a mechanic you are expected to master it because some of the levels will utterly crush you otherwise. 
The music is perfect it goes from eerie to blood pumping electro-rock and it makes you feel exactly how the game wants you to. When the music stops and all you can hear is your steps, then you know it got serious.
The pixel art is again incredible both the characters and the scenery are so dynamic and expressive its hard to believe, and again when they decide to break that look you know just how fucked you are [spoiler] The Overseer [/spoiler].

Tutorials are not a thing people really talk about, but even those are excellent, most mechanics are shown to you so organically you will not even realize that you just learned a new trick.

In the end this game is made with so much care its incredible and i cannot recommend it enough.
It's like Speed Runners if instead of a shark or pumpkin you controlled a war machine.

Very good game, very fun movement, fantastic story. For anyone who is hoping for a "plop in plop out" kind of gameplay, note that this game is pretty dialogue heavy, but I liked it.
진짜 라오어와는 다른 주인공의OO였다
good game
모든게 완벽함
I finished beating the game, and it was absolutely incredible! I love the storylines (angsty lore >:D), really good soundtrack, and most amazing artwork of pixelart! 

I high reccomend this game! <3
i came to swing, not to feel... :(
but in all seriousness: satisfying gameplay, cool mechanics, gripping story, cute robot
5/5 awesome game
such an amazing game 10/10
gameplay is kinda hit or miss, it does have its moments though.

story is 11/10. go in blind, dont look anything up.
An amazingly well animated and intriguing game.  As many have said, very Katana-Zero vibes, make sure to play through the very basic opening tutorial to see what the game is really about.

I will say some of the later levels and bosses get obnoxiously difficult, and the game occasionally has the frustrating habit of starting you several screens back, forcing you to repeat laborious jump routines 10x, which was very aggravating and brought to mind the obnoxious falcons from Ninja Gaiden.  But its not that serious a quibble, compared to how much effort went in to the rest of the game.  Just be prepared to occasionally shout epithets in frustration.
Its like if Katana Zero's story had an actual payoff to it
Came for the game play, stayed for the story 
And god is it a good story.
If you like platforming; this is a must have.  The story is also really good.
I bought it because it reminded me of Katana Zero, and I ended up loving it even more. A masterpiece!
I purchased this back when it was in Early Access. I was not even aware it had released.
Honest feedbabck? Buy it. For the price, and the total amount of time you'll spend, 8-10 hours (for one play-through) you won't regret it. Soundtrack is full of bangers as well. Highly recommend a listen to it if you're curious. 

Only one con:
Overseer Level; you'll understand once you get there. It can get frustrating, but keep pushing and you'll get through.
Better than Katana Zero, Love the story, Made me cry so hard
Lovingly crafted in it's entirety. Pixel art is so well done and very fluid. The gameplay is smooth, and extremely fun to play around with.

This game is definitely gonna be in my top 10 for the year.
Good game. Real fun. Sad that the Hacker-Samurai Cypher theme isn't in the soundtrack though. Soundtrack of this game is outstanding.
While there were some areas I didn't have that much fun with, I think the writing, music, and art more than make up for it. Really well done characters and setting, was pleasantly surprised with the game. I came in expecting Katana Zero, but got something different in a really good way.

Remember, getting all the way to the end isn't what's important.
simply perfect
I cannon overstate how great this game was, a tight platformer with great level design that makes you feel like "a legendary retired veteran". And the story is one of the best I had the pleasure of playing in recent games.
The game feel very smooth, the story is heartwrenching, and I think I might spend a few dozen more hours just replaying this game again and again.
The level design is chef's kiss... Also the story was very wholesome.. GG WonderPotion
an incredible platformer with a great story!
김치겜최고아웃풋
i swear i'm not crying.. i'm not.. fk.
엔딩 지렸다..
Movement game good
DONT GO IN THE BASEMENT
Honestly one of my favorite games of all time.  It really is another Katana Zero, just with the Arm Hook.  The movement in this game is thrilling, the story addicting, and both of it together leads to this masterpiece!  From the moment I bought it, I was in a rush to keep playing due to how addicted I was.  It is very rare for me to get hooked that easily.

10/10 truly enjoyed!  Coming from someone who has high regard for games like Undertale / Katana Zero / The Messenger.
This game had no business being this good. Reminded me of Katana Zero but with a longer and gut-wrenching story. Go to the basement, sure... but then go upstairs

This game is genuinely a masterpiece in storytelling. A bit long-winded at times (like, just let me play the game!) but ultimately worth the wait.
Played the demo two years ago and then decided to wait for the full release because I could tell it had potential to be special. Safe to say, it exceeded my expectations. Like with many precision/speed based platformers, it had some moments of extreme frustration, but everything was surmountable and fun. The presentation speaks for itself as well.

My one real criticism is that the balance between gameplay and story can feel a little off at times, with the pace sometimes dragging. Now, the counter to this is that both the gameplay and story are fantastic. While I do think it's a real problem with the game, I wouldn't want less of either due to just how quality both aspects are. I highly recommend playing through as blind as possible. While not every plot beat is surprising, it is always quite resonant.
great level design great animations beatiful story and perfect music 10/10
based
better than katana zero somehow
Really good looking and fun game
weeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
I played this game when it was early access and I was immediately hooked (pun intended). The game felt really smooth to play and the initial story plot was really enticing.

With the original release, it kind of feels like a lot of the QA fell by the wayside. Don't get me wrong, it's still a FANTASTIC game. But there are a lot of translation errors and typoes that I don't remember being in the first part. Also quite a lot of bugs that can be a bit frustrating. 

Even with that, when you're in the groove it feel PHENOMENAL. 100% recommend and I hope the team continues to release updates to fix various bugs (like getting clipped in and shot out of the boxes in the Firebird fight).
Sanabi is a 2D precision-action platformer with an emphasis on traversing the environments with your grappling hook arm. 

The game has a cyber punk/tech noir aesthetic as you traverse varied environments in the world of Mago City. If you have an appreciate for pixels, there's a lot to love here.

The sounds and soundtrack in particular is awesome. It's full of dark synth wave bangers and a few emotional tracks as well. The OST is probably worth the pick up too.

The story is excellent, and far exceeded my initial expectations. I enjoyed the cinematic storytelling and it never hurt the pacing of the action. If the beginning doesn't make you cry, the end just might.

Overall, this is a rock solid pick up for any person who enjoys a good 2D platformer with a strong emphasis on swinging around. I love stuff like this, man.

Swinging rules!

Controls work really well by default, and I played from start to finish no problem on my Steam Deck.
I'm not crying over here! These are tears of...erm... Awesome !!! The game is that great it brought tears to my eyes and it's definitely not because of several emotional gut punches !
Wow, I thought it was just a simple platformer game with interesting mechanics and a super simple story and characters. But guys, I was wrong!

It turns out this game is a super cool platformer with intriguing mechanics. Every chapter introduces a new mechanic, keeping things fresh and exciting. Not to mention, it also has an incredibly interesting story and charming characters.

I highly recommend this game if you're looking for a cool platformer with captivating characters and an engaging story. You won't be disappointed!
great story and gameplay. 10/10 recommend
After playing through Veteran and Legend difficulty I can say with certain that this is one of my favorite games by far. The story being concise and interesting with good character development and an interesting dystopian world to explore. And the chainarm gameplay that feels like Titanfall 2 Grappler but in 2D with the extremely fast mobility and fluidity when it comes to picking off groups of enemies in a matter of seconds. This could come off as a generic review but I personally just had alot of fun and had me addicted to the series,
